

The Edge of the World, all characters, original storyline, the universe, items, and entire world of Caelutera is owned and copyright (c)  by TYLER PATRICK BOND. 2005 - 10/15/2018
 






The Edge of the World
Eyes of the Watchers











Dedicated to those who continue to inspire me


and M. M.
	Prologue
I. 	Fall of the Dark Angel
Clouded Light 
III. 	Waking into a Nightmare 	
IV. 	The Fiery Heart
	V. 	Our Silent Paradise
VI. 	The Soaring Raven
	VII. 	Prelude of War
	VIII. 	Memories and Scars
IX. 	An Execrated Existence
X. 	Advent of Awakening
The Arcane Axiom 
XII. 	Night's Auspice
  	




















Prologue

The world was vivisected by avarice, as God saw it. Evaz’Sa saw fit to punish mankind for their sins and force them to obey under her divine rule. But before it came to that point in the Divine Era, God was very generous; the crops of the famished began to overgrow, the ill were healed, and the accused righteous were vindicated. However, after an aeon, the exacerbated God grew weary after performing miracle after miracle... So, she simply began to only observe the people she had taken care of for so long. Quickly, God noticed our world was full of so much greed and bloodlust, unworthy of her benevolence. 
Evaz’Sa decided to abandon the wretched world and recover her lost strength by merely observing while she rested. However, she knew if she let the unbridled chaos continue, the world known as Caelutera would surely destroy itself. So, she decided to leave traces of her divinity behind. God sacrificed part of her own dwindling strength to create entities of punishment, so they could take over her task and monitor the world’s inhabitants. Now, Evaz’Sa would be able to repose. 
The Watchers, a looming name dubbed thus by the people, were the new overseers of Caelutera. They ensured that the people would stay faithful to God until she decided to return. The people were terrified of The Watchers, and dared not even speak their name. They dared not sin and anger their new masters for they were retribution incarnate. 
Even the revered and feared Watchers couldn’t endure the vicissitudes of time, and their lore fell victim to its silence. Thus, another lost chapter had been written. Who is to say why The Watchers were forgotten. Maybe because people simply didn’t talk about them, the tale just faded out of memory. Or, did people force themselves to forget so they could live without fear? No one truly knows, but whatever the reason, people continued their lives, staying faithful to their loving God and shunning the very thought of The Watchers.

Now... What will you do with this knowledge? 
Will you upstart against them, against their Dogma? 
Who are you to decide your fate?!
We are children of God; without our mother we are lost forevermore!
Indeed, but an abandoned child must know when to move on...















(Thoughts: perhaps make this a scene from Evas'za's point of view.)
	I. Fall of the Dark Angel

He stared up at the misty, wintry sky as the biting cold currents whisked him down the stone-lined river. Tears ran from his eyes, instantly frozen and washed away by the water's scorn. Still alive, though barely, he tried to grab a hold of anything he could to save his precious life. A jagged rock smiled to him, and the boy reached out hopelessly. A quick slice and a plume of crimson, although blood cascaded, he held steadfast, unswayed by the sharp pain. The unbearable agony was stanched, not by the numbing, cold teeth of the water, but it was that the suffering on the inside was beyond comparison. 

Though his grip desperately strong, his flesh gave way and the hand was cut clean in half. He let out a terrible, pitiful scream and now engulfed in a pool of red, the boy continued his journey down the relentless river. Like some sort of toy, he was thrashed about on the jagged rocks, one after another. One thing that was preventing the cold embrace of death was the rage that burned within him, scorching his heart black.

Off the icy cliff then a drop into midair, the young one fancied himself some sort of soaring angel as he fell, though nothing so divine. Unable to breathe, falling whilst crestfallen, he stared up at the sky with a deep hate in his hazel-red eyes; a silent curse to God who cast this malicious fate up on him. As if an instant retribution, he felt a lashing chill as he crashed into the icy sea, enveloped in agony by the waves. Now he drifted in a quicker current in the open ocean. The waves carried him steadfast away from the glacial shore as he desperately tried to keep his head afloat. 

Minutes went by as if hours, and hours went by as if days. All the while, he struggled for a breath of life. After an eternity in the ocean’s cold, bitter bosom, he felt a warm embrace. A gentle song hummed in his ears, his body went limp with exhaust, he felt peaceful in these arms. The song was the most beautiful melody he ever heard, he opened his eyes and saw a blurry figure. He saw a beautiful woman with long, flowing, coral colored hair. His face was pressed against her naked breast as she cradled him, carrying him safely across the cool ocean surface.
	
	He awoke later, finally feeling the warm sand on his feet and remaining hand. He crawled onto the sun baked beach with his last strength until the waves could only kiss his toes, while his wounded right hand picked up bloody sand. He forced himself to turn over his body to face the warm sun. Even with the light in his eyes, he still stared skyward lifelessly. Dead on the outside, dead on the inside, yet he was still alive. As a figure clad in shimmering armor drew closer in the distance, the boy's mind collapsed and the bright cerulean sky faded into darkness.
		II. Clouded Light

	The priestess found herself standing alone at the edge of a barren cliff overlooking the crimson ocean's glow. She was taken aback in horror to see the once blessed blue sky burnt to a dark red and black cloudscape. Lightning flashed, thunder roared, and the sky could only weep seas of scarlet. An apparition of a daemon engulfed the sky before her, the sheer size of its shadow swallowed the horizon. The behemoth in the distance stirred the winds with eight mighty wings as it shred the ground asunder with a thousand claws. It stood within a sea engulfed in fire surrounded by pillars of flames taller than towers, raking the world's sunless heavens. The creature had no eyes, but as it was turned to her, she yet felt the crushing weight of its gaze falling heavily on. The priestess could only fall to her knees and weep in an endless sorrow as she helplessly witnessed the destruction of Caelutera.

	Gasping for air, she snapped out of her trance, her deep blue eyes wide with terror as if she awoke to being doused in a bucket of ice water. Diame sat cross-legged on a soft pillow in the small, candle lit room. She slumped forward, her fiery red hair spilt in a cascade of curls down her soft, cream colored face. A deep voice called urgently to her, "Diame! Diame!" and faded as if heard underwater. The voice called again, she recognized it as her friend and consult Eljuk. She looked up through her lavish locks at the tall, tan man sitting beside her, blurry in the dim light.
	Eljuk placed his rough hewn hands on her shoulders and tried to meet with her face, “Diame? Are you alright?” he had never seen the priestess in such a state after a soothsaying before, "You awoke with such a start, what is the matter?" he asked in a hush.
	Diame gave a shaken nod as she pushed her hair aside while Eljuk helped her sit upright. “A-aye... That horrific sweven... seen it thrice now, I have.” the sweat on her forehead glistened in the glimmer of candles’ light, “What was there..." her mouth gaped, taking a moment to find the words for what she saw. How do I even begin? "I wist not what it forebodes...” 
Eljuk leaned back and gestured questioningly. “Be it not in the norm of a sweven? You act as through you've seen a nightmare in its stead.”
Diame breathed deeply of the sweet myrrh incense before she stood silently. She leaned over her table laid with a blue cloth woven with golden seven pointed stars. Candles and different colored stones were placed in patterns around a white marble statue of a seven pointed star with an eye graven into the center. The burning bundle of purple incense released long swirling strands of sweet smoke throughout her meditation chamber. She closed her eyes for a moment and uttered a small prayer. Nothing so frightening pervaded her visions in the past, she could only shake her head. Slowly moving a hand, she furled her white robes letting a gentle gust of air extinguish the many candles lit around the room. She looked back at Eljuk though the smoke clearing in the moonlight cast down from a window above, “I pray, and I am faithful to God, yet... this has me afeared out of my wits.” she said in a near whisper, followed by sharp silence. 
	The chamber was full of night's gloom and thick with candle smoke, turning the sweet incense bitter. Eljuk could see naught but the glints of Diame's distraught eyes darting in the dark. Eljuk knew well of the woman's craft to perceive the future, but the acolyte had never seen the High Preistess overwhelmed by her own power so.
"I swear, ne’er have I envisioned anything of the like.” She pushed the white silk curtains aside and stepped out of her meditation chamber. Eljuk followed. Diame sat slumped over in a chair at her dining table. Her head rested in her hands parting her hair whilst her eyes idly followed the knots and twists in the wood under lantern light.
	“Diame...” Eljuk said as he approached her, and knelt to her side, “Mayhap... dwell on this soothsaying within the safety of the temple? Inside those hallowed walls you would be better enlightened to what you have seen.”
	“Aye...” She blinked once, eyes fixated on the oil lantern's flame burning in long flickers through the glass panels, making unsettling shadows across her walls. “Once I rest mine eyes, I will rethink of this in the days to come.” The priestess leaned back in her seat, “These inner sights weary my mind...” the fatigue on her face spoke more convincing than her words.
	Eljuk nodded, as if subtly given a command, “Aye, sleep well.” he stood near her door and watched her stare into the light of the lantern. Eljuk is an able-bodied man, only a few years elder to Diame and was born and raised in Teva, never leaving the town once in his life. A devout acolyte to the Water Temple with a strong sense of Faith, his duty keeps him where he is needed most, protecting the kin of his home. He as a part of the town's guard became close friends with Diame, the sole spiritual leader of this tiny village. Together they're seen as the community's pillars of strength, Eljuk the strong armed protector and Diame who could commune with the divine. He had never seen her falter, never seen her miracle-works cause herself distress. I should just leave her be. He made his way to the front door and creaked it open. The home inhaled the cold late-night air, breathing out the stuffy lingering smoke. He knew not the toll conducting magick took on the priestess, but he knew she needed her rest. Her visions usually just predict the coming weeks' weather and the village folk plant our crops accordingly. Whatever perturbs her dreams so, it must be beyond that. May eyes watch over her. I know not what soul stirring sights she must endure. I do not wish to know.
	She shook her head, "Should I send another letter?" Although, the good Bishop has not sent a reply to either of them. "However, if His Grace does not respond, wouldn't it be for naught to write yet another? Perhaps..." Diame's eyes widened as she asked herself something almost too drastic, "To ensure he heard of what I have seen, must I sojourn to Ijia and meet with Bishop Malbourne myself?"
	He turned from the door and Eljuk's brown eyes gave her a harsh, questioning stare, though he tried to hide it in his voice. "Are you sure that would be necessary, Diame? What will Lux Grande be forced to do once they hear you left the protection of the Water Temple without their knowledge or consent?" She raised her dark blue eyes leveling to his, and he did not stop, "You know full well that you are not allowed to travel unless provided an escort from Lux Grande. Our responsibilities in Teva need us here, as His Grace has what he must attend to in Ijia." He caught himself, Diame's eyes were like a deep well of thoughts, widened only slightly and completely focused on him. He had said something that upset her, by that look. She couldn't have been serious about leaving Teva, just upset by whatever startled her. Nary a need to remind her what she already knows, but what an uproar it would be if she did suddenly leave. She knows how important maintaining the Water Temple and the village's peace is and should not jest such things. "Forgive me, my only concern is your well being. Patience will see this out, not hasty decisions. Surely, tomorrow a pigeon shall come with a reply from His Grace. How many letters did you say you sent again?"
	She swept her eyes back to the lantern's glow, "Two." She sat back in her seat, straightening her long hair and white robes, "I have sent two, one a week ago when I first had this nightmare. Then another letter, when I saw the same vision again a few days past, on Marsday." She turned back to the standoffish stare of Eljuk, "You know that the church has never taken more than a couple of suns to send a reply, much less a whole week. What if something happened to His Grace? Or the Kingdom of Ijia itself? Or even Lux Grande?" She saw his stare gaining more concern, she cut herself off and sighed. I guess there could be a hundred reasons why Bishop Malbourne has not responded. Traveling there before His Grace could have a chance to reply would be insolent and not a show of Faith. "Perhaps I shall write another letter after all." She saw the relief melt into Eljuk's face.
	"For certainly, that would be for the best, and an even better show of Faith. No need to stir up trouble, the Bishop of Ijia is sure to reply soon. Of course His Grace is interested in what you have seen, why wouldn't he be?" Eljuk tugged his coat over his shoulders, uncomfortable that he had to talk her out of breaking a taboo. 'A High Priest may not leave the village housing their temple, except on special sabbaths and even then, always with permission.' 
	Diame sat trying to gauge Eljuk with pensive thought weighing on the dark-red brows of her own fair, cream colored face. I didn't mean to insinuate leaving Teva would be a question of my Faith. Alas, he is right. Bishop Malbourne must be interested in what I have to say, His Grace just hasn't been able to reply yet. He wouldn't shirk his responsibilities, I must not either. Yet, I do wish he would send a simple reply. Diame rose from her seat and took a step towards her confidant. He straightened as she approached Eljuk with a smile, “Thank you, dear friend. I won't let what I have seen gain the better of my judgment."
	"All will be well in the morrow." He nodded assuringly, returning the smile. “With The Holy Day in the morrow, I can only advise you to commune with God on these matters. Make time to contemplate these strong swevens in your new cloister, and through Faith, the answers will come. In the meanwhile, I will pray your visions forebode nothing ill. Rest well, Your Grace.” He gave a final nod as he turned and quietly shut the door behind him.
	Diame heard his footsteps trail off into the late night, and the air draft chilled her under her silk robe. She gazed around her humble home standing in the dwindling luminescence of the oil lantern. Her few robes hung in a wooden wardrobe with her staff made of carved driftwood laying against the clay and mudbrick wall beside it. She didn't own much else besides the few magick stones and trinkets in her meditation chamber. The marble Eye of Evaz'sa statue that was given to her by the church glimmered through her chamber's threshold for her prayers at home. Closest to her bedside, a copy of the holy book, The Divine Manifest rest on her nightstand. It bore a blue metallic crest of a seven pointed star with the eye at the center, the symbol of the Faith. She paced barefoot on the cold stone floor around her home, sighing with shaking hands holding her fair face. What am I to do? Her mind wracked by the memory of the vision replayed over and over. All of the world would be consumed... Caelutera in flames wrought by that frightful daemon. It means something dreadful is going to occur, but what? How? How can I prevent such a disaster if I can not even get a word of it to the church! Her hands could only hold so many tears, and she wiped them off on her robe. She sighed and calmed herself. It is late... I cannot hope to understand what the vision meant in this state. “I need rest.” She at last convinced herself. The warm bed beckoned, and she stepped her numb toes across the small house to it. She pulled back the blankets overstuffed with soft down feathers and sat in the silk sheets. She took a slow breath, “It forebodes nothing ill...” she whispered wistfully as she made cozy under the down covers. At last the warmth from her bed soothed her, and her weary eyes grew heavy. She could see the light from the table lantern with her eyes closed, and she let out a sigh. The breath traveled from her lips in a thin stream to the small table, and the flame in the lantern danced until it died. The room's faint light faded dark, save the azure moonlight that swathed the priestess from above. Her final thoughts escaped her as she drifted into repose. “I hope so too, Eljuk.” 

Resting on the southern tip of the Western continent is the small village of Teva. Nestled in the steep, rolling green hills of the Valleys of Mist with less than a hundred residents lives a very tight knit, devout farming community. It has existed for many generations blessed by the Water Temple and protected within the provinces of the Kingdom of Ijia. The houses were all made of grey-blue stone, clay, and mudbrick topped with dried clay panels all lined up along the river flowing ever fast from the Water Temple's well.
Diame Serigh is the young keeper of the temple and a woman of the Faith, her life devoted to the Goddess of the Sun. She became an honorary High Priestess and a revered village guardian at the young age of twenty-four due to her ability of possessing extraordinary visionary powers. Premonitions of greater clarity have only been begotten by none other but the Faith's leader, the Pontiff herself. However, nothing so horrifying has ever been seen in visions by anyone in Lux Grande or any of the other High Priesthood, as far as Diame knew.
The same vision that disturbed her sleep before yet again occurred that night. She had a lucid dream where she awoke on the jaggy cliffside and tried to run from the burning ocean. She ran down rough mountainsides, through dead forests and across abandoned towns' bridges over dried rivers. She breathlessly ran, and ran, well the past point of her legs giving way. Even then she could not outrun the wrath of the daemon tearing ground apart beneath her feet. She cast a glimpse up, all she could see enveloping the sky were clouds painted black with fire. 
Sitting upright in her bed, she nearly shouted as she awoke, panting with a start. With an effort, she calmed herself taking a long breath. Dreams containing swevens, or swevens containing nightmares?! Color me not surprised it is still the same damnable sight! I wish I could close mine eyes and see nothing at all! It was the wee morn's hour, and still dark as night. She had not rested well, her head ached with sore eyes, and with so much on her mind that returning to sleep wouldn't be worth the effort. She regretfully slipped her legs out of her warm bed and sat over it, pondering in the chills of early morning air. Always next to her sitting atop her bedside table was the thick copy of the Divine Manifest, pages ruffled from years of reading, and rereading, and quoting the needed psalm. She sighed, remembering growing up in Lux Grande, spending years studying the holy book's knowledge. She traced her finger across the shining blue metal crest of the Eye of Evaz'sa on the leather bound cover. 'Look into God's Eye to find the wisdom you seek.' But, what can be said to what I have seen? She thought of her duties to her church, how she lives here praying, staying true to her Faith every morning for eight years. "Mayhap, sending Bishop Malbourne another letter anyway would be pertinent." She opened her bedside drawer beneath the thick book, and pulled out a small sheet of parchment, an ink bottle and green feathered quill. Taking these over to her small table in the dining room, she lit her oil lantern, sat comfortably, took a breath and began to write.

Thick silver clouds hung overhead in the dark of night, very faintly chased with the glow of an unrisen sun. Billowing walls of rolling fog swept across the steep hills of the Valleys of Mist. In the still of the darkness, the farm folk already went about their business, completely absorbed in beginning their daily labor of field work. There was only the very faint blue light of predawn, but the gray of the sky grew brighter expectantly. Just beyond the edges of the village, farmers prepared their harvest tools within the cold mists of their crop fields stretched over hills far and wide. The men and women of Teva tend to many scattered short fields of potatoes, beets and mudberries or their big fields thick with tall stocks of wheat, corn and other greens. All these fertile farmlands spread out across the lush valleys producing fresh food stock for Teva as well as many villages outside of the Valleys of Mist. An incredible devotion to nurturing the land and reaping the bounties provided by God is instilled inside each proud, hardworking denizen of Teva.
Enjoying the air's chill within the faint glow of day approaching, Eljuk stood by his usual spot by the wooden fence that lead out from the village into the fields. The sun would be rising soon, and his wise brown eyes stared to fog shrouded east. He wore a dark blue tunic vest over a white shirt, and baggy brown cloth breeches, as did many of the acolytes. He had just finished helping the farmers carry water pails and bags of grain to the fields to aid the start of their work. Soon, he would go to the parade grounds to tend to the usual duties of Mersday, the temple's holy day. He leant the sword scabbard on his back against the tall column that held a wooden arch over the open wooden gates. It was carved simply saying "Teva" with light blue and pale green paint that had mostly worn off. There was a short wooden fence that branched out in either direction from arch, not meant for protection from more than a stray deer wondering into the village. Eljuk always stood here, guarding the always open gates and greeting all that passed through. At this spot he met and knew everyone who passed, it let the townsfolk know they were protected and visitors were reminded to behave. The fields are well tended to, and any fighting in Ijia won't threaten this far south. He was the most skilled out of a small few in the village with a blade and he was certain that no harm could befall unto Teva. What could Lady Diame possibly have seen? 
Down the cobblestone path from the homes to the fields creaked a wheelbarrow pushed by a farm woman in a large straw hat. By her sides were a boy and a girl just old enough to work in the fields. The boy wore a cloth shirt and baggy breeches and carried farm tools, the girls wore a cloth blouse and skirts. All their once-white work clothes looked as though they had already seen their time collecting dirt out on the fields. 
Eljuk easily recognized Tilanda through the morning mist and under the large straw hat that would later be for the sun. He knew her especially well as he often helped her and her two children, Edjar and Bethane with their work. "Good morrow to you, Tila." Eljuk said merrily. "Eyes watch over you."
Tilanda beamed a smile up from beneath her hat, "A good morrow to you Eljuk. May eyes watch over you as well." She looked down past her parted black hair at her children, "Look cheery and give a good morrow to Sir Eljuk now." she said with a pip in her voice.
Both her kids stared up at Eljuk with faces clear they would rather be sleeping in bed. "Good morrow." The twin dark haired children managed to wearily stammer out, blankly staring up at him.
	Tilanda continued to push the barrow onward without missing a beat, "Well, must get these seeds and tools out to the fields in time to return for Lady Diame's benediction. God willing the summer harvest will be as bountiful as was our spring!" And with that, the family of three continued past the the gates, the cobblestones just outside became a well trod earthy path that began everyone's day.
As they passed him, Eljuk looked through the fog of the village to one of the gray-blue clay houses closest to the river. Diame hadn't roused yet, but soon, her worries would be soothed over in prayer. She'll find her answers by Evaz'sa's grace. As ever as She carries the sun. Dawn would come soon, so down the stone path leading to the Water Temple he went. The large shadow in the mist was a strange structure made of white marble that had existed for nearly a hundred years. A series of four cubes stacked on top one another, each one smaller than the other, shaped like an odd pyramid. Each one of the individual squares' four walls were open and pooled with clear, flowing water. Starting at the highest cube, a waterfall cascades off, filling the next square below it, continuing for all four cubes like a fountain. At the top is a circular well made of clear stone and provides endless water. The Hallowed Spring has always overflowed with fresh spring water and gives the temple its namesake. The water that pools beneath the temple is a lake that flows in a wide river lined with watermills that continues downstream, branching westward down the southern coast.
	Bordering a side of the lake within the town is the parade grounds, a paved circular pavilion with seven blueish-gray stone pillars. An open space was between two of the pillars for one to walk between and down steps into the water. Each column was adorned with a wreath of springtime flowers strung together overhead in garland with ties of differently dyed pieces of cloth. This is where the townsfolk always gathered on Mersday to give homage to Water, one of the seven blessings of Evaz'sa. 
	The cobblestone path became the flat, sand colored stone paving the pavilion and Eljuk stood beneath the canopy of color overhead. No one had gathered yet today, all were still waking up and preparing early morning tasks. Soon though, many would eagerly arrive to hear what the Goddess had to say, through the voice of Diame. Letting out a proud sigh, he went to the steps leading into water and stood by the lakeside. Leading down the stone steps is a bridge beneath the surface of the water a leg deep. Diame would wade across an underwater walkway and through one of the the thin glass-like waterfalls veiling the temple. Then, the threshold to gain entrance to the antechamber, the tabernacle where only the High Priestess of Water may enter. There, Diame communes with Evaz'sa, and foretells the future weather.
	Following a short path just outside the parade grounds was a large, clay longhouse that most of the temple acolytes from Lux Grande live in. Otherwise, it was the place of official business for the church's representatives. Had a pigeon arrived today? That would raise Diame's spirits. Eljuk passed down the stone paths towards the second largest building in Teva.
	
	Sitting at her table, she tapped the green plumed quill with her delicate fingers while she finished overlooking her letter. The third one, but will it go ignored like the other two? Diame poured over the specifics of every word as she reread over it, making sure the urgency was clearer this time. She hoped that it conveyed the importance of her vision without using words that would send any sensitive details. Who knows what could have happened to her other two letters, if they were intercepted she dared not write even more detail than before. But, how could she get the church to understand her plea if she could not write the full disturbing details of her vision? What she needed was an audience with the Bishop, a face to face talk in person, and no correspondence at all was making that impossible. All the more unusual for the church. '... The matter at hand has an urgency that can not be fully explained in a letter. It is imperative that I speak to Your Grace at once.' She nodded, satisfied, and with a dip of ink, signed. Diame Serigh was made out in big curves, and she laid the paper out to dry.
	Sitting back in her wooden chair, she realized she no longer needed her lantern light. Dawn was fast approaching, and even the heavily overcast sky swathed pale blue light into her home. "A new sun brings another Mersday, and the Water Temple holds yet another sweven." The thought nearly overwhelmed her, receiving yet another vision to decipher when she was still puzzled by this one. 
	She had a normal sweven about the weather on last week's Mersday, she saw little Bethane with a basket full of beets standing in the rain, among other familiar faces holding varying vegetations. That day she began her three day cloister, and she meditated on the weather sweven further, and nothing unusual happened. It wasn't until that night when she slept she first saw the daemon in her dreams. Unable to leave her home for three days, she wracked on its meaning until the vision presented itself again the last night of her cloister. Though she had seen the violent visions within her home, she had not been within the antechamber of the temple since they started. She had received a sweven every week from there the last eight years and meditated on it in her home for three days, and now was time again like any other. 
	She stared at the letter she wrote out once more, and shut it out of her mind. "His Grace will choose to reply whenever he may even if I send him a hundred letters. I still have my duties to attend to." Diame stood and went to her wardrobe and picked out her ceremonial robe, a silken white gown, hewn with weaves of golden flowers down the sleeves and skirts. Another spring harvest season had come, and her people needed the Water Temple's guidance. What if the following weeks foretold the rain would continue? Too little sunlight and too much water, they'd wish they had planted more wet crops like mudberries. The farmers always planned ahead which seeds to sow and what was ripe to reap meticulously week by week. Every harvest season's success has been carefully tended to year after year by the dedicated denizens of Teva. Work never stops except on the few special sabbath days, staying true to their religion of working the land, guided by Diame's predictions of the weather. To send the church so many vague letters about unusual visions, I hope His Grace does not think I mean to talk about how sunny it will be. She donned the white and gold dress, put a gilded circlet in her curled copper-red hair, and adorned her feet with her fancy shoes. 
	The front door creaked and stepping out of her small home, Diame walked down the cobblestone pathway towards the picket fence of her front yard. She was welcomed by her small garden growing patches of her favorite sweet scented lilacs and potted plants that gave off earthy smells of medicinal herbs. To the east, a glimmer of the sun had only just begun to rise, yet both the gray clouds above and white fog below glowed brightly with heavenly effulgence. Exiting under her wood archway overgrown with ivy, she went down the village path, clay and brick houses with windows reflecting dawn lined side by side along the riverbank. With most of the farmer folk already up, the only people who still stirred in their homes this early were elders of Teva who had already worked the fields a generation or so ago. Everyone else out were people of other professions that found home in Teva; artists, bards, clothes and shoemakers. All kind hearted people she has earned the trust of throughout the years. They who caught sight of Diame in her ceremonial gown greeted her with waves and gestures as she strolled through the brightening morning mist. She could hear the different families murmur affectionately amongst themselves.
	She came up on the stone columns of the parade grounds, any other day of the week it was a nice place to watch the local songstresses and other talent perform. Today, the town would gather here to worship Evaz'sa with Diame to guide them. Already a few of the acolytes were there, walking backwards in a circle, sweeping lacquered twig brooms left and right across the parade grounds. It cleared the dust and was said to cleanse the aether in the air, an old tradition to welcome the temple's High Priest. Eljuk was not there among the other acolytes, but he usually would be tending to scribe duties within the longhouse. The men and woman in the white tunics with dark blue vests all took a moment to bow and parted so Diame could pass through. She stood before the lake housing the four storied Water Temple, veiled in sixteen rushing waterfalls and an even denser cloud of mist surrounding the roaring basins. The moat before her was moving water that trenched into Teva's river, but the shallow walkway beneath was safe enough. She stepped through the gap between the columns and taking her decorated shoes off, dipped her feet the first step in. 
	The water still had night's chill, but she was very used to it and descended waist deep into the flowing frigid water. Diame could barely feel the brick path with her near numb toes as she waded across the moat of clear water. The waterfall reflected a transparent image of herself in the glassy wall above a basin of hazy mist. She watched her fair hand reach towards herself and was doused head down with cool spring water as she stepped through. Ascending a few underwater stairs, she walked knee deep through a narrow stone hallway.
	Up ahead in the temple's antechamber was another veil of blue, clear water. Behind it a half submerged crystal statue of a tall woman standing with a stern yet kind face. She was draped in a single cloth, revealing one breast; the sacred image of Evaz'sa. The tabernacle always filled the antechamber with a pale blue light, and Diame stepped through the glowing glass-like wall. She entered the square room of white marble with water steadily flowing up each wall and walked towards the idol. The bust was of the revered Goddess, holding her hands up and out in a blessing to the temple. Water poured from the statue's hands and eyes in small, clear waterfalls that were near blue from purity. She humbly knelt before the marble statue, submerging her stomach in the holy waters that were neither warm nor cold. 
	Her eyes closed and she held up her clasped hands, "Merciful Evas'za, I prostrate before thy hallowed name. Our holy protector, the righteous sword and benevolent shield, the children of Teva offer their gratitude. Show us thy kindness as we humble before thee. Protect us and chastise those who would do us harm." Diame fell silent and cleared her thoughts as she rocked back and forth. Staring into the glowing, blue water recalled images of her dream in detail. An ocean of fire. All the world consumed in darkness. She shook her head and continued her sacred communion, “My Lady, I must ask you for guidance. I offer my thanks for the visions you have gifted me, though what I have seen in these swevens house naught but a terrifying Daemon. It wreaks destruction and discord, set the sea aflame and your heavens burnt black.” She shuttered, she knew she spoke ineffable sights only seen by her, “I wish only to understand, God. I humbly ask that you enlighten me. Pray, with your infinite wisdom and mercy, show me a sign.” She fell silent and listened conscientiously for any inkling of what could be a response. In her prayer she breathed deeply of the damp air, calming her mind with a silent meditative mantra. Only the calming watery sounds of babbling streams resonated throughout the temple walls.
	She concentrated on the sound of the water flowing up around her, she heard it echo within the small room. It started to amplify louder, she could see herself within the room, looking down at herself from above. The room in her mind expanded and flattened out like an image on canvas, in the center was the pale glow of the of Evaz'sa idol. It grew brighter until it was a solid statue of blue light, then the marble walls around her stretched on and on until all melted into water.
	Diame felt herself lifted up, she opened her eyes and found herself outside overlooking Teva from atop the highest point of the Water Temple, the very tip of the waterfall pyramid. Her body was slightly transparent, looking out at her hands and arms, they could be seen through partially like a thick cloud of mist. She stepped out and stood on top of the flowing clear edge, looking down at the village beneath the waterfall cascades. Once she began her meditation she always found herself here and knew she had entered a sweven. 
	Above, an indigo sky housed the golden sun, hurling across the sky with an orange comet-like tail. A day was passing by before her eyes, the sun was high noon above her and it would set in a matter of moments. Clouds thatched apart and weaved back together continuously as they rolled with the wind. In the west, scattered islands in the sky each colored bold hues of orange, scarlet and purple, churning a storm. The east darkened and dotted with a blanket of constellations while the moon began to rise. 
	She stepped off the edge of the waterfall, and slid down the water on her heels. Down each level of the temple she went skiing slopes of water, and then skated across the lake. She stopped just before the stone steps entering the parade grounds. There was a bright glow, and she could see all of Teva's inhabitants out, but it was very quiet. Her silken face  carefully took in the scene around the pavilion, knowing her visions always contained cryptic meanings within literal messages. The crowd surrounded her, all perfectly still, holding a different pose or action in the circumference of the tall seven outer pillars. The sun had set and the moon had risen and was a size much bigger than in reality. The giant white saucer flew across the starry night sky with a transparent comet tail of what looked like snow. Beneath the cloudless sky was a lavishly decorated pavilion, brightly lit up with torch stands. Each person looked happy as if each had a reason to celebrate, most were dancing and some had bare feet hovering off the ground. The songstress Alura sat on a bench with her harp out, blonde hair furling down silken green holiday clothes. Her mouth was gaped like a frozen statue singing a jaunty lyric from a silent song the still people danced to. Most of the townsfolk held tankards full of mulled mudberry wine or plates full of food, nearby were carts full of all kinds of meals made from what was reaped from the fields. Beet and cabbage stew was the traditional meal in Teva, and a big cauldron was behind a cart lined with bowls. The sweet and tart scent of mudberries wafted in the air, a nearby stand held ten dozen or so freshly baked pies. The good farmwife Tilanda was in a velvet red bodice with a high cut golden skirt leant over the cart counter handing out heaping slices of pie to throngs of children and adults alike. Little Bethane was near her in a green holiday dress with a plate and face covered in purple-red pie alike.
	Diame walked through the gaps in the crowd around among her people examining the look on every familiar face. For what else I have seen, this image must forebode something good to come. Lots of coming rain, can only grow mudberries in mud, as they say. I don't foresee any excessive flooding, the Water Temple must be in balance. This looks like the summer harvest will be a well deserved time of celebration and repose. There was a small circle of children playing under the watchful eye of Mariden, an elderly nun she knew from Lux Grande dressed in a dark blue habit with silver hair tied back under her hood. The children were dancing with wide grins on their face, some had their feet a small space off the ground. All had hands about, dancing and played merrily. Little Sindha had scarlet hair with redness reminding Diame of her own. She wore a bright yellow dress and danced with young dark haired Edjar, a cute young lad in a light blue buttoned up shirt, men in Teva's formal holiday attire. Seeing there was a thin red string tied from the two's left second smallest fingers, Diame blushed. Oh my, they're so young, but I believe those two kids will grow up to become married one day. She turned and scanned all the smiling faces she cared for, and she would be able to tell them good things to lift their spirits. There were so few days in the year they would be truly able to sing and celebrate, and it all depends on if the weather would be fair. She would be glad to tell them she saw bards leading all the farmfolk in merrymaking. But then she thought of her other vision, though she didn't quite want to. This is all a good sign, but if what else I have seen in the other sweven comes to pass... before she imaged what could happen to everyone she cared for around her, she shut the image out of her mind. Nay, do not even entertain a thought about such a thing! What I saw outside of the temple doesn't stop the fact that this day of celebration will come. Why, even those babes have a life together promised, a sure tie of fate if I ever saw one. These are good signs that Teva's prosperity will indeed continue, I shall thank the Goddess for showing me such. The giant saucer of the moon waned as it flew across the sky, turning to a crescent, then faded to nothing but a glimmering trail of snow. Suddenly all the stars in the sky began to fade dot by dot, and the world was covered black. Just then she thought the glow from the torch stands brightened around her, and all the still people reflected a red light beaming from above. Diame turned around, clasped her hands around her mouth with a sharp gasp when she saw the enormous daemon looming above her in a fiery sky. God, nay! Pray, tell me this can not be so! 
	A stream of fire spewed forth from the daemon's mouth, small as a speck at first, then the bright glow built in the sky in a long stream. A blade of flame grew and fire billowed within the clouds above Teva with enough fire to burn away all the sky above the Valleys of Mist. 
	Eyes of Evaz'sa, watch over me! Diame looked among the villagers scattered about the parade grounds, all still frozen completely still with faces of jollity. God, do not let this befall Teva! I beg of you!
	Everything was nearly too bright to see from the redness of the light from the flame. Diame felt the sweltering heat sear her skin, and it was all she could do to run. She ducked under the arms forever raised in cheers with tankards overspilling wine splashes frozen in the air. Quickly through the small spaces between dancing villagers in holiday clothes hovering with their toes off the ground, and to the lake behind the two pillars. The Water Temple was still there, waterfalls still moving as if time never ceased its flow. She ran towards the lake's surface, but before she could reach it the waters lunged towards her. She felt the intense flames on her back from the fiery breath nearly almost consume her whole, then she was engulfed in a flood of cool water. She stood at the edge of the crowd that remained undisturbed, even while the water rose higher and higher. She was engulfed in a sea that continued to build until land was as though it were at the bottom of an ocean floor, the sky as the surface. What in the world is going on? What could possibly be foretold of this?
	Sky alit above was glowing and shedding its shifting down through the water in long beams. Diame stood completely underwater, all the villagers still as statues. All faded to blue, and then to darkness.
She could see far over the sea, past the vast horizon and felt the movement of all the world's water caressing her. Diame felt the ocean stir around her like she was swimming through a giant wave set sail across the sea. Sights of continents and kingdoms passed by her within the vision of her mystic eyes. The cold water was taking her farther than she had ever seen before, far beyond the Ijian seas. She soared just on the tips of her toes and bounded large waves skating hills of water. Pulled in a dance leaving an aetherial wake across the deep blue seas of Caelutera, Diame felt herself wrapped in an euphoric trance, carried by the ocean. Led by the light of the sun towards an icy peninsula there was a hovering shadow that obstructed the light. Brightness flashed and all vision turned to white, then she found her feet on land unable to be carried further. Slowly fading into her vision and disappearing into the sky was a gigantic, dilapidated tower. 
	Diame stood barefoot in a field of snow staring up in the shade cast by the tower that stretched endlessly into pure white sky. Only clad in the thin ceremonial robes, she huddled for warmth, shivering in the sudden unbearable cold. The pale landscape stretched on to a bleak white field of ice surrounding the tower's cast darkness. Sight in the distance faded into a flurry of falling snow, a land without any trees, sky or life. She fell to her knees, agonizingly succumbing to icy winds that chilled her bones. She then stammered to herself, “This place... could only be...” in disbelief, she reached out and picked up a handful of snow, it remained solid, not even her hand could melt it, “The Northern continent? Why... how...? Do mine eyes see a sweven or...” her air began to escape her, “Do I see as true as this cold bites?!” All her movement ceased with a sudden stop as she felt something on the back of her neck, the unkind warmth of someone's breath whispering. “Fah... Mess...” the wind spoke to her in a whispered cadence, the only sound carried by the wind. Then, the silent arctic air became too much for her. Overcome, she curled on the ground, her breath and body frozen still. Her skin turned a pale blue and the life left her frozen form. 
	Diame’s eyes sprang open as she gasped for air and found herself in the square room with four walls of water flowing up. She was in the safety of the shrine, yet she shook, shivering from the fear and cold. She breathed heavily, trying to catch it as if nearly drowned, but soon realized she was alright back within reality. The waters around her were neither warm nor cold, and she was safe in Teva village as if it were all a vision given as usual. She had never experienced something like that before, beyond compare even to the ominous daemon that haunts her visions so. “That wintry landscape...” she muttered in short breaths, “that was Desye, the Northlands, I’m sure of it.” She arose from the water, inspecting herself in disbelief as it trickled down her. She wasn't a frozen corpse, laid to rest in the snow. She remembered why she was here and straightened herself out. Calmly, she held herself and bowed graciously to the crystal statue. “Thank you, my Lady.” She stood there, processing what she had just seen. The ambience of the water flowed with her thoughts, the priestess' pondering mind was awash with many thoughts. 
	Diame put up her hands in prayer, “Blessed be the Hallowed Spring that overfloweth. May your eyes watch down on all the children of Teva.” The priestess moved back her wet red hair from her face to look more proper. Clearing her throat, she turned to the waterfall veil flowing up with sunlight pouring in behind it. 

	Walking out of the temple through the glass-like water and into the brightness of the cloudy day, it was apparent the sun had risen over the valley. The villagers were talking amongst themselves, gathered just across the water in the parade grounds. When they caught sight of Diame, they fell to a silence with hushed murmurs. She crossed the underwater bridge and stepped up the staircase to stand between the stone columns. Discreetly, she slid her shoes back on that were there hiding behind the column. 
	Diame was soaked from the sacred waters, and she did what she normally did to begin her prayers. She looked up at the sun rise, a mere bright splotch within the fog surrounding the village. She could feel the warm rays trying to push back the overcast, and Diame raised her arms and envisioned the sun within her mind. She called for the light hiding behind the clouds, felt all the light around her. She willed it to become brighter, warmer. She could feel a sense of safety, like a calming presence was there beside her. 
	A ray of sunlight shone in an aura around the High Priestess of Water, she was enveloped in a gentle gust of warm wind which dried her and her garments off. The light continued to grow, and a warming circle enveloped the parade grounds, soothing all within. The villagers of Teva clasped their hands up and whispered prayers, then excitedly muted themselves. Every day they worked and eagerly waited for the day the Priestess would reveal her wisdom. She smiled at the crowd and enjoyed the warm glow around her that faded, but a small patch of morning blue sky remained in the silver clouds above.
	Diame stood there glowing serenely whilst basking in the column of golden light descending gently above. She took some time to regather some lost strength from casting the spell, the sweven she experienced today especially tired her. She stood at a meager height, though her status was anything but. Her hair was long, down to the middle of her back, braided and a beautiful deep golden-red. Her blue eyes shone like polished sapphires beheld in starlight, and they showed compassion, grace, and conviction. The priestess wore her gilded circlet, fancy shoes and white ceremonial robe, lined with threads of gold intricately worked into flower petals. The priestess was a mysterious young woman aged only twenty-four years. Eight years past, youth hindered the peoples' trust in the new sixteen-year-old High Priestess. Now, her uncanny talent for magick and soothsayings have her seen as a celebrated leader by Teva's many generations. Born in Lux Grande under the mystic star of Pisces, Diame always had strong psychic abilities as a young girl having premonitions and dreaming true. When it was discovered she was also adept at water magick, she was sent to the temple to become an acolyte under the old High Priest of Water. He became a powerful mentor to Diame in a short amount of time, but within a year of her coming to Teva he tragically died. With surprise to her, he passed on his title of High Priest of Water, and gave the responsibility of looking after his flock all to her. It took her several years to not only win the trust of Teva's people, but also self master her own magickal talents. The sudden taking on of all these tasks with never even having time to grieve for her lost mentor has only reinforced her belief in Faith, that everything happens for greater reasons under the guidance of God. Diame was a symbol of that Faith for these pious people, and they lived peacefully under the protection of the Water Temple. She silently looked at the villagers and smiled at them diligently. 
	Diame stood only a stride from everyone she knew, the village gathered entire. Workers had left their tools wherever they were to attend, then would return right back to work in the fields. What am I to tell them? She raised her voice and preached clearly, “Miraculous is Holy Evaz'sa, for we have indeed received her blessing. Our Lady has allowed me yet another sweven bearing great tidings...!” The audience still listened attentively, with smiling faces and mouthes gaped. Diame saw the patience on all the faces of the familiar crowd to know what she has seen. A hellish daemon consigns Teva and all of Caelutera to perish in flames and flood, meanwhile I have the bitter luxury to die alone in a field of ice... how can I say these things to my flock? I couldn't possibly panic these poor people! Her eyes shifted, they sought to meet truthfully with another to speak, and all the familiar Faithful eyes sought the truth. She cleared her throat, hoping the words would find themselves, “I saw...” she looked ahead and saw Eljuk lone behind the crowd. Her closest friend was staring at her with those knowing brown eyes. She felt like if she had to lie, it would be best if were his eyes she looked straight into. “... another bountiful harvest. The rainy seasons are to come late, but they shall be strong. Some storms and flooding, but then an early summer harvest. All the work this moon shall carry on to the next.” The crowd erupted in a whispered clamor, chatter that once carried the cadence of worry turned bated joy. “May the eyes of Evaz'sa continue to watch all of us.” She said as she moved her hand in a circle, making seven gestures with her right hand as a blessing. She met each face of her kin one by one as she went through the pavilion. The beaming smile of Tilanda in her sun hat and work dress, her two children beside her. Many families were there with their children out in their work uniforms, all of them Faithful farmers she all knew and once worked the fields with. She blessed them with a move of her hand if they requested, and many talked to her. It was tradition that assured the connection of their work to their religion, Mersday was a day to have their spirits uplifted and know their hard work would be promised rewards. More people talked to her, Alura the songstress and her husband Cimond, a master chef for the Village were glad to hear there would be more need for merrymaking.
From amid the crowd, little Sindha was running straight up to Diame, her red hair tied up in a small sunhat adorned with a small yellow flower. Her brown haired mother Jilda was closely behind her with a straw sunhat and work clothes on as well. Speaking carefully in a high pitched yet soft voice Sindha said, "Lady Diame, does God truly favor us? Are we truly safe here?" She stared straight up at the priestess with those shining green eyes. They were usually bright with innocence, but today, they had genuine concern. She looked startled, scared even. She was the only one among the crowd not smiling, and it was a child who asked such a fearful question.
Diame looked down at the child in work uniform, her pure eyes locked with her own. Thoughts of her vision pushed to the front of her mind, but it served no purpose to think of that now and she shut the images out. Why is she so afeared? She is a child instilled with good Faith like all the others, she should feel Evaz'sa's love and presence. "Of course God favors us and will protect us, dear child." She knelt down to meet with Sindha's face, and continued softly. "Now, why do you ask such a sad thing like that?" Diame gave her an assuring smile. 
"Dada has been gone for six... or maybe seven moons now." Sindha counted on her fingers, trying to remember. She looked scared, and her mother stood behind her, looking solemn yet with a slight smile.
Her father is a soldier in Ijia's Gray Guard. Poor dear, she must have heard some of the town's rumors about war. But, even worse could befall if what I have seen turns out true. Nay! Think not on that. The festival brings happy times, the day she will wed is many good years away. Diame took a deep breath and shrugged off a touch of fluster. "As long as we each remain true to our Faith, God will always grant us and those we love her light and protection." She blessed over her head with a gentle hand, "May the eyes of Evaz'sa watch you, child." The child seemed to smile, but Diame wished she could have said something with more meaning. However, all would be a lie anyway since she kept secret the truth she had seen. That was all she could think about as villagers came to her one by one as she gradually made her way back to her house. Once inside, she would enter her cloister and could not talk to anyone until three sunrises had past. Before going back to work, the town folk took this last chance to give their thanks to her before she would meditate on her swevens. Nearly down the road back to her house, she looked back at the throngs of village farmers marching out the gates back into the morning mist of the fields. One more familiar face still walked towards her in the thinning fog, Eljuk in his acolyte uniform with holstered blade on back. Diame turned and went under the ivy arch back into her lilac and herb garden, her smiling façade faded and instead a distraught stretch took place on her face. 
"A good morrow to you, Your Grace." Eljuk's deep, dutiful voice bid her.
Diame was just before the few steps leading up to the wooden door to her blue stone house, she turned back to her friend finding him standing between the ivy vines in the arch. I do wish I could ask him for advice about everything I have seen. But, that wisdom I must find myself within cloister. She took a short breath and calmed herself to retain that cool serenity she always wore. "Good morrow, brother Eljuk. How fares you this Mersday?" She even managed to let loose a small smile.
"Many things are well and in order, Your Ladyship. The farm folk are diligently working a fine spring harvest from the fields as well as tilling and sowing seeds for next season." Eljuk straightened his blue vest out as he walked down the garden's cobblestone path in the pale brightness of the mists' morning glow. "They all seem to be in good spirits, and all the farmers say we will see it through to the summer." he stopped before her, taking a moment to admire the scent of lilacs in her garden.
"Well then, truly a reward for our Faith." Diame nodded. "Evaz'sa's benevolent eyes watch over Teva and may she continue to do so." She quietly fumbled with the gold flowers in her ceremonial dress.
"How fares you, Diame? Are you in better cheer?" Eljuk had a look on his face not of concern, but of hopefulness that what disturbed her had passed. "Did you find the answers you needed?"
I am now cast adrift in a sea full of questions, and nary of its drops contain an answer. "Mhmn." Diame squeaked curtly in agreement, her blue eyes serenely stared off at her garden, a peaceful reminder of home. Her eyes shifted back to his, and they had not moved as if she had said nothing.
"Are you sure all is well? Anything else of burden on your mind?" He said in pursuit. 
"Aye! I mean, nay! Pray, all is well, the Hallowed Spring and the Water Temple are well, and oh!" She smiled, a small smile yet she regretted it was almost too assuring, "Many things are promised to come, I daresay. This sweven had so many uplifting, pleasant sights to pour over, why, I'll be fortunate enough to be cloistered up for only the three days!" A nervous laughter reminding her of a giggly doe-eyed girl came from her, and she cut it short. She could feel the heat of embarrassment as she tried to keep up the smiling farce. She noticed Eljuk had the resolve of the earth in his brown eyes, when he was dissatisfied with the answers given, the gravity of his questions always grew with building persistence. He sees I still suffer from troublesome soothsayings, even after meditating within the temple's hallowed walls. Obviously, the good acolyte would be able to see through the giddy dolt lass charade. But, how can I confide any of this sweven within him? What advise could he give me if all that I have seen is the destruction of Teva? What advice could anyone give me...?
He tilted his head as he usually did when he was concerned. "Nothing at all?"
"Mayhap I am just a might tired from seeing so many different, vivid things. I'll need a long meditation once I enter my cloister, and you know, rest to get me wits back." Why did you have to say it like that!? He's staring at me like I'm a babbling fool! Oh, I wish he would simply let me enter my cloister in peace, I have so many cyphers within all these swevens I must meditate on. The festival, maybe the lands flooded will be a good thing, if there is so much fire raining down. Nay! What can three days time allow me to discern the weather forecast from this?!  Diame gave her head a distract shake, her red curls swayed side by side off her gilded circlet, and she focused the blue gems of her gaze back to him, "Eyes and blessings on you, Eljuk. You are a true man of Faith as well as a true friend. All is well, for your helpful advice hath soothed my woes and rekindled the virtue of 'the Faith is begotten by all and not alone.'" He smirked in response, but still stood there expectant for more. What is he waiting for? Diame continued, "If there's nothing else...?" 
Eljuk nodded, then took a breath that seemed to be of relief, reassurance. "Your Ladyship, your words encourage my daily duties to Lux Grande as well as to Teva. Pray, do not let me tarry you any further from your divine duties. I am glad God has given you these good sights. I take it you've writ them to Bishop Melbourne already so I may send it." Diame stared in blank abashment, "I'll need to send that soon so the pidge can ride the early northern winds."
"O-oh!" She stammered, and cleared her throat speaking with clear assurance, "Aye, indeed! I do have that writ." She gave a slight nod with a humble bow, "So, let me go get that quickly so the pidge does not tire her wings." Diame whipped around to her home made of powder blue stone and creaked the wooden door open. The pale yellow parchment seemed to glow on the table from catching the morning sunshine that filled her home. She took a brisk stride in and grabbed the small letter written in black ink laying dry on the table, and turned back to Eljuk waiting in her doorway. Fool girl! Where was your head? She smiled at him. "Here you are." She calmly took a step forward and handed out the slip of paper. 
He took it, checked the ink if it would run with his thumb, and not a smudge was to be seen. "Thank you, good friend." Eljuk folded it and put it in a pocket in his vest. "And with this may I take all your woes and replace with reassurances. Bishop Malbourne will read this and reply soon, I am sure." He said with a nod.
Even if that letter reaches him, will that be enough to provoke a response? "A-aye." she said absently. Among all the so many carefully selected words in what she wrote when she awoke, she could not even say much detail about the dream she had of the night before. Then, the daemonic apparition appeared yet again within the temple walls, another astonishing vision she must meditate up on. The sweven given to me this morn was beyond clear of what fate is to befall Teva, and I must write yet another report after my cloister. But even then would I still receive a reply? Will a response granting an audience be sent at last?
	As Eljuk cleared his throat, he glanced down the path, "By and by, I shall not tarry you any longer. In three suns, Lady Diame." he said with dutiful admiration on his face.
	Three days to ponder of this, certainly now is not the time. "Aye, friend." She placed her silken hand on his tan, rough-hewn hand, "You are a true support as well as a dutiful worker for the church as well as the people. May Her Eyes watch over you." the High Priestess finished with her other hand making the blessing gesture and let her arm drop.
	He let a smile that gleamed with genuine piety. "Eyes watch over you as well. Faith and God willing, a letter will have arrived by next we meet. Peace, friend." With a final nod, he closed the door behind him.
	Alone within her home, Diame gave a bated sigh as she relaxed and brushed her long, red curls out of her face. The blue stone walls of the interior were illuminated by the brightness of the early dawn. Wisps of fog wafted in through the windows on the wall and ceiling, catching beams of light and making cloudy columns of mist. She took a step and leant on the windowsill to gaze through the glass blurred with cold. Unable to see any faces clearly through the morning haze, she could still make out people moving up and down the trail to the fields in the distance, "The world spinning around me will never cease. What I saw wasn't reality, the Goddess always speaks to me in cryptic imagery." Yet, what I see in my mind will always inevitably clash with reality. She shook her head, red hair swayed side to side down her face, and she turned from the window. Taking off her fancy shoes, she set them aside in her wardrobe and removed the circlet holding down her volumes of hair. She admired the two bands of gold, weaved together in curved ovals to look like waves of the sea. In the middle was a small pearl hanging from a tiny gilt chain that dangled down over her forehead when worn. It was one gift among many from Lux Grande to anoint her position as High Priestess of the Water Temple. She ran a finger over its burnished sheen, and placed it back in the wardrobe shelf, closing it behind her. See a sweven once a week. Three suns to remain undisturbed and meditate on it over and over. Then, live amongst the people for four days, and Mersday comes once more to continue the cycle of Faith. She thought of every time she had soothsaid the weather true, bringing bounty and happiness to her people. Taking a few steps to her small kitchen area, she opened a cupboard revealing a pantry full of fresh produce reaped from the fields. All were individually bundled and separated in small amounts but she had a little of everything in the small space. Some ears of corn, loaves of bread, potatoes, mudberries and beets line the shelves and small jars containing cornmeal, salt and sugar were stocked as well. A small breakfast to repose my strength, then my meditations for the day begin. She took a jar of the cornmeal and some beets, and began making a small fire in her metal stove.

Outside, the thick clouds of morning mist had only just fully lit up from silver to white by the ascending sun. Eljuk trod down the towns cobblestone path, greeting those who walked by on their way back to the fields. He continued down the cobblestone road to the acolyte's longhouse to attend to his morning duties. The large building was all made of traditional Tevan blue stone and clay with wide and slightly bulged out glass windows on each of its three stories. It housed many of the acolytes, as well as a place the entire town could congregate in. For being the largest man made building in Teva, it was dwarfed only by the Water Temple. Eljuk walked along the path through the open-gated archway to his home where he and others would continue their morning duties. 
Opening one of the double doors, Eljuk stepped into the solemn atmosphere of the Church's office. Many of the villagers at work within were dressed in acolyte livery the same as his, white tunics with dark blue vests above dressed on the young and old alike. All were tending to their usual responsibilities, fair haired Monika sat behind a desk and gave Eljuk a nod as he entered. He's seen her many times yet this morning, and she was enveloped in piles of paperwork. The hallways split up two different directions, the wider one leading to the big chambers the entire town could sit inside for important discussions. Only a few people were within, he recognized a few familiar voices discussing matters of how the town's produce would be split among its people or what was to be sold in export. Down the narrower hallway it stretched on with many doors on either side with acolytes going in and out, some with paperwork tending to official business. Some carried brooms and decanters of holy water from the lake, the usual method for cleansing. He continued down the narrow hall, passing people he knew who greeted him but he responded with merely a nod. His fingers unconsciously patted the note in his vest, a constant reminder of the duty that came first. 
A passing doorway in the hall was open, within the good nun Mariden in an all dark blue habit recited passages from The Divine Manifest. Children sat in a circle around her listening attentively to her, immersed in tales of miracle workings and acts of Evaz'sa. They would be instilled with the good teachings of the church, and learn the importance of Teva's traditions. While the young ones were not yet old enough to work in the fields, their precious youth was best spent spiritually growing while the adults and older kids worked the fields. 
Eljuk came up on the last door at the end of the hall, and he opened it leading him into a small room for the mail. Built into the end wall of the post room was a row of wooden cages thatched with thinly woven wire. Within came sounds of soft cooing and chirping from the pigeons and birds kept within. A greying man sat back in a large leather worked chair at a table lit in the morning's light from a nearby window. He wore a loosened white tunic with his blue vest off, hung on a rack behind him. A large gold ring with a carved eye and seven pointed star signet adorned one of his fingers, and he always held it up while he read. A mess of letters, envelopes, blank parchments and calligraphy utensils were all strewn about his desk's surface, but it was a perfectly normal sight. The man at the desk was reading something through the spectacles on his nose so intently he didn't notice Eljuk's presence. "A good morrow to you, brother Gellard." Eljuk bid him.
The middle aged man glanced up from the letter in front of his eyes for only a moment, "Good morrow, brother Eljuk." he said in a throaty voice as he went back to reading.
Eljuk took the letter out of his poke and held it in front of Gellard. "The High Priestess wishes to send this." His earthy eyes stared dutifully at him, waiting with the letter held out. 
Gellard let out a slight grunt and put what he was reading down regretfully. He took the small piece of parchment and held it out to read who it was addressed to, "Her Ladyship wishes to send another letter to Bishop Malbourne, I see."
"Aye, I would like to send it as soon as it is prepared."
The greying man nodded and slid the letter into an envelope, then rummaged beneath the scattered papers. Gellard found a hidden small box that contained a flint and matches. He lit a candle on his desk with a small brass dish affixed above it. From the box he pulled out a small cube of dark violet wax and placed it on the heating dish.
Eljuk made his way over the the cages built into the wall, which had parts cut out where the birds could fly into a larger caged area outside. All falconry were separated by breed in the dual habitat homes, mostly all pigeons separated by where they will travel to. Besides that, there were a few hawks of varying size and crest in the larger cages. The cooing of the pigeons fluttered as if excited to see him, and Eljuk smirked as he wondered about all the places where all his birds had been. "Let's see... which pidge..." he muttered to himself, and partially talking to the birds. On a cage labeled with a blue and checkered mark, he looked over all the pigeons that flew to Ijia. All the pigeons that had been sent had returned, but none with a letter in reply. The lack of response letters was disheartening for the acolyte, yet it would never waver his duty or his Faith, especially if Lady Diame wished to keep sending them. However, to keep sending important letters without receiving a reply would not do either. "Something must be done differently to ensure its safe delivery into His Graces hands, yet it must be done with subtlety. But what?" he muttered to himself distract amidst the birds' gentle cooing.
As he finished writing the sender and addressee down on a tiny slip of paper, Gellard placed it face down on a metallic plate, then pulled out from a drawer a thin cylinder made of featherweight bone. He took Diame's letter writ on the small parchment and carefully rolled it into a scroll, then slipped it inside the tube, and closed an end that popped on. With a pair of metal tongs, he took the bone tube by the ends and dipped it into the brass dish full of violet wax. He turned the bone cylinder a few times giving it a thin coat, then took the message container out placing it on the addressee label on the metal plate. The layer of warm wax was a brighter hue purple on the white bone, and while it was still melty, Gellard carefully stamped it with the signet of his ring. He held his fist down, pressing gently against the soft wax, impatiently waiting for it to cool. He looked up at Eljuk wondering why he took his time pondering which pigeon he would send, the most obvious choice being the ones that fly to Ijia. He shook his head and grumbled, thankful to be the postmaster and not a falconer.
The gray pigeons looked all the same at first glance, but each one had a difference about them Eljuk had memorized, as well as naming all three dozen birds he cared for. Within the cage with the blue and checkered mark, reliable blue-crested Ine returned from Ijia just this morning, without a response from His Grace. His fast glider, Lila, was the first one he sent in the urgency when Diame's unsettling dream first began. The red-crested pigeon returned empty taloned as well. The couple of larger cages near the end of the row housed a pair of red-tail hawks, but they were outside in the wide open bird dome. He entertained a thought of using one of these birds of prey to send the message for a moment, it would certainly get the point across. He chuckled to himself, and put the thought aside. If the large bird startled His Holiness, it might do more harm than good.
Removing his pressed ring from the coat of wax, Gellard held up the small, dark violet message container inspecting the Eye of Evaz'sa sigil imprinted on it. It was to his standards, and he placed the small tube on top of the mess of paperwork. "Here, brother. It is done." he licked his fingers and put out the candle's flame, then picked up the letter he was reading and continued as if he never stopped.
"If I send another pidge, dare I dwell on the thought of it returning without a response once more?" Eljuk thought to himself aloud. There was a medium sized cage for holding merlins, a smaller bird breed resembling the likeness of hawks, but about a hair width or two shorter than a pigeon. While most of them were outside in their connecting outdoor dome, a single merlin sat on a perch in the indoor cage. They all have grey-brown feathered wings with white tips, but this particular one had an especially furled breast coat, with fluffy white short feathers and bright brown spots of down. Eljuk recognized Maji with ease, and he knelt down closer to better see through the wire cage. A bright yellow beak nestled between a pair of pebbled black eyes that seemed almost too large for the pigeon-hawk's small size. Its shining dark eyes peered back into Eljuk's earth brown gaze as he crouched beside the wood-and-wire cage. Out of the assortment of all the different birds cooing, chirping, and moving about the indoor-outdoor cages, this merlin was silent, almost with intent, it seemed. "Mayhap, you would do the trick, little Maji." Eljuk said with his kind falconer's voice, all too used to talking with his birds. "Wouldn't you like to take a long flight and let those caged wings soar?" The merlin's eyes widened, tiny black pebbles grew to reveal hidden irises of gold peeping out from under feathered eyelids. The gilt ring of the bird's gaze flared for a moment as if it glowed, then retracted back to its normal stare. Eljuk bolted to stand upright, taken aback as if the bird had spoke to reply. 
With a quiet ruffle of paper, Gellard lifted his eyes off the letter in his hands to give Eljuk a scrutinizing stare. Then he eyed the letter capsule he made, then went back to reading, muttering something about haste and waste under his breath.
Looking down at the cage containing Maji, Eljuk nodded to the bird as if making an agreement. He made his way to a wall containing a small closet that had his all his falconers' gear inside. Hanging on the wall, a large leather glove for resting a bird on his arm and a small chest of drawers that had various cloth bags containing objects from a variety of areas. Different scents, colors and plant materials helped train and remind the birds how to find their way. He grabbed his glove and a small cloth satchel painted with black and white squares and a blue stripe marked 'Kingdom of Ijia'.

Enjoying the last few bites of her polenta and beets, Diame savored her hearty breakfast. The last corner of mudberry jam toast was burnt slightly just how she liked, and her hunger sated as she ate the final piece. She finished with a gulp of water from a glass chalice gleaming in condensation, and she sighed, satisfied from her self made meal. She leant back in her seat and looking up from her cleared plate, the sun light was beaming in through the windows, clearly into the mid morning. "'Tis well past the hour, already? Then I shan't tarry with what I must perform." She said arising from her seat, and a strange dizzy fatigue made her sit right back down. Her head rushed for a moment, and then she regained herself. "Oh, eyes watch o'er me..." she said nearly lost of breath. The water in the chalice stirred in a powerful current, a spinning vortex formed daring to tip the glass. Diame reached forward to keep the shaking chalice safely on the table. "Still." She whispered. The water rippled once then ceased in an instant, regaining regular unmoving placidity. She sat back once more in her seat, only a trifle touched with worry. "My affinity towards water is deftly more sensitive than usual. Given into my mind as well with the multitude of visions must have been a vast amount of aether." Slowly she sat up, and carefully made it to her feet as to not agitate her lightheadedness. It was not unusual to manipulate water without intention for Diame at times, but it became an inevitability after receiving a sweven within the Water Temple. She took a glass jar full of water and walked barefoot to her meditation chamber.
Parting the white silk curtains, she stepped within the single beam of light coming down from above in the small connected room. Against the wall covered with unlit candles and magic stones was her sacred altar. Her white marble Eye of Evaz'sa statue on the star-embroidered midnight blue cloth seemed to glow in the light. She sat on the floor on a soft cushion, and placed the decanter of lake water on the floor in the light before her. "I'll have to make especial use of these three days to cleanse myself of this excessive aether." She slowed her breathing, and took several deep inhales. The sweet scent of the unlit myrrh incense wafted from her altar, and she relaxed as well she could. She was still uneasy from the extraordinary visions she saw, as well as shaky from being infused with a vast amount of magickal energy. 
The temple gave her visions every Mersday, the day when the world's element is the most powerfully attuned to Water. The overwhelming Water aether used to give Diame her visions also would linger on within her, and if not released, would begin to effect the other water elements around her. The glass almost tipping over wasn't nearly as bad as other incidents with Diame's involuntary use of magick. One Mersday years ago, she had just emerged from the temple to address her flock, and after lingering around for too long, she made a farmer's nearby sealed water casque burst. While it did not cause much damage but dousing everyone around with water, it did startle the pious people that she did lose control over her element. When she trained as a mage in Lux Grande, it was normal for one who can conduct magicks to do so without intent sometimes. Even still, it panicked her people, as they saw their leader lose control. After that incident in particular, the young High Priestess Diame grew even more strict in her practices to gain back the village's trust and reassure their Faith in her and the Church. 
With her eyes closed, she envisioned the glass decanter before her on the floor, its clear water swirled effervescently with the morning sunlight. She felt her mind reach out, the sensation felt like an invisible arm extending out from her head towards the water. She felt the curious sensation of her invisible fingertips dip into the cool water, feeling the depth of every droplet fused together. It felt like dipping one's hand into a jar of tiny glass beads, and she scooped up what she felt like would be a handful of them. As she sat cross-legged on the cushion, Diame opened her eyes and saw hovering above the glass jar an orb of water. It was about the size of a large fist, more than she intended to conduct, but it would do for her meditations. She kept her concentration firm, feeling a gentle flow of energy dissipating out from her as the clear sphere spun at eye level before her. All the excessive energy retained in the High Priestess from her vision every seven days is allowed to be expelled by this process of meditation in the cloistering process. 
The ball of water hovered in the air, nearly keeping a perfect spherical shape while tiny waves rippled across its surface. The light contained within it spun slowly, Diame focused on that before she closed her eyes once more, feeling the steady flow of energy leave her. Invisible strings could be seen within her mind, thin aethereal strands that connected element to magician. With this bond of affinity made, she began the next rites to perform. Keeping the globe of water floating was performed easily enough, but continuing to do so while dwelling on what she had seen in her swevens would be the real ordeal. For three days this would be done, releasing aethereal energy until quelled and controllable, and when she would be satisfied in what answers her meditations would bring.
Diame uttered a near silent prayer, concentrating on  holding the water sphere afloat as well as trying to reflect up on all the different things she had seen in her visions. The parade grounds full of the smiling faces of Teva's villagers entered her mind first. A festival will be in the future, lots of mulled wine and pies were abundant more than anything else. Substantial rain will happen to suggest a bounty of mudberries, yet so much celebration and other crops will grow as to say there will not be flooding. I do believe this forebodes stable weather in the coming weeks, reassuring tidings indeed to share with the farm folk. Almost satisfied with the answer to one question, she nearly wished she could end her meditation as if it were complete. However, she knew there was much more of what she had seen to reflect up on, and a touch of fear shivered her. The watery sphere wobbled for only a moment, but Diame's focus did not waver. She took a deep breath and held it in, attempting to ready her strength to delve deeper into the things seen in her mind. The fire in the sky and the daemon gigantic above Teva, the water temple flooding the entire valley. What thing so terrible threatens Teva? Through the incinerating cinder clouds a ferocious face appeared imprinted in the burning mist. The daemon roared down from above, and the Water Temple submerged the sky with flood. Would the wicked shambles of the underworld be foully at work attempting to undo the world of the Goddess? How? Their leader and legions were felled ages long past. What remains of their defeated remnants are forever banished by the light of the sun and moon, they cannot have a presence on the surface of Caelutera. My duty is to protect this town, what will happen to all my people? To the world? And with all this, who knows when the church will ever care to send a response?
The orb of water floating in her mind as well as in reality split, and two spheres of clear water hovered above the glass urn. It startled her for only a moment to see the floating waters separate without intent, but, with all that she saw in her dreams and within the temple, she figured the waters would be stirring more strangely in this cloister. Better for that to be done here in her chambers where the volatile aether can be released safely.
"My swevens have never been haunted by these terrible things before. 'Twas only in that dream I had the night after my last visit into the Water Temple. That hulking daemon overseeing our world, with fire wielded to rent a wrathful path." Taking a deep breath, Diame recalled her dreams that seemed to force their way into her head. The daemon overshadowed the world engulfed in flame. There is no good to come of this, yet I see it in my mind over and over again. What is there I can do from thinking about this at home for three days and nights?
A thin ray of light split from the orbs, and water cascaded from the two into a third. The three spheres all contained the same amount of water, and hovered over the glass urn. The two daemons she saw, one in a dream during cloister and then the other from the vision in the Water Temple. There was a flood, and she remembered emerging from the sea, and arriving in the snow of the Northern Lands. A gigantic tower that pierced the sky with wide, crumbling marble walls thick like a mighty fortress. Diame remembered herself in its black shadow cast in the white field of snow, and the chills that killed her in the cold. Surely, that had nothing to do with the village. Yet, why did I see myself there? 
She took a deep breath and felt the currents of aether leaving her intensify. Within her mind's eye, she visualized the three balls of water darting in between one another above the glass urn. A single watery globe floated between the other two in succession making a zig-zagging trinity in orbit. My vision of overlooking the cliff into the ocean, the giant daemon that took up the sky... some calamity shall affect the world. The daemon looms over the village... the lives of Teva are threatened directly. I see myself alone in that hellish ice field condemned to an inevitable death, why? What could seeing myself in the Northlands convey but something cryptic as what I've seen in visions of the weather? But, is there not a terrible threat tied to all that I have seen? Could the ancient daemons of the underworld become a threat to Caelutera once again? Impossible! God promises to keep all Her children safe, just as the sun arises the heavens every morn to cleanse all below with its light, just as the moon comes to take its place to protect the world at night. Not even minor daemonic creatures can hide in the shadows, how could a titanic daemon engulf the world in destruction as well as Teva? If the world is to meet its end, why am I to die alone in the ice field? In frustration and fear, she shivered as if a chill had taken the air. What happened to the sweven promising peace and bounty for the village? Is harvest and celebration feasts to come and go, dashed as a daemon shows itself thereafter? Will that happen after Sindha and Edjar marry in years to come? But, what of the tower in snow storm? The images spun in her head, the conflicting three visions vying to make sense, but she had only decrypted premonitions about weather predictions before. She pondered all this harder, the three spheres of water flew faster in a chaotic orbit. There will be bountiful harvests for Teva, that must be the only vision I am meant to know of the weather. I could ponder and speculate what tons of mudberries and wine mean, but, I was given two horrible sights of daemons, and seeing myself sent off all the way to the barren northern edge of the world! What purpose does any of this fulfill?! She opened her eyes, and gasped for air in a panic. The three hovering spheres of water froze in place, keeping themselves still at eye level in front of her face. She stared at them for a moment in her collected thoughts, but if all were to be destroyed, what good could meditating on it in her cloister do? She looked up at the beam of light swathing down from the window in the stone ceiling, pleading, face grimaced in desperation and tears. "What in holy Evaz'sa's name does all this possibly mean!?" she shouted in a strained, nearly hoarse voice. The three orbs of water lost their form and each one wobbled back together until nearly remolding back into a shape of a single orb. She felt her concentration lost, the current of aether severed to the floating body of water, and it regained its gravity. The large misshapen sphere of water landed with all its weight against the glass urn, and it tipped over with a loud crash and an explosive splash. Water and shards of glass spread out everywhere against the stone floor, and all was the momentary loud breaking of glass. Then she stared in silence at the large curved fragments of the urn glistening in the morning sunlight. Small glints of colorful prisms appeared in the smaller pieces, while the larger had a green tint to the broken edges of the fallen decanter. Tears ran down her cream colored face as she took sharp inhales, shaking fingertips softly wiped away each droplet that formed anew.
"What am I to do?" she sobbed into her sodden hands. She parted her loose curls of red locks out from her face and sat up in her cushion, rocking back and forth. She took several deep inhales to calm her shaken nerves, an attempt to find some peace within such a disharmonious meditation. "Evaz'sa, please, would you tell me what to do?!" she pleaded desperately to the empty room. The glistening wetness across the stone pooled together in a lurch, regathering with the scattered glass shards as the water ebbed across the floor. Within her mind's eye she could see currents of aether, thin glowing blue lines all stemmed from her and branched out, connecting randomly to the boarder of the reforming pool of water. Strands arched out and snapped, then reformed, flickering in and out of existence. She took yet another deep breath and held it calm and fast, desperate to gain ahold of her emotions. Her mind went silent with serenity at will, and prayed it would calm the chaos in her mind as well as within her meditation chamber. All the ties of aether connected to her faded into near unseen wisps that plumed in the air, and the pool along the floor dispersed, spreading out the spilt water and split glass once more. 
Brushing her hand against her face she felt the severed current of aether on a spot of tender flesh in the middle of her forehead. I can feel the overflowing temple aether within me, my affinity to control water is more volatile than ever. Yet, I am expected to quietly replay what I have seen over and over, and rid myself of this excessive aether so I may retain mastery over my magicks. But what of my visions? I can not simply sit here for three days just waiting to address my people. What could I possibly tell them when all I have seen is their lives and the world in danger!? How can I keep their Faith strong when the church will not even send a reply to Teva, to acknowledge the dangers of which I have seen!? She took a long sigh and whispered to herself, "What am I to do?" Her gaze cast down once more at the shattered glass, reminiscing of how often she had used it. Every vision given to her through the temple from the last eight years she had created those orbs of water to meditate with. She had lost control only a few times before when she was especially brimming with water aether, but never like this. Never to where it all came crashing down, to when she could no longer sit in calm placidity within her chamber walls. For all the grim spectacle seen, she could only believe it a mere glimpse of what threat might befall the world as well as her village. Although unable to find any meaning of why these daemons were presented in her visions, the thought crossed her mind that 'twas still early dawn and she had just barely began searching for answers within cloister. The notion of continuing this strenuous meditation for the rest of this day and more to come turned the meal in her stomach.
Wiping the final tears from her face, Diame noticed the fair skin of her hands were much paler than usual, and overwhelmed she wished to lie down. She slowly stood up, keeping on the dry stone behind her cushion, wary of the glass shards all across the floor before her. "What a disastrous mess I have made of my chambers." She sighed dejectedly and shook her head. The white silk curtains leading back into her kitchen were only a few steps away, but she risked stepping on a sharp shard of glass if she moved forward even a toe. She leant against the stone chamber wall deciding what to do with herself, searching for something of use in the room to help. Only her altar with unlit candles, incense, colorful stones and the white marble seven pointed star were within the room with her, resting in the sunlight on the star embroidered table cloth. The single Eye of Evaz'sa in its center stared back at her, but it quickly became apparent that that and the other sacred objects given by the church were of no use to her right now. Looking down, the red cushion she sat up on lay on the ground, seemingly dry before the pool of water on the stone. "First things first, I need safely out of my chambers. Needlessly giving myself a bad cut is all I need to worry about preventing." 
Diame pushed the red cushion forward with one foot, the tiny pieces of wet glass scraping against the stone floor beneath it gave off an unsettling sound. She shuddered as if she had stepped on one, but continued to push the red pillow forward until she could not extend her leg anymore. Now it was about halfway between where she stood and the curtains hanging from the threshold back into her home. She cringed as downcast eyes followed a trail of small, wet feathers in its wake. She clenched her teeth and felt bad about ruining the pillow as it, too was a gift given to her by the church, as well as the statue and urn. But, assuringly, she nodded to herself that she was doing what had to be done to simply leave the room at this point. Bravely yet with her weight held back, she put one foot into the air and slowly balanced so she would place it as gently as she could atop the pillow as to not move it. With one foot on the dry stone and the other on the red cushion, she looked down at the sea of broken glass beneath her. "Careful now. Do not make bloody fool of yourself and get hurt." But if she had any regrets about trying to cross the glass, it was too late now that she was the bridge over it. 
Putting her weight forward and firmly settling on the cushion with one foot, and with a single motion she brought herself to stand both feet atop it. She wiggled her bare toes and a sodden squishing sound came up from the bottom of the pillow, painfully reminding her of the things entrusted to her she had just destroyed. Leaving the small room a graceful motion, she parted the white curtains with one foot and placed it though, just outside her meditation chamber onto the cool stone tiles of the kitchen. One foot was out to freedom, her leg above countless shards of broken glass, with the rest of all her weight on the one foot still on the cushion. She could feel the indents of the thin pieces of glass from beneath, gradually working their way through the fabric. The longer she waited like this, wobbling slightly to keep balance, the sharper and more direct she could feel the shards breaking anew and cutting through feathers. This might have been too big of a distance to cross... crossed her mind before she could make the final motion to freedom. A pointed pebble of glass that threatened to tear through the pillow fabric was near close enough to prick the bottom of her foot. Unable wait any longer, she leapt forward, throwing all her slender weight forward as hard as she could. Lunging towards the white curtains to follow her already freed leg, she gasped as the pillow beneath her slipped back as she flung herself forward. Even worse, as the priestess fell towards the shards of glass on the stone floor, her foot caught onto the cushion and flung it straight into the air as well. As she tumbled forward, Diame reached out and tightly grabbed ahold of the white silk curtains hanging down off the threshold, and barely a toe off the floor, managed to swing herself the rest of the way out of her chambers. 
She fell to the stone floor hard against her thigh with her other leg banged up against the table, and in the chaotic whirl, wrapped herself head to feet with the white silk curtains as they ripped out from the doorway. As soon as she shook the fallen drapes off of her face, she saw the airborne red pillow land against the Eye of Evaz'sa statue centered in her altar. A rain of feathers descended and danced above the marble sculpture as it wobbled back and forth, teetering towards the edge of the table and threatened to fall to the stone floor as the sodden pillow hung off one of its seven points. Eyes wide with panic, Diame struggled to free her arms and legs from the silken binds. If she hurried, she could unwrap out of this tangle and leap back into the glass-filled chambers in time to catch the precious statue. An arm slipped out, and with a hand loose, she freed the other, whilst pulling and kicking hard against the drapes around her legs, but all the effort did no good. The curtains somehow were wrapped up so tightly around her legs from the fall they might as well been steel chains. A slow final teeter off the altar, and gravity pulled the Eye of Evaz'sa to the stone floor.
"Nay!" She shouted in near breathless desperation as the holy symbol of her Faith tumbled upside down. "Pray, stop!" Diame reached towards the open doorway with a free hand and grabbed at the elemental aether within the chambers. In a split moment, the water on the chamber floor stirred and pooled together, gathering all the glimmering glints of glass. A misshapen globe of dusty water and broken glass formed at the floor, rippling by the resounding strain of her voice. The marble statue crashed through the sphere of water and smashed into pieces against the floor. Water exploded in every direction with splashes carrying glass shards with it, fragments of the seven pointed star strew about the floor in the chamber, and the house filled with the loud boom of breaking stone. Diame raised the silk drapes and covered her face, shielding herself from the flying droplets and shards of glass, then sat there, shrouded in shocked silence.
She took a deep breath, and cautiously pushed the damp silk off her head and parted the curls of her long red locks. Diame gasped. Before her, the sacred chamber used so many times for countless meditations and infinite insights lay destroyed in complete disarray. The fallen marble statue lay in the pool of water, fragmented into several pieces. All the star points broken off and scattered, the eye in the statue's center cracked straight down the middle. Only now did she notice the open torn pillow on her altar and some of her magickal objects fallen to the floor during the chaos. Some of her colorful stones lay in dusty puddles with a small pile of wet, ruined incense sticks. A few feathers remained aloft, drifting slowly in the air above the wreckage as if they would never touch it.
In sheer disbelief, Diame leant forward on her hands and knees against the cold stone. She took in the state of her meditation chambers, and blinked. The unsettling scenery changed not, her eyes focused on what remained the same, filled with the vain hope it would change. Putting a crawling hand forward to bring herself closer to her chamber, she immediately retracted it as soon as her palm touched the floor and felt the sharpness of a tiny glass shard. "Ouch!" She brought her hand back and sat up, inspecting it for a wound. No blood presented itself, fortunately for her. Diame's shocked gaze locked onto the shattered Eye of Evaz'sa, taking in her other ruined artifacts among it, much less the disarray in her sacred chamber and home! Shaking her head at the surreal surroundings, she tightly clutched the curtains 'till her hands were as white as the silk. "Eyes watch over me, what have I done?" she muttered to herself in astonished whispers. She moved her legs, the curtains loosened and slipped off smoothly. She took a pause and wondered why the tightly wrapped drapes were so impossible to remove before, perhaps it was her struggled panic that made the tangle worse. 
"Well, no use worrying about what will become of these, now." She put a harsh emphasis on the 'now'. Diame tossed one of the drapes before her, the white silk furled and made a large rectangle across the kitchen's stone floor. Some water droplets seeped through making the sheet a little darker in places, and she threw the second drape over it. Cautiously, she placed a hand down on the double layered silk, feeling traces of wetness and some small bumps of dull sharpness, but at least it was safe enough that she could move about her home. Diame moved her bare feet and hands towards her chamber as she crouched across the drapes, not willing to further test her luck by standing upright. She sat on her knees, her hands grabbed at the single stone step covered with silk, and she leant over the mess she had made. The marble fragments were in so many pieces, she couldn't possibly grab them all, and the larger pieces of broken glass would cut right through the silk if she tried the same trick in there. A cut within dirty water is not something she wanted, yet she wished she could grab every fragment of the statue and somehow piece it back together. But there was no way she could re-enter the chambers at this point, even if she could manipulate water, there were no holy images to guide her in her meditations. My visions, these important swevens given from God! How am I to gain any insight on all the horrors I have seen if my inner sanctuary is no longer safe to even enter? She sat helplessly leaning over the open threshold, consumed in thought, staring down at the floating feathers and drowning fragments of her Faith. Staring back from the stone floor was her sad reflection, to which her teardrops could only add to the pool of water.

Diving in a large swooping circle, the pigeon hawk landed back on the oversized leather glove snugly fit on Eljuk's right hand. The thin, violet cylinder with a tiny seven-pointed star signet imprinted in its wax hung from the bird's talon, affixed to a small, strong string. Eljuk had tested Maji's flight out and was surprised with the speed the small wings could bear. Maji furled and fluttered his wings, then preened a couple of his white and brown spotted breast feathers with his small, yellow beak. He had been inside of the smaller bird enclosures, one of many big dome structures made from woven wire that allowed for minimal flight. In that space, many species of birds could stretch and glide their wings, Eljuk made sure they all were trained to return to test their flight regularly. By now, he had already tested Maji's flight several times, and prepared the bird to carrying the important letter Diame wrote for the bishop. In his left hand he held a small jute sachet full of things from the northern coast, rich with the scents and colors of Maji's destination. A branch bursting with dried indigo flowers stuck out from the bag, showing the bird the unique moon blossoms that only grow in the Kingdom of Ijia. Their sweet scent was faint, but with a keener sense of smell, the well-trained bird could travel a long distance with just a memory of the aroma. However, after several attempts at sending Maji on his flight, the pigeon-hawk returned one after another, the letter capsule swaying off its talon dully.
Shifting his shoulders, Eljuk adjusted his blue vest as he held the bird on his gloved arm. The bird's tiny black eyes stared straight back at the acolyte's earthy brown with an uncanny light of intelligence. He considered why the bird had not taken flight yet, with all the training given, there was no reason why Maji hadn't flown off into the free skies. "Carry on now, Maji." Eljuk spoke clearly and kindly, with only a touch of impatience. He held out the moon blossom branch to the bird, to which Maji brushed his beak against the blue petals. He began to gnaw on a piece, then stopped and turned back to the falconer, giving a small chirp. Eljuk smiled at the sound, it usually meant the bird was prepared and ready, yet after several tries of this, the bird merely returned to his glove. Masking his frustration, Eljuk took a breath and calmed his nerves. "You understand where it is you must go, aye?" The bird's black orbs stared back with glints of the morning sunlight glistening in them, patiently and awaiting. "Then, to Ijia! Take flight!" He raised his arm up high, Maji flapped his wings and swooped up towards the misty morning sky. Making a large circle around the back of the acolyte's longhouse, he soared above his fellow avians in their domed homes. Eljuk watched the bird overhead with bated excitement, then to his dismay, the pigeon hawk swooped down towards him. He raised his glove forward reluctantly, and Maji slowed his dive flapping his wings forward, then dropped and latched onto the glove with his talons. Eljuk's patience was nearly vexed to the point of shouting, but with little avail in that, he let out an exhausted sigh. The bird simply stared back at Eljuk with small black eyes full of light, giving signs of every intention he meant to take flight. "Does something ail you, Maji? Are you not well?" He asked himself, knowing the bird had no symptoms of illness. The bird merely titled his head expectantly, tightly perched on the falconer's glove. The thought crossed his mind of putting the small pigeon-hawk back in its dome and choosing a regular pigeon, he even once again entertained the thought of sending Claw his red-tailed hawk. But, something in the pidge's two, small black marbles rested on his yellow beak spoke of some intent in the bird's mind. The way the bird knowingly stared back at him, Eljuk was even more determined to have this intelligent bird take flight. He had to send this letter of the highest importance, for his close friend, for the High Priestess. This was the will of God, using Diame as a divine instrument, and Eljuk a mere branching extension of the work of the Church. He filled his lungs with the morning air and the faint musk of bird cages, his resolve restored with the comfort of his Faith. He once again put the moon blossoms before Maji, and the pigeon-hawk brushed his beak against the dried petals playfully once more.

DIAME sat slumped at her kitchen table, the priestess' listless face cupped in hands trembling to be still. She had stared at the broken remnants of her Faith for so long before she realized there was nothing reasonable she could do besides sit beside herself. She had thought of trying to conduct the water in her chambers with magick, perhaps float it all out the window, or she could use the sunlight to dry it all up, then at least she could get to the fragments of the broken Eye of Evaz'sa. If she managed that, she could repair the marble pieces back into something of a seven pointed star. She couldn't see all the fragments, but knew they all had to be in her chambers somewhere. However, in such a shaken state of mind, performing magick would an unwise option. So, here she sat back in her seat, trying to control the overflowing well of quiet weeping.
What am I to do now? She folded her hands into her lap, and glanced over her shoulder to the still destroyed chambers, unable to make the image stay in her mind as real. She shuddered and closed her eyes and wove her fingers together, clasped in prayer. "Eyes of merciful Evaz'sa, watch over me! I am but a humble servant to your will! If what swevens you have shown me be horrors to come in the future, I believe thee! If it be thy will to take away the guidance of thy hallowed images, be it so!" 'Tis not an an errant coincidence God has given me these visions to meditate on, then takes away my only means to find any insight in the cryptic images. For all I know, what seems to be a random string of misfortunes, perhaps 'twas meant to be? A test of my Faith to see what I would do without my chambers, without the means to meditate? She shook her head and brushed back a bunch of red curls with her fingertips, trying to focus not on the sight of the chambers through the corner of her eye. "But, if I'm wrong about this being a sign from the divine, then I am naught but a foolish, clumsy lass." But, how could I wreak havoc like this to myself and my things? Well I do know how, but what is done is nearly too much to bear. Disparaged in a plight of Faith, she sighed a long, exasperated breath, although, she did feel as though she did strike a cord of truth within her thoughts. "Is this all just a test of my Faith?" She chuckled as she added, "Is not life, in all its brevity, just a test of Faith to be judged and guided by the merciful will of Evaz'sa?" The slight giggle only brought her back to the reality of wistful thoughts. 
She still had important duties of Faith to perform, duties to herself as well as to the Church. Coursing within her blood, she was aware of the presence of powerful aethereal energy. Every time she barely touched the thought of using her magick, pulses of watery coolness coursed through her blood. Where Diame would find a sacred place, safe within her thoughts to release this power, she knew not. The visions of Teva and the world threatened by flood and flame, Daemons that engulfed the sky, the tower in the field of ice... they were so cryptic, are bad omens to come to her home? Worse things to come to the world? Strange things have happened today, but, where could she lose herself in meditation to find meanings to all of what she has seen? She was home, in cloister, unable to leave, forbidden to speak to another, and remain perfectly calm until three days have passed. Diame had done this priestly duty hundreds of times, every visit to the temple had been simple visions to discern the weather, every dream was peaceful and never anything to cause her unrest. Her letters to His Holiness have not yet replied too long after they should have, and the careful words she must use do not allow details of what she has seen to be conveyed. Alone, she sat in her home, trying not to think of everything she has seen besides what had happened to her home, yet it was the only thing she could think of.
"If I just sit here for three days..." Diame muttered to herself, nearly on the brink of tears but trembling her head, furiously shaking her curls of red. "What good will become of all this?! I could meditate all I wanted, send a dozen letters to His Holiness," she gave a frustrated twist to the title, "The good Bishop would still not send reply! Even to letters saying 'tomorrow snow or fire may fall from the sky!'" she scoffed. Taking a moment, she sat upright, straightening her hair and skirts. "If I question the actions of the Church, I very well question my Faith. But how can I fulfill my duties as a Priestess, sitting here still and unsure? All this knowledge I hold won't mean a thing if it hasn't reached anyone outside the village gates! But the cloister can not be broken!" 
Glancing back to her chambers at the broken Eye of Evaz'sa statue, Diame shook her head and turned to the misty morning light shining in through her windows. The green of her garden shone through, as well as the pale blue morning sunlight. "For all the world out there, would I withhold what I have seen for maintaining Faith? I would stay truer to ensure the Church is informed of these disturbing visions. Letters will not suffice, I do not think the one sent this morning will bring about any change like the others I have sent. If I am to stay in cloister, well," she cleared her throat gingerly, "that duty cannot be performed now, so within these three days, I can not speak to anyone..." She arose, walking carefully across the silk laid on stone towards the windows, making out the blurs of people through the foggy glass. "So, if no one in town saw me leave," she pondered, "Well, Ijia isn't that far of a distance by foot. If I start now in the early morn, I may arrive by tomorrow evening." She had a years old memory of one of the few occasions she traveled to the ruling kingdom situated at the northern coast. The High Priestess only needed a five carriage procession consisting of Elder church members and high ranked Knights Templar, all the required transportation provided by Lux Grande. A big ceremony in Ijia's giant cathedral was where she first met the Bishop Malbourne briefly before the ceremony ended and she was rushed back to Teva within the same day. She pondered if the distance was walkable, and paced towards her bedside at the end of her home opposite of her chamber. 
Beneath the large blue book bearing the metallic Eye of Evaz'sa, Diame pulled open a drawer from her nightstand table. There among papers and broken sealed scrolls of past letters was a cloth bundle. Unfolding it, an old tattered scroll made of thicker parchment was curled and smelled of old must within. She unraveled it over the book, dust and brittle chips of paper fell off, but well drawn black lines on pale, sandy colored paper outlined the continent on which she lived. Tracing out with her finger the faint lines of the map, she looked for the small symbol for Teva among the mountains. There, a series of squares turned inside each other, with many rivers flowing from it down from the mountainous region the rolling hills designated the Valley of Mist. "Let me see..." Diame thoughtfully traced her finger searching a road she could use once she had walked past the farmlands and village which weren't drawn on the map, but would be nearby the Water Temple's symbol. There was a road she could use once she was up and out of the valley, down the mountains, and through the common fields. The road branched off as it continued north, and with mountainous terrain blocking the path further, the paths split up going into the mountains or straight to the east and west. One pathway went into a central forest, low between the tall mountains and she remembered hearing the forest route was often ventured by merchants. Past the forest, the road continued alongside ocean and sandy shores, the Kingdom of Ijia itself merely a stones throw away farther to the northeast. Drawn out with lines that seemed to exaggerate its size on paper, three tall towers protruded from a walled castle built alongside the two tallest mountains on the Ijian continent. The castle town rested down near the water, a map marking by its outer walls showed four squares, only two filled in to show even black and white checkers.
Diame sat down in her bed unaware she had done so, lost in thought and held the map up before her blue eyes, scanning it carefully. "I believe the distance would take a two days' walk, maybe a single day if I had left before dawn. Our Lady willing if I hurry, I could return with a carriage before three days would end, explain my absence, and be back in time for next Mersday's sweven for certain even if I break the silence of my cloister to tell Bishop Malbourne straight to his ear what I have seen." Diame nodded, "It pains me to leave my home in this thrashed condition, and it must be a secret to not rouse the town, but I haven't the time to tell anyone. I must go. I must tell His Grace what has me so perturbed at once!" She rolled the scroll up and threw it back in the cloth bag she found it in. 
Standing to her feet, she wondered what she would bring on her journey. Her driftwood staff, for magick as well for walking, that was leaning up on the wall by her wardrobe. Her wardrobe. She would ruin the ceremonial gown she wore if traveled in, and it wouldn't be comfortable to walk in after long either. She slid the white flowing robe off her shoulders, letting it and the embroidered gold flowers fall to the floor. In nothing but her shift, she opened the wardrobe doors and thought about what clothing and things to bring.

THE FALCONER held out the branch of moon blossoms patiently while coaxing the pigeon-hawk to remember its scent, but it merely nuzzled against the dried blue flowers, and took a dried petal in its bright yellow beak and began to playfully chew on it. Eljuk was hoping that his patient training was working as Maji was trying to figure out everything about the textures and tastes of the sweet scented flower. Then the bird spit it out, deliberately turning his big dark eyes to meet with his trainer, then let out a loud chirp. Eljuk was unsure what Maji was trying to communicate, the brown-spotted pigeon-hawk rested on his glove, eyes locked with his. 
Eljuk had sent Maji on letter deliveries before, and he or no other bird ever acted so peculiar than this morning. The falconer had sent him to fly off several times, each time the bird returned, looking somewhat confused, like it was waiting for another command. "What else could he be waiting for?" he asked himself with a sigh. "I may as well just put Maji back and retrieve Ine for this letter." He said disappointedly, yet it really did not matter which bird was sent. Eljuk had to send this letter soon and thought a better trained bird would have taken flight already. He lowered his arm with the pigeon-hawk docilely perched, and carried him back to the domed cages. 
Eljuk leant forward to slide the wood grating opening Maji's woven wire home with other birds of his kind perched within. As soon as he reached to remove the small violet letter capsule, the pidgeon-hawk let out a squawk and flapped its wings fervently. Eljuk closed the cage door and stood upright, "Hey, hey," he said calmly as he gently stroked the feathers on the bird's back with a single ungloved finger "Easy, friend." The pigeon-hawk ruffled its feathers as it rested its dark wings by its brown-spotted sides. Shining jet eyes stared back at him full of wry intelligence, widening revealing a golden iris ring.
Eljuk blinked and took a step back, a chill sent a shock up his spine, and he marveled at the intense stare the creature was giving him. Perhaps Maji has at last finished flourishing his wings. Or thought it would be better to soar the freedom of this task rather than perched here waiting, musing 'When might I fly the skies again?' within caged walls? 
Eljuk turned from the domed cage and the pigeon-hawk unfurled and beat his wings more wildly than before. Eljuk raised his arm high to avoid colliding with the small bird. 
Maji leapt forward with wings fluttering, the small violet letter capsule tied to him dangled as he took off. Over the domed cages and the motes of mist, the bird ascended skyward.    His wings beat fast, caught on ascending squalls of wind, skimming over low, gray clouds. Maji's wings soared over the columns of mist billowing above the four-squares tower of the Water Temple, the cold mist on his feathers rolling off in the wind.
Gliding above the glassy lake, Maji's shadow cut across his reflection on waters shining the blue of morning hue. Past the seven columned parade grounds, he flew high over the blue domes of village homes lined down the spread out rivers carrying dense pockets of fog. 
Past the short fencing bordering Teva, round stone buildings for holding produce were but small pebbles dotting the rolling valley beneath him. Countless stone buildings centered in the varieties of fields overabundant with the fruits of Teva's laboring farm folk. Well tended to greenery grew in large patches that stretched all up and down deep hillsides filled with the villagers hard at work. The farther the pidgeon-hawk flew, the chill of the mist thinned, and warmer squalls of morning air caught his wings. Higher and higher Maji sailed closer to the blue of the new sun. Further up he soared, until he were above the fog and mountains yet beneath the billowing clouds. In the distance the vast farmland of Teva thinned out, and the rivers stretched on down the slope. Green, open fields were in the far off distance holding the sky with cloud-piercing columns of sun beams brightening grassy lands rounded by the northern mountain range. With wings spread wide, Maji began his long flight towards the northern kingdom, gliding on guiding wind, faint with the carried scent of moon blossoms.


	II.1. Perseverance of Piety 

THE HIGH PRIESTESS straightened out the furls of the dark blue robe she donned over a mid-necked, white silk dress. Diame put on what she deemed the most comfortable to walk the vast distance in, and straightened her long curls of scarlet down her back. She placed the woven gold circlet around her hairline, holding back her locks and letting a small teardrop shaped pearl hang from a tiny gold chain in the center of her forehead. 
Making her way to the light spilling in from the window, Diame pressed against the stone wall near it to have another take at the villagers going about their business. I am supposed to be in here performing my duty of discerning divination to give Teva good news of the weather. If anyone saw me outside my home, it would cause quite a stir among the Faith of my flock. Good sister Mariden's heart would surely leap to her throat if I blatantly broke the oath of cloister, not even a good explanation would bide the ensued chaos. Not that I have one able to give... There hadn't been too much movement in the bright green outside, an indication that many who had been waiting for Mersday morning prayers had already joined with those who prepared the fields at dawn. Almost everyone in the village would be at work in the fields except the elderly who took care of the very young, or artists busy with their craft. Only a few of the acolytes stayed in the longhouse for important Church matters while others helped with village work. 
Diame thought she should be fine making her way out of town as long as she managed to pass the village gates with an unseen face. That would be best only before all would return for prayers and sup at high noon. Would I make it past the farmlands before then? She remembered the bumps drawn on the map had wriggles for the several rivers spreading out down the slopes of the Valleys of Mist. 
"Three bridges," she reminded herself, "Until the farmlands stretch no further." She thought of what might be in the lands beyond that. What places she had never stopped at in the few times she passed by them behind the screen of a carriage and protected escort. She didn't recall the procession having a single problem on the road, as it has been kept safe for travelers by spread out Ijian Knights for hundreds of years. She should make it just as swiftly and see for herself what it was like to be a real traveler out on the road.
On the table she double checked the cloth satchel if she needed anything else for the road.Within, a change of clothes, food consisting of bread, a few potatoes and a small jar of whole mudberries, a leathern flask full of cool lake water, and the bag holding the rolled up, tattered map of the region she studied her route well from.
 The rolling valley would steeply lead out of the mountainous region Teva situates on, down into wide open countryside fields where the road split, leading into many small provinces. The roads that traveled north.Would meet with many passes through the Granite mountain range, but she had no intention to take those treacherous routes. She would take the road through the Shadowed Glenn, a forest nestled between a dip in the mountains. After there, the coastline led north to the twin mountains holding Ijia Castle, town and the cathedral housing Bishop Malbourne. 
"If I am to go, then it must be now." she said with a nod of importance as she fastened the buckles of her bag then strapped the sack to her back over her shoulder. 
"I must be back before my cloister ends, yet if not..." She checked the freshly written letter addressed to Eljuk laid out to dry on the table. If he entered looking to find her, instead would be so many words asking for patience and that she intends to return as soon as she could. "I do hope I can walk this distance and be back to tend to my flock. God, forgive me for resolving to break this oath of cloister, but no other options lay at my feet."
She knelt and slipped on her soft leather boots, best fit for walking. As she tightened the laces, she glanced at the state of her broken altar, and shook her head, turning back to it her lacework. "What is done can not be undone. For every thing, this must be so." Diame tightened the knots and stood, then turned to reach for her staff laying against the cedar wardrobe and she took up the sun-whitened driftwood. It almost came up to her shoulder as she held it firmly on the ground, staring at her door.
"Well then." Diame donned the blue hood over her head and pulled back her red curls, making sure they were hidden in her robe. Taking a step to the door, she gave a smile of resolve. "To Ijia!"
As the door quietly creaked open, she stepped down into her sunny front yard enclosed by ivied fences. Diame wouldn't smell the scent of her lilacs in a while, and filled her lungs with of her garden as she marched toward the open archway leading out.

Closing the door behind him, Eljuk entered the post room and noticed Mariden in her domed nun hat, chatting with Gerard at his desk. The falconer began taking the buckles off the big glove covering his arm, and the sister turned to him with a smile.
"Eljuk, I had been waiting to ask you so many questions," Mariden began, "I was just having a little chat with postmaster Gerard, here, and I just wondered about Diame. You know, I am so at peace knowing she sees tranquil weather to come, however, this one question,"
As he put his falconers gear away, Eljuk listened to her concerns as well as he listened to the cooing of his birds in their wooden homes. "Good sister," He tried not to interrupt her rudely, "Would you accompany me to my post? I'm sure we could talk on the way."
Mariden nodded delightedly and asked many questions about Diame on their way out through the halls of the longhouse. Gerard wore a brief refrain of relief on his face as he went back to work, shuffling letters around his desk.

Behind her dark blue hood, Diame walked down the misty road between the homes and up babbling river. In the distance, the waterfalls flowing down the four square towers of the Water Temple centered the lake. Its still running waters were seated so deep, despite all its connected rivers, it looked like it never moved. A shimmering mirror surface reflected the brightness of the clouds that at last began to part, letting down a few thin sunbeam columns. The road would lead right by the waters edge to the village gates, and as she thought, many people were absent from the home lined road. She continued down the road, her face hidden and her staff taking steps beside her. 
A group of faces she knew came down the road, each carrying farm equipment. Diame kept her head down, they walked by her without heed of her. Letting a heave of relief, she kept down the road where it split in two; one path leading right to the parade grounds, the left would continue along the lakeside and towards the village gate. She went down the left road, quickening her stride by the water's edge, beside the loud crashing of the temple's waterfalls. 
A wave of light swathed over the Water Temple, Diame stopped in her tracks. The temple's towering waterfalls seemed to glow blue for a moment, then faded away to clear waters. She stood there, and felt mildly dizzy, yet that faded as well. She hadn't carried around so much water aether before, she could see where there was usually unseen spirit energy at work. She had yet to grow accustomed to seeing that glow within water outside of her meditation chambers. She continued down the road without time to ponder it. 
Down the road was the multiple storied longhouse, and past that the archway bearing 'Teva' on it appeared out of the mist. Once I am on my way, I will be unmarred from finishing what I set out to do and return. Eyes watch over me, let this be the correct path I have chosen.
Up ahead, coming down from the road leading up to the longhouse were two people. Diame thought nothing of them and kept walking at the same pace as normally as she could. The haze cleared and she could clearly see them, Eljuk in his acolyte attire with sister Mariden by his side crossing to the gate. They had glanced at her and kept walking to the gate, caught up in conversation. I will have to hide my face from my friends, and am I to be so bold as to try to pass right by them? Would they truly not recognize me? I only hope so, or my journey is cut short here and now. She shuddered at the thought of what repercussions she would face, and further at the thought of having to go back home and remain unheard! She tightened her grip on her staff and with the other hand held onto the strap of her satchel. She marched forward as inconspicuously as possible, wishfully praying that she could pass them by invisibly. The adrenaline moving her forward rushed through her, and yet started to make her feel faint.

Coming up on his usual post at the front gate, Eljuk answered as many questions of the weather and assurances to the good nun as he could. It seemed to put her at ease, talking to one who is such close friends with the High Priestess as he. Especially at a time when Diame is unable to hear her people whilst within cloister.
Eljuk leant against the column of the gate, and told Mariden only that he had been sending many letters off for Diame, and that good news is like to reply soon. She seemed delighted to hear that, and asked if he knew any more tidings. He looked up and noticed a person shrouded in a blue robe approaching to exit the gates. He wondered who it was, but decided he wouldn't harry them, and turned back to continue his talk with Mariden. 
The elderly nun held her garb tighter, brushing water droplets off the dark blue domed hat of her habit. "Has the weather not gotten a might colder lately?" She said in a shiver. "I think the mist 'as picked up quite a bit." She looked down, and indeed, the mist had thickened in pockets on the ground around them. The falconer and nun were momentarily abashed, around them there was a blanket of white. Neither could see a few paces beyond them as it seemed the night's fog had rolled back in. "Shouldn't the morning mist have passed by by now?" The good nun pointed out wisely. 
Eljuk brushed the chilled mist off his arms, thinking it was indeed odd, yet not too out of the ordinary. "'Tis just morning fog. Its course could change just as easily as a draft of wind wills." He assured her. That robed figure just appeared before him in the fog, he realized, and up close noticed the large bag. Perhaps a northern merchant has finished his visit. Of course, the gates are as free for him to use as anyone else.
"True, the Lady Priestess did say heavy rains would return. Perhaps the valley will be as bountiful as ever this spring." A wide grin split the kind wrinkles of her face, "More rain means more berries, which mean more mudberry pie!" she said excitedly. "And other kinds as well, have you tried the..."
"Aye," He turned back to her and continued, "I can not wait for this next harvest either," The hooded person passed behind Mariden as she asked Eljuk what his favorite feast time food was so she would prepare some for him. He turned back, "Oh, that isn't necessary, good sister," Eljuk searched again for the robed person, and he or she already had passed out the gate, vanishing into a blanket of white fog. "Indeed, I do enjoy shepherds pie," he said distractedly.
A chill seemed to be lifted from the air, and all around them, the brightness of day warmed him and the nun. The sight-hindering fog rolled away as quickly as it had settled in, and he could once again see the lake housing the Water Temple as clearly as he could before, only now noticing it was out of vision a moment ago.
"Well, looks like the wind did change after all." Mariden straightened her back, enjoying the sunlight. "Strange times for the weather to be changing so suddenly."
"Aye." Only now Eljuk thought it was a little peculiar the mist coalesced so thickly like that. Strange goings on were happening today, he wondered if Maji was faring well in such weather. Staring up at the road, the mist had cleared, and that traveling person in the blue robe was far up the hill, and already descending down the slope, disappearing behind it completely. He turned back to the good nun and although he continued the conversation, a thought nagged at the back of his mind. Who could that fellow have been? 

The sound of water grew louder as she descended down the slope of the first hill to the first river. Diame kept her pace forward as the dirt road led into the stone bricked bridge across. Ahead the dirt road was lined with large fields that stretched out far down, up an down hills, sometimes sloping down and disappearing into mist. 
Diame heard the chatter of the people as they hacked off ears of husked blue corn with sickles and filled baskets with as many as they could carry, then in turn take all they had to one of many central domed buildings centered between the crops. All were far too busy to see beyond their work, she hoped, and no one seemed to be down the road, only in the fields. She kept her hood down and walked staff in hand, up and down the bounding hills of the valley. 
Down another hill, she caught sight of the second river up ahead, and down the road a little ways was the next stone bridge. She kept having spells of dizziness every so often, but she related it to how nervous she was, sneaking by a hundred or so people who would all but recognize her. Nearly halfway out of Teva, I have only just begun what I set out to do, and the brisk wind is at my back. My path's fortune must indeed be watched over. She continued the march of her boots through the loamy earth, the bridge just over the next big hill.

Knelt close to the ground, Jilda plucked a ripe handful of mudberries from one of the countless small shrubs growing in the acre, and stuffed them into her basket, her haul already nearly full. She dusted the dirt and dark purple berry juice off her hands on the already dirty white apron of her gray work uniform, and looked up out from her sunhat. She had been keeping a close watch on young Sindha who had only just begun to work alongside her. She too had a basket full of berries, if it be a smaller one. Kneeling there beside her, she was just at her eye level, "Very good, I believe that's your last one the morning." She said with gentle cheer. "You've worked so hard, forty baskets full already." 
Sindha looked tiredly up from underneath her straw hat. The exhaustion on her face was replaced with a touch of excitement as she asked, "May I go play at Edjar's house?"
"Aye, my bunny. Of course you may," Jilda straightened a red curl of her daughter's hair out of her face, "Right after you deliver your last basket, go straight home. I have many more berries to pick," she motioned to the rest of the farmland.
"Aye, mum." The girl said as she ran off in the mudberry field to the closest domed central building to drop off her reaped bounty. In through the blue stone archway she went, inside there were giant wooden bushels bursting full of the thumb-sized, purple berries. She emptied her basket into a smaller bushel, and set it beside there. When she would be old enough to use a sickle, she'd farm corn ears, but for now, picking mudberries and beets. She left the same way she came, and headed for the path back to the village homes.

Taking her first step onto the bridge, Diame swept her hand down the cool stone railing as she crossed. She leant over to see her hooded reflection waving in the babbling current as it stared back at her. Her knowing blue eyes even gazing into herself, questioning yet again if her actions are necessary. Must I truly abandon the holy oaths that I have yet sworn to God and Lux Grande to uphold? The vow of cloister is to be upheld as any other sacred duties of the High Priesthood. I do not have my title by virtue of not being within my chambers meditating at this very moment. She shook her head, "I already made the decision to leave. To ensure the warning of my ineffable swevens reach the ears of the Bishop. The Church must know what can be done, for what am I to do by myself entrusted with what sights God has shown me?" She sharply reminded herself her important message would get nowhere by her just standing there. If she had a rock in her hand, she would have thrown it into the river. Diame turned, and a small figure emerged out of the mist in the middle of the bridge. She nearly jumped out of her robe, as she recognized Sindha standing there in her sunhat and field worn clothes. Fearing the child had seen her, she grabbed at her hood, tugging it over her face, hoping it remained hidden and unrecognizable. She took a step to continue walking, hoping to pass her by as if she never stopped.
"Bonnie weather this morn, aye, your holiness?" Sindha said sweetly as she stood there, tired yet willfully expectant for an answer.
She saw my face and recognized me right on the spot. All the pain of her lost hopes grieved her hidden face, Diame then stopped dead in her tracks, mouth agape with shock. She feared having to return, to answer the town for having broken cloister. Why did I do it? Why did I break my oath? I am a fool who couldn't have held onto her virtue of patience just a little longer to see the near day His Grace's will send swift reply! She stood holding her weight on her staff, her journey cut short. Then she saw Sindha's bright eyes staring at her, awaiting answer still. Diame realized she had been afraid of a child, she hid her face from innocence which sees naught evil, nary wrongdoing. "Aye, bonnie weather indeed." Diame worked the words out with what air she had to wring from breathless surprise.
"Mum said I could go play at Edjar's house." Sindha smiled, "I picked forty baskets full of mudberries today!" she looked exhausted, yet proud, and showed off hands stained violet with juice to show it.
"O-oh, did you now?" Diame shifted her travel sack as she listened to the girl excitedly talk of how she would skip stones with Edjar, and how she was better at it than he. Eyes watch over me, what do I do? Anyone else would know I was supposed to be in my home now, yet would I lie to her for her to believe otherwise? Nay, I would never rewrite the rules of the Faith to benefit what I seek out to do. Yet, this child hasn't even questioned why I am out on the road. Could I possibly still be able to leave now? Oh, mercy of God, I would have rather passed in silence than have to lie to a child! Is that what my visions called for me to do? Wait, my visions did say... She recalled her vision, seeing Sindha and Edjar dancing together in the lit up parade grounds and a transparent yet bright red string tied their ring fingers together. "You said you have been playing with little Edjar as of late?" Diame asked, curiously.
"Aye, he always tries to skip stones farther, but I've beat him in anything he could do at least once. But he can still pick berries faster than me, for sure." Sindha gave a stout nod to that fact.
Two lives have already begun to intertwine as an early childhood friendship. What fate I have seen as matured in the future hasn't sprouted and is still within in its first seeds, unshelled and freshly sown into the present. Diame knelt down to meet face to face with Sindha's, listening to the lass talk of childhood games as the priestess still searched for the right words to say. She wouldn't lie nor make up a wild story, and she had to continue her clandestine journey soon before it turned very short lived. As I learn of something shown to me confirmed, here and now, does that not mean everything else I have seen hold the same merit as well? Is this not where I am supposed to be right now, right at this very moment, listening to Sindha speak fondly of Edjar to confirm everything else in the future? She began to feel dizzy, yet she kept herself clear and knew what she would say. "Sindha," she began, serene and calmly, "I have a secret I must tell you."
Bemused at being stopped mid story, the child simply replied, "What?"
"I am to sojourn far away," The priestess tried not to stumble over her words as she spoke, "and do something," she continued on while staring into those prying, innocent eyes of the young girl sharing the same Faith. "very important." 
"You're leaving Teva?" The girl asked, curiously piqued with confusion.
Diame nodded to her awaiting stare with a smile she had to find the strength to bear. "That's right."
Precociously, the lass crossed her arms, "Where are you going? Why?"
What she had to tell her felt as difficult as akin to speaking while one swallowed rocks. "I know I break cloister and countless oaths, including to never leave the safe watch of the Church, but I... I..." The young girl gazed back, listening as the same as she ever was. Diame realized she was confessing it all out in a panic as if she were worried that Sindha, who was merely mocking her in jest with those folded arms, would have sent her home! Holy Mother, I see the light now. I held fear in my heart, and it disuaded me from seeing the obvious innocence of a child. I thought she would judge as well as sentance me for breaking sacred oaths! She calmly took a deep breath, and slowly she began. "At an urgent behest must I go to the northern kingdom, you know of Ijia, yes?"
"Aye, I do. Thats where my dada is. He's in the Grayguard, you know." She lightened up excitedly at the thought of her father. Sindha plucked one of the yellow petals from the daisy in her sun hat, and began to finger with it, lost in thought.
Diame gave her a smile of relief, "Aye, so, that is where I am going. And I need to be farther down the road before God moves the sun a hairbredth more." She paused thoughtfully, and continued on. "Sindha, I have an important, Eyes watch over me, of the highest importance, favor to burden up on asking of you." 
"What kind of favor?"
"Well, you see," The truth. She must know, if it truly befits fate. "You and I and God are the only ones in the world who know of the journey I am to partake on. I beg of you not to tell anyone that we spoke, or that you saw me outside of my home, or that you know anything of me traveling. Please, promise me you will keep it a secret from everyone else." The child looked at her for a long time, with those unwavering, innocent eyes. Diame wasn't sure what the child's intentions were, but the lass looked like she was thoughtfully planning her response. "Sindha, I trust you with my whole heart, but please just tell me that you do too. Will you promise?" Diame felt the humbleness of being at the mercy of a child's whim. 
After taking a long time to stare at the flower petal in her hands, Sindha smirked and turned back to Diame. "Alright. I promise you." She smiled even bigger, "Under one condition."
Diame blinked diffidently.
Sindha giggled as she pulled the daisy from her hat, and held it forward, motioning to put it in Diame's hand. "If you go to Ijia, and you happen to see my dada..." seemingly to correct herself at the seriousness of her request. "My father. Give this to my father for me. Would you please?"
Giving a sigh of relief, Diame shrugged her travel bag off to one side, "Of course I will." She opened the bag holding the folded map and took the flower, carefully placing it flatly in the folds on the map. "I'll try my best." As she said it, she wanted to do better than that for someone who will keep her secret journey just such. "I do put my Faith in God that while I do not know now how it will happen, I believe this flower will indeed reach the hands of your father." She closed the buckles on her bag up and reshouldered the straps. "And you promise? You can not tell anyone I am traveling. Not Mariden, nor your mother, nor Edjar. Not a soul."
"I promise." Sindha looked at her excitedly, as if memories of her father danced in her mind.
Standing upright, Diame smiled down at the girl. "I will return as soon as I can. Only then will I be able to explain all to you, God willing." She continued as she motioned down the road with her staff,  "Now I must be off. You are a very clever lass to recognize me where I did sneak past everyone else."
"Oh it was easy to spot you." The girl said confidently. "When you leant over the bridge, your hair spilled out a little from your hood." She motioned to her own hair, "No one else here has red hair except us. I saw you right away!" Sindha giggled proudly.
Closing her gaped mouth, Diame playfully poked the girl on her nose. "A very, very clever young lass indeed." 
The girl giggled again and skipped down the bridge towards the sloping road returning to the village. She turned back and yelled, "Safe journeys!" and Sindha disappeared into mist as she ran over the hill.
Standing there, Diame gathered her wits once again. Putting her walking staff forward, she crossed the second bridge of stone. This far out from the main village the farmland seemed less endless, blending into green fields and wild growing shrubery. She usually didn't walk this far out from the village gates, and saw some unfamiliar bends in the road as she traveled onward over misty hills. Around her in short, leafey stalks were patches tended to by villagers, dutifully digging up potatoes. They were more scattered about the open fields, and kept to their work. 
Up and over another particularly large hill, the third bridge seemed to blend in with the river through the thick clouds of mist hovering over the water. She couldn't help but increase her pace, nearly away from every familiar face. She had fond thoughts of Sindha, the precocious youth would surely keep the knowledge of her journey between them. I trust that girl, and she is one of my friends, as many in my flock are. But, as she is a child, could she handle the task of keeping such a secret? She reminded herself of the flower pressed within the map, and the promise she made as well. She sighed dutifully as she came up on the third bridge. 
"No matter the circumstances, it seems to be my fate to leave today, come what may. I just hope I will stray from making any more idle words, Ijia is of difinitive distance from where I am now..." The blankets of mist around her were layered so thickly she couldn't see where the bridge ended and the road would begin again, yet blue stone still continued on as she crossed. The loud echoes of the churning River Merae carried up the tree-thick pillars that held up the bridge, and yet all past the bridge railings remained unseen within the billowing fogbank. I could see my staff start to disappear if I pointed it out. All around her, the mist swirled eerily in small patches, coalescesing clouds into odd shapes. She swore she saw a flash of blue light, and she blinked several times taking a double look of what that was ahead. She saw nothing but clouds that bent into shapes that could be small animals, some wisps looked like plumes of wings carved by air. Others were small and white, like faces of rabbits. She kept on into the fog,  leaning heavily on her staff as she walked feeling a touch faint. I must be imagining things, or perhaps the aether here is strongly stirred by the powerful Tevan waters. 
The sound of her boots hitting soft soil let Diame know she had reached the other side. She went up yet another upward slope, a much steeper hill that dwarfed the others behind her. There will not be another bridge, perhaps not another hill either. Have I passed all of the farmlands? Am I beyond the boundries of Teva yet? She wondered with near excitement as she reached the summit of the misty hill what sights there were to behold. The fog had thinned around the higher ground, and it cooly hovered a foot off a wide, flat field of green grass. The morning blue sky was above, revealed after being shrouded for so long, Diame felt like she must have just walked through the clouds into the heavens. A lone juniper glistening with dewdrops stood next to a road sign, a wood-carved arrow pointed back and read 'Teva', the other sign pointing north to 'Ijian Lands'. As Diame passed through the plateau, the path seemed to sharply end as if it went off of a cliff's edge. 
There were no other hills around her she could see, no other farmlands or people on the road, just the veil of mist that descended down slopes leading back into the valley. The closer she got to the edge, she could see the path suddenly swooped low from the tall hill, descending thereafter, darting left and right down around hills that were each smaller than one after as the sloped earth descended, carrying a series of spread out rivers downhill with it. The parted clouds filled the wide open grassy fields full of bright morning sunlight, the long road below looked so small, so distant. The land encircled the mountainrange she stood on top of, everywhere she looked was boundless earth. Blocking the blue skies with cloudcapped peaks was another mountainrange that dwarfed the one she stood on, in the distance a sturdy wall of earth separated the lands. Diame knew she would pass through the forest nestled between the rockface, and Ijia would be right on the other side.
The High Priestess stood over the cliffside, in taking the sight of the wide open lands below, stretching on all around  her. The path carried down in wide zig-zags, carrying billows of rolling fog with it. When the path reached the base of the green mountain, she would be in wide open fields, bright with the sun's rays. Even though Diame had just begun her journey, taking the first few steps descending the downbent slope, she felt as though she was already ahead on her way. 

Standing leant up against the archway into town, Eljuk continued his chat with Mariden where he mostly listened. They mostly talked about the weather and when Diame would find more answers to her swevens. Then on feastday, Mariden proudly explained she was planning to make several kinds of pies for all the children, and most would be mudberry. Eljuk nodded and listened, and all the talk of food made him think if it was noon sup yet. Down the road a little ways, he spotted a girl in a hat, spry and skipping towards them. 
Mariden followed where the townguardsman was looking with her own gaze, and he face beamed. "Oh, a little one has returned from the fields. They grow up so fast once they begin to harvest with all the farmfolk." Her face beamed fondly, remembering how many of Teva's children she had helped raise and instilled with good Faith. She squint her pale blue eyes peering through the thinning mist, trying to make out the child's face, "Mine experienced eyes can't see who that would be, can you?"
"Sindha Elmrose." Eljuk stated. The falconer's brown eyes were as sharp as any bird he had raised. 
"A very bonnie lass she be, and even still for all the field work she has been put to. Her mum must be so proud. She always adorns freshly picked flowers from their garden on her." Mariden's smile widened as the lass continued her skip to the gates, slowing down to a stop as she was welcomed by the nun and acolyte. "Eyes watch over you, child. Done with picking berries this morn already?"
"Aye, Good Sister. Forty baskets, I did gather." Sindha's she held up her violet stained hands proudly as proof. "And now I can change dress and play stones with Edjar." She said as her eyes brightened .
"Oh to have only seen seven summers again, lass." Mariden mused.
"Eight!" The girl corrected her.
 "Eyes watch over me. Eight summers old," the nun knelt over and pinched the young ones rosey cheek. "Then may you enjoy the day, child." Only being so close Mariden had noticed Sindha's flower missing from her straw hat. "I swore I saw you with a daisy in your hair today. Where did it go off to, hmm?" She asked with playful curiosity.
"That is being carried to my father with..." Sindha said absently, then was replaced with the look of guilt.
"Hmnm?" The good nun leaned in closer, unsure if she had heard the answer or not. "Carried it to your father?" The confusion unsettled her. Did her father return from Ijia already? Was he here for a short amount of time and no one told her? She would have known something like that. "Forgive my old ears, child, what did you say?"
"Um..." Without thinking too much of it, Sindha resumed skipping down the pathway by the river. "The flower was carried off... by the wind!" And off she went.
Mariden frowned thoughtfully, then chuckled, amused by the childhood antics. "Ah, children. Speaking of, the little ones have probably finished with their naps by now." She turned and have a nod of the head to Eljuk, "I'll be off to the schoolroom. Take care, Brother Eljuk." Taking her time, she folded her hands beneath the big blue sleeves of her habit, and walked with her head up towards the acolyte's longhouse.
Straightening up his dark blue vest, the fastidious falconer stood guard unarmed by his post, his sword would not be necessary after the safety of dawn had come. Many would pass by soon, merchants to trade goods for the bounties of Teva, traveling pilgrims come to see the temple. Then in a few hours, everyone who was out in the fields would return for noon prayers and sup. 
Dutifully, he leant against the wooden archway, awaiting to meet the faces of passersby with his regular greeting. If any needed his assistance, he showed the kindness of the Faith and did all in his power to help. All seemed to be well, though, for none had asked for naught but a good morrow so far, and whatever divine adivce Lady Diame needed she had found it, and was communing to learn more. The only thing that truly bothered him was his birds kept returning without a reply letter, yet they were obviously handled by someone else. A message tube cannot be opened without it having to carefully remove it from the bird's talon. Then the wax can be safely cut off and the bone tube would open, their postmaster would keep that one and send a newly sealed letter, reaffixed back onto the same bird and sent back. However, all the capsules he recieved were his own returned to him, opened and emptied! He wondered what the cryptic meaning behind what the Church meant to convey. His Faith knew he would get a response, but he knew not if the next pigeon would also return home, once again empty taloned. He heaved a heavy pang of worry for Maji, hoping that the Church's post is not mishandling his birds. Perishing the thought, he relaxed his tanned shoulders as he patiently waited for the swathes of early light to begin taking away the chill of morning mist.

At a downhill pace descending the grassy mountainside's well worn path, Diame kept her pace steadily with walking staff in hand. She hadn't been out from the village this far out on her own in so long, it surprised her that after so many steps she felt not the least bit tired. She breathed in of the cool air around her, and passed in and out of the sunlight and shadow of the mountainside as she wove her way in between tall stalks of grass and small, rocky hills. Trees populated the road more the lower she went, fog blankets rolled over the needles of pine branches as she passed through lightbeams drifting in their shade. 
Coming out from the grove, Diame stood to take a sip from her water flask. Overlooking below from a bright cliffside, her path down the mountain would continue for sometime, then she saw the earthern path split into many as soon as it descended to sunny, wide open lands. Gauging by how much of the mountain was above her, she was about halfway down the trail, the cloud capped peaks of the taller mountain in the distance seemed to have grown farther. High in the faintest distance, she swore she saw something aflight, drifting in and out of clouds. Perhaps an eagle. She thought absently. 
Gathering her courage, the priestess closed up her pack and shifted the hood of her blue robe. Diame turned to the steep trail leading down beside her and marched onwards. Thoughts of what Ijia would be like all on her own crossed her mind, and then she reminded herself she was taking this journey for duty and Faith, not for a personal trip. She began thinking of what she would say to Bishop Malbourne as soon as she arrived at the Great Cathdral of Ijia. She would have to explain why she would be before him, out of cloister, unannounced and without guard. For important enough reasons of seeing violent swevens beyond comprehension, he should understand and lend ear. In special circumstances, High Priesthood could convey visions to higher religious counsel, she was confident the good bishop would understand this. Diame hoped that what she had seen will be told directly to the holy Pontiff herself, for she could assess divine meanings and mitigate a solution within the highest kept secrecy. She would have to be very careful not to identify herself on the road, not until she had made it safely to Ijia. Diame would travel as villager from far out in the country going on a religious journey. She began thinking of an alias for herself, something that would befit a young pilgrim.
She felt the invisible weight of a presence on her back, and she felt like someone was gazing down at her. The high priestess crooked her neck skyward and saw naught but the clouded, bright blue sky reach to lands beyond. Diame knew she had felt something, but anything out of the ordinary was unknown for this far from her home. She wondered about the aether that overflowed in her mind, if it was causing her to percieve things and make her feel light headed, yet she saw nothing and felt not the slightest bit dizzy. She shrugged and kept on the road, intent on making the journey to Ijia by tomorrow night without distraction. She accredited what she felt to the presence of God, and uttered a silent prayer asking for Her watchful eyes to give her the strength to see her path through. 
Down through the mist, Diame continued her march. Her blue eyes cast forward full of resolve for the descisions she had made. It would be better to bend some of the rules of the Church if it were necessary to protect it from an unforseen threat, she believed. She made the descision to sneak out not only as a High Priestess, but she took on this difficult task as a single person. She was traveling alone, unarmed for whatever danger that could lie ahead, and boldly breaking rules that have been in place for far longer than she has been alive. She had sworn oaths before all the other High Priesthood within Lux Grande, sworn to the Pontiff herself she understood it was the duty of her Faith to guard Teva, the Water Temple and its sacred lake and rivers. Now here she was, walking away from her duties of cloister, and only she knew the reason why. But she knew all this, and was well aware of consequences her actions could incur. For all the heavy weight of her thoughts, Diame did not stop the sound of her boots grinding the soft ground.

Perched high atop a tall tree, Maji took a fleeting moment to rest his wings. Overlooking the lands before him, he waited until the faintest wisp of the sweet scent of moonblossoms carried over the mountains. The pigeon-hawk's round dark eyes focused at a distance on a cloaked human walking alongside the mountainside trail. Though Diame was completely covered in the blue robe, Maji recognized her by her familiar scent and gait. The bird turned his head curiously, and then scanned the land ahead. There would be many places to land on the way, he decided, and the scent carrying him north was faint. With patience, he tightened his talons, gripping against the tree boughs shaking with blows of wind until they had calmed once more. The purple letter capsule dangled only a short distance from his claw, yet he was mindful of it and he knew he was to deliver it by training by his falconer. He ruffled the white with dark spots of his breast feathers and shivered his wings until mist droplets rolled off his brown, dark tipped pinions.
There was an updraft of warm wind, Maji could feel the strong gust and knew this would be a good breeze to catch. Then the smell wafted into his bright yellow beak, the unmistakeable sweetness of moonblossoms, albeit mixed in with a cornucopia of other fresh, unfamiliar scents. Spreading his wings, he felt the gust beneath lift him. He leapt up from the tree flapping his wings and immediately took flight, leaving the mountainside and soaring across the rolling green land beneath. Up ahead, bright green lands were open to him to glide across, following the faint scent of moonblossoms.





	II.2. The Din of Lions

	THE GENERAL OF THE PALADINS, clad in his white battle uniform, listened to the heated words exchange from the hot pokers for tongues of military men and advisors from the nobility. The topic of discussion this morning had remained unchanged every morning in the wake of a furious attack launched by the Empire of Pevali, directed on the castle itself. The kingdom's casualties consisted of citizens as well as knights, the most devestating was the loss of the leader of one of their armies, the Shadow Knights. Sitting in a circle, they congregated yet again within the domed royal conference hall of Ijia. The general in white sat calmly in a large seat of lacquered wood with a small cushion on it, as did the others, though most had leapt out of their seats shouting time to time. He had shoulder length hair the color of the sun, parted down the middle and down the sides of his face, tied in the back.
	Near the head of the gigantic, oval table of lacquered blue, he was seated to the right-hand of Ijia's Queen, sitting sternly on a purple cushion placed on a high backed seat made of intricately worked gold and silver, inlaid with glistening sapphires. At first glance one might mistake it for her regal throne, yet the way she sat upright, stiff-necked and with her displeased, folded arms, one would simply think twice. Her dark hair the color of the sea coiled around a diadem made of astralite silver, centered with three giant gemstones; a dark sapphire, a blood violet ruby and a color shifting alexandrite. Hair of blue flowed down her back and spilled over her shoulders of a mid-necked regal dress of darker hue. Her long locks were pulled back revealing the power in her regal seriousness worn on her youthful face of the fairest beauty. Queen Senna's sky colored eyes carefully met with each who spoke, and gave hard looks to those who shouted out of turn, but did little else to mitigate her people in the justified uproar.
	The General of the Paladins focused his golden green eyes out through the large glass and gold windows at the bright sunlight dancing atop the blue trees growing from below in the castle courtyard. Althought he took in the important words spoken all around him, the waited to truly give his full attention when the Queen spoke. He had been shouting in the outrage along with the others in the first few days since the attack, but now, after a week of using his strength to rebuild castle and city, help with healing of the wounded, much more to weigh out and decide orders to give, it was all he could do but sit and endure their shouts. He was well aware of what commands that needed to given to his Paladin soldiers, and it seemed there was nothing new to hear here but the ever renewing voices of rage, he wished the meeting concluded and all be satisfied so he could be out and on with his important tasks at present. 
	The Queen at her throne monitored the words her people spoken before her, the Paladin General by her side along with many other uniformed countrymen of distinguished rank and house, and all had to endure the voice of the other most important person in Ijia, a high officer of the Shadow Knights, the second in command. Since the enemy attack, it had been unknown if their missing general had been felled or captured, but it had not stopped the man next in command from voicing his opinions as vocally as if he now lead the Shadow Knights. He had not sat down once in any of the morning meetings and had been ruthlessly speaking of mustering Ijia's armies to vy for revenge. Nearly everyone who spoke of repairing the damage to Ijia, castle or town, were given harsh words by the Shadow Knight general clad in dark armor. Retalliation was the only action deigned worthy by him, and he made that all too well known by not letting a word go by without him having two more to rebuttle it. 
	A member of Shadow nobility outragedly spoke up, talking of how his home was completely destroyed, his family wounded and all he had was his name left. The sum of the choice words he angrily spat out at the Shadow Knight general ammounted to his belief that his mind set only for war was a disgrace to the kingdom as well as her queen, his strong disdain for the general and his disgrace to the Shadow and its nobility, and he would never lead Ijia's Shadow Knights as well as their missing leader, next in command or no. Though he very firmly kept his concerns over the shouts of the officer, his cadence neared a deafening battlecry.
	The unamused Paladin General noticed the same look of exasperated patience on his queen's face as well, yet for whatever reason, she decided still to withhold her words. He idly fingered one of the silvery whitesteel plates covering his shoulders through his white gloves. 
	Taking large notice of her General's shared frustration, the queen turned to him and leant over her golden armrest, speaking in a normal voice with words meant only for him. "Sir Xavier, rest assured I intend to shorten this morning's debacle to a few short words in a moment. It is important I hear Nobleman Onyxbeard finish the words of his losses, albeit if they are shouted. I do understand his pain." She gave General Xavier a knowing nod.
	 Patiently he, too, would hold his words. The meeting couldn't possibly continue on too much longer than it already has by how chaotic it has turned. The daily tirade should be over soon, yet none too soon. With their leader gone, is Magnus just assuming his rightful place, fit to command the Shadow Knights? Yet he speaks against helping those in his same house! Is he trying to make it clear he has the audacity to take over command without Her Majesty's concent, merely because we are rightfully just at returning an attack? Or is he clamoring for war sheerly seeking revenge for wounded Shadow Knight pride? With General Tavian gone, he has shown nigh naught regard for the processes of the kingdom or how the Knights select their new leader. His rage makes him bark out orders and strategies before he even thinks! I may not have understood the actions of Tavian Drakon, nor why he was selected by them to be the Shadow Knight's leader, but the thought of Magnus as their general would be akin to watching a wild bull in uniform. As the words in the room escalated in ire, General Xavier began to think his patience a might tried. He nearly raised his voice to quiet everyone in the room himself, but it would serve no purpose to do so. Her Majesty will speak when the time comes and she is good and ready to say something that will cease his senseless spectacle. Looking out the window once more, beyond the castle walls, a platoon of Paladins marched by, carrying litters containing a fistful of injured civilians. Xavier's hands wrung in his gloves, infuriated. I do think I will excuse myself after all, there are far better things I could be doing now to the benefit of Ijia's people than listen to this any longer. He was about to stand, but then a bright flash of green streaked outside as a hummingbird darted by the courtyard.
"Nay, Onyxbeard! You blind fool!" Magnus snarled at the nobleman, whose eyes nearly popped out of his head and shifted his dark beard as he diffidently sat back down. "What is Ijia to you cowards?" He said in a howl, his harsh words resonated sharply in the echo of the chamber. "Why do you all not see we must muster our armies to strike back at the Pevali devils!" The general in dark battle armor shouted, smashing his fist hard against the mirror-like polish of the blue table, making his statement seem even louder. Some of the painted figurines of soldiers wobbled from their strategic locations above Ijian and Pevali continents on a large splayed out map of Caelutera. 
From within the conference room, all pairs of stares from the seated nobility and high ranking Ijian knights were all up on him; Gray Guard, Shadow Knight and Paladin alike. His outburst for sure garnered the attention of the queen, who sat opposite to him, arms folded and clearly vexed as if he overstepped himself, yet staring back with discerning authority intent on hearing all the words he had to say. 
With all focus on him, his frustration peaked to over the top levels as he twisted his thin lips on his pale, sweaty face to a glower. The Shadow Knight nearly roared as he spoke. "I say this to all of you who claim you care for Ijia's peace!" Magnus paused to meet with the eyes of the Queen and mostly of the Shadow Knights and nobility. "Your Majesty, distinguished members of the Ijian Armies, Shadow Knights and nobility that share mine own blood," he soothed his tone mildly while he addressed them, "What is it we are to do? Helplessly wait within castle walls for them to crumble in the empire's next attack? Before, it was a mere test of how we would defend ourselves, and mark my words, in the future if Peval wished us to perish with a single strike, they would at whim!" Magnus raised his fists and slammed them against the large conference table, his face turning red as he shouted, "Does the spilt blood of Ijian citizens and loss of brothers in arms not make us sound the call to war?! If not, then let us merely sit here and comfortably lick our wounds akin to, to, whimpering wounded dogs!" Some of the nobility of both sides mouthes dropped as knights of different ranks and uniform began to shout back, but it did not stop his fist at grinding against a stack of paperworks bearing important royal seals he cared not if he wrinkled. 
"What was but a small attack by sea for the Pevali Imperial Fleet nearly destroyed one of our castle's great walls!" Continuing, Magnus motioned to a place on the map showing a strategic layout of the castle, and lines crossed out one of four walls surrounding the main palace. "Tell me, do we know when their next skirmish will be? Nay!" He slammed his fist again, "Do we know if they plan to send another ten-thousand men? Or perhaps an assault of a hundred-thousand men? I say to you all, nay!" With his black gloved hands, Magnus grabbed up and wrinkled the paperwork, throwing them to the ground. "We wait in this hall, all talk of rebuilding what was lost, soothing the injured living, mourning for lost lives, whist we are ever afeared of the Peval threat! Citizens cow wearily in the streets, walking hunched over with their heads fearfully turned to the sky as if nooses loomed from the heavens o'er them! Have we not have sacrificed enough of our Ijian spirit? Why hold back our strength any longer? If the Shadow Knights launch a descicive strike here," He pointed to dark colored miniature soldiers on the world map, nearly the entire reserve of Ijia's Shadow Knights he would command, and motioned the figurines across the ocean to several strategically marked places alongside the continent in Pevali territory. 
"Your Highness, simply give the word, and I will lead an assualt that would stop the Pevali Legions' rats dead in their tracks." The Shadow Knight General walked back and forth, snarling lowly. He no longer shouted but now seemed to invest that all that shouting before had built virtue into the boldness of his plan. "Our own spies risked their lives to return with valuable secrets of the Peval Empire's military, knowledge that exposes their munitians and supply routes, military training camps, factories forging weapons for their masses. Do we turn a blind eye to the fact that Peval is now actively in the pursuit of war and conquest yet again by breaking the peace pact by this cowardly attack. Ijia's men were sent to die and some returned with their tongues cut out to retrieve this knowledge we wield, our hand can return a crushing blow, and yet, we choose to yield! I, for one, do not wish the see day the Kindgom of Ijia is but a memory and bloody Emperor Kilnero rolls our bloody heads out to display on bloody steaks!"
"Do you truly wish to see the Kingdom of Ijia flourish in peacetime, with stability secured for its future, Lord Magnus?" The Queen calmly spoke over the quiet following the end of the man's last shouts before the room's outraged ones could begin. More silence followed, layers billowed in its heavyness as eyes and heads swung from the queen in her jeweled seat back to focus on the general, frozen in his pace. 
Xavier had all eyes on the queen, taking in the deeper meaning of her words. Senna is suggesting not only that Magnus's plan would lead Ijia to ruin, but she also questions him on his intentions. Depending on how he responds, he will be either singing the cadance of humble apology or defend his foolish delusions. The Paladin General shifted in his seat as well, eyes carefully watching the queen as well as Magnus.
Senna was regel and serene as she had ever been, yet the judging gaze of her enigmatic eyes couldn't even describe the incredulous look the Shadow Knight's leader beared on his face. "I have heard you beat the drums of war, ne'er ceacing your retalitory words once." Magnus opened his mouth to speak and quickly closed it. Senna gave him a thoughtful pause to hold his silence merely by a gaze across the table. "For the sake of keeping our Kingdom Ijia's longevity strong, her knights are to defend her people. We maintain Caelutera's peace by not striking back at our enemies and we have nothing to gain by becoming warminded like them." She gave another thoughtful pause, her tone noticeably wistful. "Bloodshed begetting bloodshed is not the way to maintain any sort of peace or stability in this world. We do not know what the empire means to gain by their lust for violence, for God gives us life to live off the bounty of her land, not to kill one another for control over it. Imagine the countless casualties the townsfolk face on either side of the battlefield, even the families of common and nobility alike must bury their kin. It is they who find it the most impossible to maintain daily life without fear now. The sudden attack does indeed mean Peval intends to break the peace of Caelutera once more, but I stand firm in saying Ijia will hold to her ground. In doing such, we show that we stand for peace. We bolster our defenses and prepare to respond if they threaten us again, and I do believe they will, we can only wait prepared for when that time comes. Is that not so, Lord Lieutenant Magnus? What say you is the best way to keep the peace of Caelutera, countryman?" She kept her stare firmly up on him. 
Xavier along with the other listeners in the room eagerly awaitied Magnus's response. He wondered if the Shadow Knight officer would continue rallying everyone for war yet again, or come to his senses and agree with his all too merciful queen. He would have to say something now. 
Straightening out his back and coat, Magnus stood rigidly beside his seat, carefully thinking of a response that would satisfy the queen's line of questioning, yet he did not want to back down at all from his strong stance. "Your highness, I do not mean to let my passionate words have me appear as though I have forgotten my better judgment. Defending Ijia is of the highest importance, and after we were raided by Peval's surprise attack, we were ill prepared for such a thing. After they fired some sort of cannon at us by sea, our walls fell, they came ashore and we had to repel them from that newly made gap. Your excellency, I beg your pardon, but I fear that for all the vastness of her Three Armies, what Ijia has to defend for her defenses may simply not be enough. If they truly outnumber and out supply us, they can wear us down over time with several of these attacks. Where will we be when they have us cut off from our resources? Our strategic positions?" 
Her Highness certainly does appear to be genuinely weighing his words. Xavier noticed the Queen's stern eyes seem to sway in their harshness as she thoughtfully listened to Magnus explain that he believed the direst of possibilities is up on the kingdom, while we would never wish to accept it as true. Carefully listening to Magnus's choice of words and gauging the Queen's reaction, Xavier sat patiently, feeling a heaviness in the conference hall's air. Though the man has a reasonable arguement, we already know a second strike will happen as an inevitablity. The Paladins as well as the Shadow Knights are presently recovering Ijia's defenses to meet with the future threat of Pevali Legions, or any threat for that matter. Ijia can do nothing more for her people but rebuild her walls anew, grow our ranks and hone the powerful magicks Ijia houses. We actively protect ourselves in bolsering our resources, however, the empire has endless ships and if they wished to, send countless soldiers to their deaths merely to tire us out. Disconcerting, to be sure. The General of the Paladins leaned forward in his seat, listening carefully to each word spoken from the man clad in black.
"... After suffering innumerable casualties, along with the great loss of the Shadow Knight's leader, Lord General Tavian Drakon," Magnus took pause to close his eyes for a moment to mourn the loss of his commanding officer. "I can only voice my concerns, for Peval has already taken over all of the Kestmarch territorries, every kingdom on the continent has either resisted and fallen or is taxed into servitude. It is clear, their attacks are sighted on us next." He stated sounding calm in his dire words.
After a deep breath of haughty regalness, Senna gave him a slight nod as if to suggest his points were valid. She did not take her unyielding blue eyes off him as the queen continued her questions. "These concerns for them to overtake Ijia in the future have been discussed in the last few days, after the urgency to give commands to undo the damage done, we may have overlooked the seriousness of the Peval theat." Shifting her gaze once, her eyes flared with concern, then she returned to him, voice as hard as steel. "Sir Magnus, I would be dishonest if I said I did not share the same concerns as you. Ijia must not fall, I'm open to hearing if you have any other suggestions. We never know what strategies we could be forced to resort to in the end." She finished with a tone that sounded more grim than intended.
"My Queen, I fear that we have little time to prepare if Peval wishes to send another attack, and within a year they can cut us off from these vital strategic points, here, and here," he marked some points on the map nearby him, "And, Your Highness,"
Now Magnus has her feeding on rotten words right out of his hand. He does have many good reasons, and yes we were attacked, but we do not know the empire's true intentions. Do they wish to provoke war over the vastness of Caelutera's seas? Nay, that would be a more foolish waste of their resources than ours. Could I be mistaken if Magnus would want more than just retalliation? Xavier cast a pondering eye on Magnus as he went on.
"As you can see," Magnus motioned a dark gloved hand widey with his words, "against more sieges akin to the one we've already suffered, our defenses may not hold. We must at least rally arms and prepare for such an attack." 
The Queen calmly kept the serenity on her face, though her demeamer looked strained. She tapped her foot, pensively deciding the important words she would respond with.
"I have a question, Lieutenant Magnus," Xavier arose from his seat abruptly, and his dark green cloak furled as he made his way around to the other side of the giant oval table. Heads of the military and nobles turned, and Magnus looked especially displeased to see the Paladin general before him to rebuttle him, mid-arguement. "While indeed, we have our positions that may be overtaken even if we have been bolstering our forces, and true, Peval has more military power and if they chose to send their entire fleet at us, well... we might not survive that either way." There were low murmurs among the Grayguard and houses of noblemen, unsure faces from his own Paladin Knights, and scandalized looks from the Shadow Knights. Senna also shared a moment of surprise as she was about to speak, but she patiently would hear what this man had to say as well.
"So, you opt not to fight to defend ourselves, but rather we are to sit and wait for the begin of a slow slaughter, then?" Magnus snarled back, with approving nods and jeers from the those clad in dark.
"Nay," Xavier retorted in a steady tone, "I say that if we attack the empire back, even just enough to wound them, we justify our first spilt blood, and all further bloodshed from battles we engage with Peval." His defiant emerald eyes didn't flinch when met with the expected shouting response from most of the Shadow Knights. An uproar stirred in the room, shouts saying that Peval is injust for attacking in the first place, they deserved no mercy whatsoever in response.
Above all the sudden chaos, Senna was staring at the General of the Paladins, eyes intense at the room's once again a roaring furnace of scathing shouts, and yet somehow relieved at intaking a rational opinion from her leading officer. The Queen ever so slightly raised a questioning blue brow knowing he was up to something, and seemed to try hiding that she was more than pleased to see Xavier speak, especially so now that Magnus was not.
Raising a white gloved hand, Xavier waited patiently for their agitated shouts to boil down once again, then he spoke in a calm, commanding voice, with a cool air to his words. "Peace, friends. The answer is peace." There was abashed stillness in the room, though it was quickly followed by scoffs dismissing his words as nonsense. He continued his way around the large table, walking behind the tall backs of the chairs seated with the distinguished men and women of the council turning their heads to stay on him. "If we fight back, we then declare war. Ijia is one of the mightiest kingdoms in the world, if we go to war, we send a message that we do not strive for peace but for vengeance. That is not the reason why we repelled the Peval attack, it was to protect ourselves, to preserve our well being. It is enough we can defend ourselves, for war disrupts the entire balance of the world. Many if not all kingdoms and cities of Kestmarch built their castles and towns, cultivated their lands, and then the Peval grew to power to swoop in and demand control of all wealth and food around them. Foolishness and greed are the flint and tender that once sparked in a ruler's mind leads all life under him to ruin. In this world where God protects us from evil and gives endless natural bounties, a nation has no reason to slay another for their coin or land." As he passed behind the queen's jeweled seat, he shook his head wishing shouting would make the meaning of his words heard easier. As he returned by his own seat, he placed a hand on the armrest. "For whatever avarice that rots the mind of Emperor Kilnero, Ijia will never become like Peval, nor will vengeance seduce us to raise our blades to cry for war."
With a scoff, Magnus addressed Xavier from across the table with a tone that could have been mocking if it sounded anymore sarcastic. "Ever vying for optimistic peace, even in uncertain times. I would expect words expessing nothing less from the Paladin General, even as the Pevali Legions were knocking down our front gates."
"And as long as we meet them here, we will hold and defeat them, even if the empire entire were before Ijia. That is our duty, sworn to God, a promise going beyond that of the code of Paladin honor or binding Shadow Knight rites. To defend queen and country." Xavier gave a hard eye to everyone in the room indiscriminately, reminding nobles and military officers alike of their responsibilities. "Never to seek out enemy blood, but always ready to defend our own. Even in a surprise attack by a larger nation, our honorable laurels are how we claimed victory in the last battle. That is how we shall win the next one." 
"You speak highly of oaths and honor, yet is that the steel that is enough to defend us alone?" Overconfidence in his words twisted Magnus's face into a sneer as he said them, "Peval shows they have no regard for the lives of their own people, or anyone elses they set their sights on to conquer, nor do they regard any words of peace reverence from God. I am a proud Ijian, and honored to be bound to Shadow Knighthood oaths that I will honor 'til the last drop of Shadow House blood leaves my veins. However, what I will not stand for is to watch Ijia burn just for the sake of honoring God."
"Peace on Caelutera is God's law and is sacred, Her word exceeds the rules of war. Obviously, Peval chooses to break divine law higher than them as they continuously violate the world's peace. However, if we do the same, we are no better than they, instigators of war, and as Ijia is one of the great nations, we may very well send all corners of the world into a war where there would be no world worth rebuilding. Tell me what would there be left for the victor to claim?" Taking a deep breath for air, Magnus was about to respond with words laced with fire, but before he could speak, Xavier cut him off and continued without missing a beat. "I have lost friends and comrades to horrors of the underworld, as well as you have too. These are trying times, but need I remind you of the greater threats that our duty binds us to fight, Sir Magnus? Perhaps so, for as we recover now from the Peval attack, I am sure you mourn the loss of your leader, as well as voice that the Shadow Knights need someone new to lead them. But, certainly not to lead them and Ijia to war to follow down the same path of ruin Peval has chosen!" 
Still holding the breath he had taken, Magnus's pale face was a shade of enraged red and he seemed to be choking on the withheld words he was about to say. 
The room was a clamor of echoed voices, Xavier knew he would outrage the room, but he thought it very necessary to show that war was not the answer, for it would put Ijia at the same base level as Peval. To compare the two opposing countries together showed how much Ijia did not want to be like them, even if it was insensitive to the fact the kingdom had just suffered a loss of kin. That would straighten their thoughts out, they should be concerned with protecting what there still is to protect, not wasting effort to destroy a threat to prevent further destruction. He knew when a country gained acceptance of warlike values, that would only lead only to its downfall, Xavier strongly believed. The furious shouts in the room were not all directed at him, however, as some had started to agree with him and shout back to defend his words, that made no effort to quell the chaotic conference hall.
Shaking her head letting the locks of her silken blue hair sway side to side, Senna seemed displeased as the lavishly decorated room was full of angry shouts louder than ever. She knew that men sometimes had to yell at one another in order to reach an agreement, but she felt like they had agreed with one another quite enough for the day. She held an opened hand out, and her sky colored eyes momentary lit up as bright as the sun. In a boom like the crack of a whip, a thin bolt of lightning streaked across the room over everyones heads, crooked lines of incandescent white from above stretched the distance of the blue oval table, reflecting off it. It disappeared in an instant, and a small hail of blue and white sparks bounced on the giant table's surface a few times before winking out of existance as well, yet the sound reverbrating in the room dwarfed all others. 
Black lines remained in Xavier's vision as the sound echoed, and all eyes were on the queen. You jest, Senna! Even he gulped at her, after feeling not even the slightest trill in the aether that would have warned she was about to conduct such a spell. Did she truly think that necessary? 
The three crown jewels' glow faded as breaking threads of electricity moved up its silvery points, and Senna sat in her jeweled chair hard as ice. She met everyone in the room with a cold eye, and coolly sat in her jeweled seat, high necked and regal in the deafening wake of her thunder. After a few moments of silence, the Queen spoke only after she made it sure everyone recieved that stare of hers she knew could chill a man to his bones. With the crowd already reminded of her responsibility with the power she wields, she then softened her eyes and spoke gently as she addressed her people. "A branch of lightning. That is the brevity of life. Yet, to each one, an individual person, attached with different statures of nobility, power, wealth, amounts of dreams or desires, good hearted or wicked, each life has been crafted to exist by God. She is the creator of sacred life so we may live peacefully and thrive. The one enemy of life on Caelutera, the only threat that our peace has, are daemons of the underworld." She looked especially stern on that statement, she did not want any previous talk of war between kingdoms of man to confuse what Ijia has always stood for. Preserving peace, and protecting from creatures that desire to disturb it. "Judging whether or not lives outside of Ijia have meaning, especially after we have lost many of our precious own, infuriates me." She cast her eyes down to stare down at the conference table before her, not meeting with any one else's gaze. "That descision is for God to make alone. To continue to sit here, as we have done before, to deliberate on what to do, and what has it done but make us more warminded ourselves. That does not lead Ijia down the road to victory." Her oceans for eyes stared off, her mirth exhausted, and let her words sink in. Senna ignored the hushed murmurs of those at the table, and paid no mind when a Paladin guardsman and maids had poked their heads in through a door to see what the commotion had been, and quickly retracted them. 
A good show followed by an exceptional speech, and the Queen has turned the tables on whatever warlike ideas Magnus wished to plant inside the council's heads. Xavier reflected thoughtfully on the queen's speech. We follow the same path to attain peace, and that road is not lined with the heads of our enemies. The General of the Paladins crossed his arms, wrapped in thought.
"With that said, we have much to do more than ever to repair damages done. However," Senna eyed everyone again, this time her cast gaze was soft and empathetic. "there will be no more talks of war, or retalliation. Not until the people have gone back to their daily lives. We will still pursue Lux Grande to hear us out and perhaps act as a mediator between us and Peval to better understand the empire on the other side of the sea. We stand to unite Caelutera in peace, not bloodshed." and with that, the queen arose from her seat, and everyone else at the table stood as soon as they could be on their feet. "Tomorrow morning, we will speak of better things. Let us not forget our duties in the meantime." She made her way to the gold plated door held open by Gray Guardsmen, leading back into the castle proper.
General Xavier exited by her side, and they left the Coneference Hall making their way out a short corridor, then out a large set of golden doors to the castle's garden as the other military men and nobles poured out behind them.










	II.3. By Hoof, Wheel and Wing

	THE ROYAL GARDEN was bright with sunlight, broken through the thick thatch of moonblossom trees branching out of gray tree trunks. Each black and white marble tile glistened in the garden, as well as paved most of the castle. A fountain centered a pond beneath a canopy of blue leaves, and four big pale marble archways surrounded it on all sides leading to sets of large doors. 
	A set of goldworked wooden doors were opened by a pair of guardsman, one Paladin and Shadow Knight each. Out came Queen Senna, her blue skirts gliding as she made her way out. The leader of the Paladins kept by her side, General Xavier being her personal bodyguard when within castle walls.
	Heading to the fountain and passing by the garden of blue leaves, Senna kept a slow pace, giving Xavier a sidelong look that she was relieved to have a moment to speak with him away from others' ears. "For all the effort Magnus took the to make that scene, he does strongly speak for addressing the most important issue, the immediate threat to our kingdom. Though, I do not have to like his candor." She dryly turned to her General, awaiting response.
	You caused quite a scene yourself, Your Highness! Xavier kept a hardened face containing witty words that would be unwise to actually say. "I know not if the man's eagerness to take command of the Shadow Knights arises from genuine desire to defend Ijia, though what he would do with the power would be reckless. Although he spoke some words of clarity, his motives are not clear. Yet, he does raise a point, what are we to do about the threat to our kingdom? Peval wishes to attack us and if we responded, it would send the world into turmoil. For disrupting Caelutera's everlasting peace, what perturbing purpose would conquering Ijia profit the Empire of Peval?" Down the corridor behind them, the clamor of the  military members and nobility poured out of the counsel chamber, just turning past the corner down the decorated hallway. I'll have to be brief with my words with Her Highness, for we must part ways soon. "I'll be quick to another point that does not settle well. While we scoured the battleground debris, nary a man has reported of hide nor hair from the missing General Drakon. His claymore blade was found lying among the wounded and felled, yet no other trace of him can be found. This leaves us at a severe disatvantage, half of Ijia's magickal knights are without command and I do not like the thought of Lord Magnus taking control of the Shadow Knights, yet we must take some action should Peval strike once more. What bothers me is that he acts as though he has given up on finding his commanding officer, and even now, his hunger to command the Shadow may come from unterior motives." Xavier frowned thoughtfully as they stopped on the marble tiles nearby the waterfront beside the tall, babbling fountain centering the garden pond. It was a series of silver-worked bowls that water poured down from the top into another, one by one, then they overspilled into a giant bowl. 
	"I concur with your concerns, and I will be pondering these heavily to speak to you in greater depth in private about these matters, but for now," Senna gave him a curt nod, the clamor of nobles' murmurs growing obviously closer, and would be exiting the castle through the garden in moments. "I know there is much to be done, even with so much more to discuss. As we prepare for what is to come, may Eyes watch over us." Senna gave her confidant a smile, and a brightness reached her face. "In the meantime, let us live and act well. Good day, General." 
	Xavier fell to one knee, hand over his chest as Queen Senna turned away to the pair of large black and white doors a pair of guards began to open for her leading into the central chambers of the castle. She began ascending a short staircase to a blue carpet. Inside, a female Paladin clad in white armor awaited to stride beside the Queen and followed her.
	Xavier always knew all under his command were loyal and punctual. The Queen's other bodyguard had taken over, and the general went to the opposing gates, high headed, and intaking the garden swathed in a blue glow of the sunlight filling the trees' leaves above. A Paladin and Shadow Knight guardsman opened the large double doors before him. Brightness of day beamed into the shaded garden as the gates opened to the outer courtyard. 
	The guards brought their open right hands to their hearts, and then made a fist, the salute of Ijia. Xavier returned the salute as he passed by, and he began descending a grand marble staircase, and there he could see most of Ijia's oceanside city just above one of the outer castlewalls before him. He lost view of the ocean and square-roofed buildings as he went down the white marble staircase down into a wide courtyard lined with blue moonblossom trees and ivy vines growing up the gray stone outerwalls that shaded the lower courtyard. After he passed a distance down, to his left, the eastern wall that had a gigantic gaping hole of it and through that he could still catch a glimpse of the ocean. Almost if not all of the rubble had been cleared after nearly a week of digging and moving rock, and it seemed that now repairs had only now just began to pick up momentum as people clad in common clothes as well as adept masons in work uniform among the military's ranks working together. 
	The general remembered the night when the attack occured, he stood on these very steps a week ago, just like he did now. He had taken a walk late on a foggy night, which was unusual, but he felt as though something was off within the courtyard walls. He knew it as soon as he heard an odd sounding explosion, and then the hovering clouds of mist ignighted in a burst of orange fire. The eastern wall fell down, and gray cement boulders hurled at the inner castle walls, crushing an inner garrison post. The castle's security were completely scattered and utterly caught by surprise, Xavier rushed unarmed and ran in his nightclothes to the clouds of smoke rising from scene to help put out the fires, rescue those trapped or injured from the rubble, and give commands to raise the alarm and rally a defense. He could barely see the faint glow of torches in the foggy water through the newly made gap in the wall, he knew an assualt was to come, and he hurried to make his way back to his quarters in the Paladin tower, retrieving his weapons and donning his battle armor.
	Sure enough, knights clad in heavy battle armor bearing the banner of the Pevali symbol of a blazing sun's red halo were overrunning the city. Ships had used the fog to sneak straight into the harbor and fired some sort of devestating cannon with intent to break through with their Legion soldiers and take the castle. He rallied his Paladins to guard Ijia's castle while the Shadow Knights would meet them at the kingdom's shore, and to reinforce the Gray Guard protecting the city. The Shadow Knight general, Tavian Drakon had been rallied to stand the front lines in the city with his company of elite knights. They held them back as best he could, but it seemed that the Legion knights had little interest in pillaging the city, and rushed them, weaving straight through neighborhoods and marketplaces to make it to the castle. A very bold attempt, and most were held back by Ijian knights, but Peval fought with a bloody determination, and eventually broke through, daring to charge the castle. 
	The outer gates were held strong by the Paladins, and they drove them back, not letting one pass the castle walls. What was perplexing was the fact that they had sent their attack with a low score of men, that although they charged valiantly, seemed that they were destined to fail in their mission. If they truly wanted to overtake the castle, the mighty empire had the means to send a more bolstered attack to do so. Nonetheless, even though Ijia defended themselves and won the battle, their front lines' casualties were numerous, and Ijia suffered the loss of General Tavian, not to be found among the wounded or fallen after the chaos had subsided. 
	After descending the final step of the grand staircase, he was on top of checkered black and white tiles continueing his path. Before him was a gigantic archway in the castle outer wall containing the grand gate consisting of one grated metal gate kept raised during the day, and the other were two giant closed half arches, one metallic black and the other silvery white, centered with a gray bird with outsretched wings and talons. 
	Just within the castle's main gates, a small company of high ranked enlisted Paladin knights stood in formation with an officer addressing them, all enlisted had stripes of rank as small silver stripes on their white steel armor. They were clad in armor like his own, but he had a metallic chestplate bearing a gold etched bird across it, with more metal plates on the shoulders, arms and legs. The Paladin knights had the addition of a white cloth tabard on the front of their armor, bearing a white and black shield with a light blue bird on it, one of the varying symbols for Paladin divisions. Each had a shortsword armed at their side, and a circular buckler shield of whitesteel worked with metal, bearing a simular seal their armor beared on it.
	Lieutenant General Rendien Almasey had several gold bars of rank on his shoulders, and was second in command of the Paladins only to Xavier. He fully turned as soon as he saw his superior, and called for the arrangement of white-clad knights to salute as he did. Xavier returned the gesture, placing his open fingers lined up with the golden feathers etched on his chest armor, then made the first over his heart. He had short brown hair with a touch of gray, dark eyes, and a few more years of age on his face, and was clad in his officer battle armor with a silver worked chest plate, metal discs on the limbs, and an officer's cape like Xavier's own, although Almasey's was a light blue. "My Lord General, I have arranged your company which is ready to mount and ride to Fort Forestglenn boardering the southern woodlands. As you know, we believe a few bandit gangs have decided that in the wake of this surprise attack on Ijia, that our guard is down. Citizens in the countyside have reported numerous robberies on the roads, and even a kidnapping, which our outposted guards thwarted."
	"Aye, Lieutenant. This sort of continued activity is unheard of in peacetime, and people turn to uncertain means for survival in when they feel like they are in danger. We shall quell this chaos and bring order to our lands at once, and show our people that Ijia never lets her guard down." Xavier gave his second in command a salute, which he returned.
	Rendien put his hand back to his sides, spun an about face, and then he commanded, "Open the gates!" in a shout.
	As soon as the order was given, a row of armored Gray Guardsman up on the stone walls above pulled at ropes, and wheels turned and the metal sound of cogs grinding smoothly whirred as the gigantic double gates opened. 
	The sunlight poured in as the white and black arched doorways opened inwards, their metallic sheen glistening as they opened, and darkened once inside the inner wall's shadow. Outside, the checkered pathway spread out, and down a stretched slope was a road leading down to the business buildings and homes lined next to the open sea's shimmering blue hue.
	Approaching the Paladins under his command as the castle gates opened, Xavier inspected them, and they were indeed all armed, and each man's face showed a hidden fire, strength that was ready to go into action as soon as given the word. They were prepared. The General's most trusted knights, high in rank with outstanding performances and have been in Ijia's miliary service for many years. They are his chosen knights, the Sky Saints, standing at attention in two rows, perfectly still from years of discipline and training, wearing over their armor the blue bird over the symbol of Ijia, while Xavier wore the golden bird of the same motif. "Paladins of Ijia, what is our code of honor?" He spoke loud enough to be heard over the sound of the gate opening. 
	"Our code of honor is to defend the Queen of Ijia and all people within our lands, sir!" The twenty-score men and women responded in unison with a fearsome cadence. 
	"At ease." Xavier spoke, and his knights did so, standing not so ridgidly with their hands at rest behind their backs. "Brave Paladins of Ijia, we go now to Fort Forestglenn to the south. We shall put a stop to the thieves who may now be terrorizing those living in our lands. In a time of uncertainty following the battle that has shaken our people, it is imperative we do not let our own suffer any more than they already have to." The gates nearly completely opened, and the Paladin leader turned to the town and roads on the otherside, "Then, let us move out!" 
	As Xavier walked out the gates, all in his company followed in two columns, Rendien striding by his side, both officer's capes furling in the wind. Walking into the giant beam of sunlight from the two open gates, the brightness of day reflected off Xavier's shimmering armor and warmed him. He passed underneath the arch way overhead, between the stone walls. 
	Just outside the castle walls, the checkered path tiles became larger squares, and branched off to the left and right. He turned to the right, and his company following him did as well when they reached where he was. A large wooden stables with a slanted roof was against the walls outside, and twenty two horses, most of them gray mustangs, were arranged in a row facing the city, each one saddled and had a cloth draping on either side with the same symbol of the Sky Saints, a leathern bundle with food and supplies, and with a handler by each animal's side holding the reins. 
	Xavier went to one the two saddled shires at the start of the line. His stallion, Thundercloud, was white with a long  mane and wooly hair grown over his hooves while Rendien's large warhorse was much the same, but a hand shorter and with a black mane. Rendien's large warhorse too was saddled, and had a cloth banner with the blue bird symbol draped down the big horse's sides, with short silver tassles to mark him as second in command and golden tassles on Xavier's horse to mark him as the general. 
	"Lord General Xavier Alexander?" The tall lad addressed him a bow, holding his light shaggy hair in his dark cap as he did so. He was dressed in castle stableman livery, a white tunic tied with a black belt and blue pants standing at his horse's side held the reigns tightly. "I have your horse at the ready, mi'lord." He handed the reins forward.
	"Thanks to you, lad." Xavier took the reins and put a shining metal boot in the stirrup, then climbed high up on top the gigantic animal. At his side, his knights began mounting their steeds as well. He turned his horse, facing down the checkered road leading away from the castle and town. That way lead out down the south coastline and surrounding countryside, then the terrain met with mountains and trees. There, he would take his troops to the fortress boardering the forest there. Xavier gave Thundercloud a light heel to the sides, and the shire moved a large distance with just a few clops of his giant hooves. He took a tug at the reins to face his Paladins each mounting their steeds, he gave a nod to Rendien already in his saddle.
	Once every armored knight sat upright at their reins, the general addressed his Paladins. "Heed well, for I intend this mission resolved quickly to show the strength of Ijia. We will swiftly bring a harsh gavel down up on criminals and any who oppose the already fragile peace will be brought to justice." He stopped the horse after he passed the other mounted mustangs in a line, "We are Fort Forestglenn's sent for reinforcements, and for the honor of Ijia, we leave at once to scour the lands to protect our people. Let us ride without delay!" Xavier pulled at the reins and turned, and then with a heel, the horse was in a trot down the marble road. Behind him he heard the following clops of hooves on marble, and the loud stomps of the other shire Rendien rode. Xavier turned back and saw his knights formed in two columns, each riding straight backed as they followed him, with the two in the rear wavering Ijian colored flags from poles protruding from their backs. 
	Ahead, the checkered marble pathway ended between a black and white marble pillar, and a dirt road began, outside of the castle perimeter. Xavier passed through, along with Rendien and the company of twenty Paladins in tow. 
	As soon as Xavier's horse was on the soft dirt of the country road, he gave a starting kick to Thundercloud, and the horse went to a fast paced gallop. Putting some distance between him and his knights, they had space to bring their steeds up to speed. The path lead down to combine to a wider earthern road meant for common passage, winding through the grassy plains. The path would combine with another ahead, separated by flagpoles hanging the blue bird on checkered print. 
	On the road in the distance, horses with carriages for nobles with liverlied coach up front were in a line as well as the carts for common as well as exoticly clad merchants in tow. They kept to one side of the road and people of a multitude of houses and levels of nobility scattered down the road, clad in all kinds of clothing walking beside the carts and carriages. This was the bustling traffic of Ijia, most were headed to the kingdom, but many were traveling south as well, and all traveled on one side of the joined roads. The other road separated by flags was completely empty, and it would not stay that way for long. 
	The General lead the Sky Saints' cavelry from the road leading out from the castle. Riding high atop Thundercloud, Xavier sped down the clear dirt road before him, flags of Ijia marked the road once every ten gallops. The road was nearby a cliff overlooking the low road with peoples coming out from Ijia's waterside town below. Xavier's steed followed the curved path, and the cold, fresh air blown in from sea furled his green cape. The open ocean was clear of cloud and fog, blue and sunny with a few of the Ijian navy's patrol ships in the water, each full sail bore the emblem of a black and white shield with a blue bird with spread out wings, its talons holding a smaller white shield and black sword. There were hundreds of those ships dispatched immediately to deal with the Pevali ships sent by sea, but the true strike dealt was from within the castle walls.
	When the Pevali Legions' warships emerged from hiding beneath their cover of fog, they had immediately fired some sort of devestating weapon. A cannon than launched a bomb, exploding in hurls of flame, taking out nearly an entire outer wall of the castle. 
	Before Peval could strike again, Queen Senna had hurried to the top of the tallest height of Ijia castle, the rooftop antechamber of the royal Astral Tower where the crystal throne is housed. The three-gemmed royal crown of Ijia could then be used to its full potential like it was that night, needed in the most direst of circumstances.
	As Xavier descended the sloping path, he curved around the town, seeing a clear view of the docks down below him. On the white bricked streets along the sea, he was in command of the Sky Saints along with scores of other platoons lead by Rendien and other officers. Together, they defended the the town off the heavily armored Pevali Legion soliders and prevented as many as they could from landing ashore. The Paladins faught hard, even after driving most of their enemy back to the water, more and more enemy ships docked. Scores of knights in their bulky, spiked battle armor pouring off of gangplanks one after another with more and more ships emerging from their shroud of night's fog. They all seemed more intent on storming the castle and fighting with the Paladins or raiding the town, with little wonder now that a castle wall had fallen, with them charging the new gap in Ijia's defense. Their ships fired cannons at the Paladin forces, and hailed them with arrows caught aflame, but with quick warnigs and swift commands, many of the Ijian knights maneuvered strategically with raised shields to survive. However, the bigger threat was the hidden ship housing the devestating cannon was out of sight, hidden in the fog, no doubt awaiting a second strike. Such a thing never happened, prevented thanks to the ultimate power contained within Ijia.
	The gray Astral Tower in the distance protruded out of the main cubic structure of the castle, near the mountains behind the kingdom. The four great walls surrounded it, with two towers of black and white built into the wall's front corners. Fron the top of the central gray tower that night, beams of light were concentrated and fired at the sea, felling several ships at a time. 
	When another Pevali ship bearing sails of a white sun encircled in a blazing ring of red fire docked before Xavier and the Sky Saints, the Paladins were prepared to met them in heat of the battle. The General had no intention of letting the gold and red armored Pevali soldiers off their ship, as he charged to meet the ship lowering their gangplank with Pevali knights about to pour out, that is whem the first strike of lightning occurred. 
	Xavier recalled shouting commands amid the din of metal against metal and the constant roar of battle cries, ordering to maneuver away from a volly of arrows. As they moved with their shields raised, he realized it was the arrows were coming from an enemy ship, one trying to dock nearby and mar the Sky Saints from stopping the arriving new ship carrying scores of ruthless Pevali Legion beasts clad in their gold and red armor. As Xavier and his knights charged the arriving ship, their crew hurrying to lower the gangplank and archers aiming another volly of flame arrows off the bow, but in a flash of light and an explosive boom of thunder, the ship burst to pieces from a strike of white fire from above. Xavier and his troops covered their eyes from the blinding strike of lightning before him, and were nearly hurled back from the force of Ijia's ultmate weapon. When he opened his eyes, what was left of the ashen ship sank with the soldiers, all perished, and continued with another bolt of lighting a few moments later on a ship next down the dock, and then another out at sea. And another of the countless enemy ships, one by one continually. 
	Amid the fogbank near the mountainous coast, large smoldering shapes were seen floating eerily out at sea, glowing embers within the hanging cloud. It didn't take long to figure out that was where they had fired the devestating weapon from, and time would betray them if they did not do away with it before it struck again. Senna had been helped by a team of military strategists and mages familiar with the crystal throne and the power of the crown, and they helped her target the warship with the siege cannon. 
	A hearthflame of light ignighted in a burst of incandescence from the castletop, and all the surrounding landscape flickered as if night were suddenly day. The twin mountains behind the castle brightened as if lit by the sun when Senna launched the lightning from Astral Tower, the individual torchfires around the town and dotting the ships paled in the light of the concentrated spell, and it aimed seemingly at nothing within a large cloud of fog hovering over sea. Then, a burst of flying molten metal tore open the concealing mist, a large steel warship was burning and twisted, including a destroyed cannon that was unbelievably nearly the size of the ship, and it too was a mass of unrecognizable metal scraps, unseen after the whole melting enemy ship sank.
	His horse kept focus on the sloped road as it became level with the flatlands, leading to run parrallel to the common road. Xavier looked out at sea, the fierce battle of that night replaying in his head over and over. The kingdom's most ancient weapon was forced to be used, and ships were felled from the Astral lightning as well as from the responses of the Ijian naval fleet. Pevali ships kept emerging from the fog for only a short time in the wake of Astral Tower's lightning, then ceased, either retreating or sent every wave until the skirmish expired at the death of all their men. The battle ended with th harbor full of numerous sinking ships, and reports of casualties outside the castle were the worst, yet the battle was over, with Ijia as victorious. While Xavier rode Thundercloud, the memories of that night forced their way into the generals head, wary of the new threat to the peace and the new fear his people would now bear.
	Riding high atop Thundercloud, Xavier was aware of the people taking pause to admire the kingdom's chivilrous knights. The flagpoles lining the two wide paths were the only separation from the two roads, one for official use that was empty sans for him and the Sky Saints, and the other for common use. Nearly all of the coming and going peoples to his left stopped in their tracks to watch in awe and admiration of the finest knights of one of Ijia's armies pass by, the illustrious Paladins. 
	He could hear some faint gasps of the people's amazement, children walking along with their parents pointed to the other road now full of Ijia's heroic knights. There were a few short cheers he could make out, "God protect the Queen!" and "Eyes watch over Ijia!" though Xavier listened, he kept his focus forward. There was the louder sound of nearly a hundred hooves following him, pummeling the loamy earth beneath them in a continuous, churning rumble.
	 After passing many people coming and going down the road, Xavier and his company of knights made their way out into the countryside with the surrounding wide open sea in the distance. Many small yet wealthy towns stood along the coastline, keeping the same squarish shape to their buildings like in Ijia's castle town. Mainly they were where nobles lived in luxury filling lavish homes, and these stretched all the way south to the distant provinces where and dukes and barons lived. 
	The Paladin knights would ride like this south to where the grassy lands met mountain and forest, a division in their territories to the south. That is where Fort Forestglenn would be, and at the pace Xavier had set, they would arrive well before nightfall even if they took the time to rest. He had made this short distance many times on Thundercloud, and the white shire was even able to travel faster than this, but he would not wish to over work his company's mustangs trying to keep up.
	On into the morning light they rode on, the rocky points of mountains stabbing the sky in the south marking the destination of General Xavier and his knights.

	Placing the last of her handful of tart mudberries to her lips, Diame sat beneath the shade of a maple tree taking a short repose from her journey. She had traveled down from the Tevan mountains which took the better portion of the morning, and in the wide open countryside surrounded by distant mountains, but the one she had just descended was not too distant behind her. Nonetheless, she was convinced she would need to save her strength in order to walk the full distance to Ijia. She had her cloak down and her satchel by her side, recooperating from the miles she just walked, though thankfully it was mostly downhill. Even more so, she decided her lunch had not completely filled her stomach, and searched her satchel for a fresh potato from a Tevan farm.
	"I suppose just a little more of a meal for early noon sup wouldn't hurt. I must keep my strength up, after all." The High Priestess decided as she gingerly took out the red, fist-sized vegetable pocked with earthy looking eyes. 
	Though she sat in the shade, the spring day was as bright as a summer's, though it just may have been Diame had just traveled out of the fogbanks of the Valley of Mist. Sun beams around her were bright enough to sense powerful light aether in them, and with one hand held out the raw vegetable, and with her other fair hand, placed it out of the shade. 
	I do not think I am getting carried away with my magick, I would cook fried taters with seasonings in a stove usually, but on the road, a lone woman has to be resourceful. She closed her eyes and concentrated on the warmth of the sunlight on the palm of her hand, how it ran up to the tips of her fingers. Envisioning the sun in her mind, she cleared all other thought and meditated on a bright white ball of light lit against an aura of sky blue. Diame felt her hand grow warmer, capturing the aether of the sun. She could feel her mind lifting, the sun painted against the sky was all she could grasp with her thought, and the heat in her hand rose. She flinched her hand and released from her palm a small ball of light, a tiny miniature sun encased in a transluscent, glassy sphere. It wasn't blindingly bright to contain its energy, outside it was a rather dull shell that held a bright, glowing glint. There, that was an simple enough task. Now for the tricky part... Taking the orb of light in one hand and the potato in the other, the priestess put them close by. 
	Diame tried to sense the aether within the soon to be meal, envisioning the red thing she held in her hand the same way inside of her mind. To her surprise, she could feel a vibrant life force within the potato. Tevan produced pefectly tended to year round, it shouldn't be a wonder I can sense so much energy in it. She felt a bit woozy, and decided she'd be better off finishing the spell than marveling over food, especially just the imagined image of it.
	As she concentrated, she carefully let go the orb of light, and it rolled off her fingertips, hot to the touch like a giant egg just out of boiling water. The candescence of the light entered the red potato, making it glow from the inside out, and then Diame opened her eyes. 
	A bright flash of light emerged from Diame's combined hands, and the potato was prepared fully cooked in an instant. She then let out an "Ouch!" and dropped it in her lap, only able to hold the oven-hot meal for only a moment. She picked it up with the sleeves of her blue robe, and let out a sigh of relief. "There," she blew on the hot food, "That will be cooled in a minute. Then I must quickly be off, even though I am already ahead on my way." 
	She straightened upright against the maple trunk at her back, and looked up the road ahead. The path stretched straight onwards north, disappearing somewhere in the flat lands' tall grass in an undeterminable distance. The lands were so unfamiliar to Diame, she had rarely traveled outside of the village, and when she had, what she could do was kept under such strict supervision she had not the time take in any of the scenery or what people lived there, but she knew that this journey was not for that purpose. She had left her cloister to take this journey. The several visions she had, some cryptic and hazy in her sleep, the most important vision from the temple being quite literal, and she was bound by oaths not to convey what she has seen to anyone. Although, she had already left home to tell these things to the bishop, eventually breaking two oaths. She shrugged the guilt of that thought. "Nay, I am doing this because I must. In fact, I think I can finish my meal and be on my way at once." 
	Taking the first bite of the hot potato, it was nearly too heated to consume, yet it was steamy, fluffy and deliciously starchy. She had hoped for a pinch of salt, but that was a luxury whilst on the road. I wonder what it is like in Ijia, on my own though. Perhaps I will ask for leave to visit there more often once I have completed these what I have set out to accomplish. She mused to herself as she took another bite, wishing that the journey back home would be swifter than the journey to the kingdom.
	A soft clamor of hooves and squeaks of rotating wheel spokes moved north the road, coming from the the path she had just been on. Shifting her gaze from the hot potato in her hands to back down the road, there was mule drawn wooden cart full of rough hewn sacks and wooden boxes. A stocky man of middle age in a yellow shirt sat at on a bench at the lead of the cart, reins in hand and head below the brim of his straw hat. A long wooden stick akin to a fishing rod stuck out from the front of the cart, a red apple strung through the middle with rope hung from the end of the pole, a few hands away from the gray mule's big, dopey dark eyes. Uncaring of the road before him, the mule was simply fixated on the fruit, carrying the man and cargo in tow.
	I say, if he is headed north to Ijia... The man would pass by her by in a matter of seconds, and now would be her only chance to ask someone for a ride along. What luck! Surely that good man would be kind enough to atleast let me travel along with him part of the way. Who wouldn't want the company of quiet young maiden on a long road? She quickly got to her feet, holding the hot potato in her teeth as she shrugged on her sack and grabbed her staff. Taking the meal back in hand with no time to feel its heat, she made her way from the shade of the maple back to the sunny road. "Eyes watch over me, these fortunes fair could be a sign in disguise. God has sent me a way to do her bidding with an even more urgent haste. Truly, good omens that my actions are needed to be carried out." She stood at the roadside where the cart would be in mere moments. She waved to him with the be-potatoed hand, "Good morrow, sir! If you are headed North, would you mind helping a fellow traveler take some steps off her journey?"
	The man quietly pulled at the reins and the mule whinnied, the cart creaked as it lurched to a complete halt. The man turned to Diame and leant over, his middle-aged dark eyes were inquisitive and level to his hat's brim. "Well, gonnae naw see naw other fairer lass, naw will I, ma'am?" He gave her a wide grin of an almost full set of teeth and a light chuckle. 
	Unsure of what the man had said exactly, Diame stood there with a meek, yet persistant questioning look. 
	The mule raised and elongated his neck, softly chomping his teeth and wriggling black lips a hand away from the ever tantilizing apple. "Aw, naw, will be not a pro'lem." The man nodded, and with one hand still on the reins untied a rope nearby, tied into the cart's back hatch, letting it down and open into the bulky cargo. "Ah know it be crowde' bu' a small lass'll find room fer sher, aye?" He motioned to a crate that could be a seat, complete with a large bag for backing.
	Diame bowed graciously in relief, "Thank you! Eyes watch over you!" She excitedly went around the cart and tossed in her staff, then climbed into the back. She sat and let down her bag while the man pulled at the rope and retied the back hatch. 
	With couple taps of the man's crop on the mule's hide, the animal had been flaring its whiskered nostrils, trying to sniff the aroma of the apple, but then resumed its walking pace, seemingly excited to once again be walking in pursuit of the bobbing, floating fruit. Diame jerked as the cart took motion again, then sat back with a sigh of relief as the green field passed by, watching the the maple tree she had just reposed beneath gradually growing smaller in the distance behind her.
	The man turned over his shoulder for a moment, "Oh, an' me be called Shul." He tipped his hat, "What do you b' called?" He cleared his throat, seemingly to be reminding himself of long forgotten manners, he hastily added, "If I do be so bold t' ask mi'lady's name?"
	A name. Diame had thought of many on her hike down the mountain, but eventually decided on one that would be plain and not garner unnecessary attention. "Delanda. My name is Delandra." She felt odd saying the new name outloud, but it seemed to work just fine as if she had said her real name. Nothing to be worried about, just precautions until I safely arrive in Ijia. "I am glad to make your acquaintance, Sir Shul."
	"Ah, naw, ma'am, no Sir for m'. Aye, Shul be jus' fine, I be jus' a simple man o' me wares. And I do be glad a humble man akin t' me can be of service, to the trav'lin' Lady Delandra." Shul eyed her kindly over his shoulder again, "You are of a noble house, aye?"
	He seemed to be looking at the gold circlet holding back her red curls of hair, with the pearl dangling on her forehead, and as well as her blue robes do look more fitting when worn in town. She hadn't thought she was over dressed for travels, but if her clothes said she was of a wealthy stature, then Delandra would now be a noble. She guessed it couldn't hinder her path north, she was a woman of some importance anyway, after all. "Aye, I decided to go to the cathedral in Ijia, for a lone pilgrimage, if you will."
	The man let out a slight scuffaw, "A walk fer God that was too lon' after all, eh?" Shul chuckled, "No matter, ma'am, yer path is safer now. That is fer a fact, for cert'in, with the roads growin' unkind up north, what wiff the attack on the kingdom and all."
	Diame stopped mid potato bite, "An attack? On Ijia, you mean?"
	"Oh, you 'aven't 'eard? Y' must don't get word of news very oft'n. Where is your noble house y' said you hailed from? Er, if you'd care t' sate an old man's curiosity, er, if I c'n ask, ma'am, er, mi'lady?" 
	"Well," Diame wasn't sure where Delandra would come from, as there wasn't much nobility in Teva, but wasn't sure how well that was known, nor if she should tell him where she truly was from lest she be recognized, but she did not know of many other cities outside of the Valleys of Mist. "Uh... just from a private noble house, in the south."
	"Aye, well, no matter, all nobility and common kin alike must watch their backs, there be a worse threat than any ruffian on the road. Them Pevali," Shul snarled the word as he spit over his shoulder, thankfully the one away from Diame. "The cowardly empire of the east struck the kingdom in the night, thin battle ships slitherin' in fog like slimy eels. The mighty castle Ijia defended 'erself, even though they say one o' them walls was raized."
	What? Ijia was attacked, but who would? Why? Her blue eyes widened with worry and shock, a possibility she didn't want to think of crossed her mind. A daemon appeared from the ocean in my dream, could that have some sort of connection to this attack by sea? Her visions always were cryptic and took time to discern their true meaning, but this time, the message was clearly important, but what it meant exactly was the mystery. "Did anything bad happen? Are the people of Ijia all right?" Diame awaited intently for the man to continue his words of knowledge of the goings on outside of Teva. She stared up ahead at the mountainrange up north, clouds encasing stone stabbing the sky, marring its ocean hue.
	"Oi, from what I hear, the people are alive, if shaken, but the castle and military are astir in complete disarray. One o' the three Lord Generals was felled, the one o' their 'Shadow' house, or what'ver." He seemed to pause grimly, staring beyond the clouded wall of the northern mountains as if recalling the story happening to the castle first hand. "If the skirmish di'int take 'im, he is feared for worse. Ruthless Peval has sudd'nly waged war on Ijia, but what man c'n fight other when the o'ly threat to peace is underworld beasties. Greed perhaps c'n force a man's hand to war. Money makes people d' strange things. Y'know I used t' work as a longshoreman, loaded them crates and such wiff tradeships, b' now I jus' transport cargo. Cushy job. By the by, be you headed t' Ijia y' would surely stay th' night at th' inn up the road pas' Breezefield. Tha's wh're I'll be. We c'n continue to th' kingdom in th' mornin', bu' I go t' Forestglenn and n' further. Me wife be there, as well as me daughters an'..." 
	She listened intently as she absently took bites of the cooked potato, watching the trees lining the dirt road pass by. Diame was deep in thought, hearing the news befallen Ijia, as well as discerning if what she had seen predicted such a thing. If this relates to a part of my swevens, they aye, I am headed in the right direction. If God wills for my journey to be sped up, then I must deliver this urgent news to Bishop Malbourne as soon as I am within the city walls. She decided, shifting her back against the sack of oranges, or possibly apples, she leant back against. Shul talked for some time of his life transporting merchandise, and time spent living in Ijia, occasionally drifted between talking of the news up north and his family. 
	Diame traveled for some time, listening, slowly eating away at her potato, until it had almost gone and cold. Her meal was filling, and tossed the remainder of flaky skin off in to the field. The cart carried her northward, and she wouldn't have believed she would be growing sleepy before noon as she listened to Shul talk. She had one instant of a comfortable fullness which turned into a need for a nap, and thought that if she might have gotten sleepy on her long journey, fortune would indeed bring a cart to sleep on.
	With that thought in mind, Diame started to nod off, head leant back, watching the wide green lands and open blue sky roll by at the steady pace of hooves. She would make this trip made much easier than she would have dreamed, and once she spoke to the Church in the morrow, she hoped that a reward could be arranged for this man who helped her. She wondered when they would reach that inn Shul spoke of, yearning for a comfortable bed than a bumpy cart, but atleast it wasn't under a tree. The High Priestess' thought of rest unwittingly even as sleep embraced her.

	Tilting his brown wings down in to a drastic dive, Maji gained speed diving through the dark clouds, beads of water slicked off his brown and white feathers, chasing one after another. He had to stay quick and ahead of a violent quarry, mindful of the thing his keeper wished him to send, the letter capsule dangling from the small pigeon-hawk's talon. He had flown far from the calm winds of Teva, and had only now run into the first sign of trouble.
	Gliding down from the mountain holding his home town earlier had been easy, the morning sun warmed him and the wind carried him with the fresh scents of Tevan farmland and his distant bird dome. The wide open fields were uneventful, he had flown low to maintain resting his wings, perching on the scattered trees one by one and making his way north in the wide open grass lands. 
	He made it all the way to the mountains, and had rest his wings for a very long time before attempting to fly over the sheer rockface. He waited for favorable winds, and when he caught them and ascended, he found the higher winds too turbulent and would tire him out to try to weave between the mountain summits, and not many trees in high altitude gave little places to rest one's wings. 
	Following the scent of the forest, Maji found one, low in between the rocky range, bypassing the mountains all together. He had swooped down to the wood take shelter on a branch, and was only able to rest his wings for only a few fleeting moments, before he had to flee quickly, in chase by the forest's vicious, territorial birds. A wild murder of crows was in persistant chase of Maji, thirty or more medium black birds with more bulk on them than the pidgeon-hawk, with long black wings that refeflected sunlight dully like soot. They constantly bombarded Maji, quickly flying higher than the bird, then swooping down at it, hooked claws swiping and sharp dark beaks open to bite making with aggressive 'caw-caw' sounds.
	Ascending high, Maji had to evade the barrage of attacks as he flew back into the clouds resting at the tops of the mountains. He had tired his wings out and spent so much time reaching the lofty height with hope to hide, and into this dark patch of clouds he glided, with further hopes he was still headed in the right direction. But, the murder of crows still followed him, swooping in with cruelly with hooked beaks, all with intent to wound. 
	A black crow swooped in from the side, unseen hiding in the dark cloud until it had emerged with rearing talons, swiping straight at Maji. The smaller bird turned and evaded, but another crow was awaiting there, nearly invisible in the dark cloud. The crow drove its beak to Maji, and with a sudden reply of a chirp of pain, white and brown breastfeathers plumed from his chest in a burst. With a beak full of feathers, the crow flew back into the darkness of the cloud, rejoining its brood with more violent caws following as if the murder smelled the first scent of Maji's blood. With a desperate maneuver, the pidgeon-hawk quickly copact his wings into a free falling dive, a move that could chill him frozen, but he had desperate enough intentions to save his life.
	Sight was limitied within the darkness of the thick silver cloud, and the scent of moonblossoms had all but faded. He knew not if he was falling straight for a mountain crag, but Maji could hear them, the score of thirty or so crows in the clouds after him, cawing ferociously in his wake. He flapped his compact wings slightly in an attempt to fall faster. Brightness, a veil of white coming out of the shadows. Piercing through it, he found himself under the clouds, the crows above would find him soon enough out in the open sky. Down he continued, wings carefully retracted and aiming to a safe part of the forest wide open below. 
	He heared the crooning of the murder build, he had lost them but only momentarily. Maji hoped the high winds would throw off his scent, and headed towards a favorable patch of trees, low in the valley by the mountainside.
	Landing on a strong oak, he hopped down the branches, glided to other trees, one by one, hoping to make his way to a safe place. Making his way tree by tree through the forest, he continued to a low canopy, protected under the trees' shade, and being extra wary not to discover anymore crows' nests.
	Perched on a treebranch, he took a hurried scan around, and saw a hidden alcove by the rocks, beneath the canopy of leaves. Up above, the distant chorus of caws frightened him, and in a moment he quickly made his descision. Maji fluttered his wings and swept over to the small opening in the stone wall, a cave that lead in only a few small steps was there. He carefully hovered over the entrance, and landed on the stone, talons and letter landing safely. 
	He nestled into the back of the cave, turned and staring outwards. The pidgeon-hawk waited, watching the forest and the sky above. In the distance, he watched the murder of crows fall in a vortex like an insect swarm tumbling in a column from the sky, going straight for the distant patch of trees Maji had just landed at. His wings let out a flutter, and he set both his black eyes on the spot, staring fiercely down his beak. Would they find him, the thought crossed the bird's mind. The last few crows descended into the forest, and the sky was clear, though they may well be beneath him, scouring the forest for his scent. Maji hoped his trick played off, hiding his scent among treetops where other birds had been and waiting cautiously. He could hear them crooning faintly in the distance, and he would wait until that subsided before he dared leave the shelter of the cave. He didn't even know why they were so aggressive, he was trying to leave their territory anyhow.
	Ruffling his feathers, Maji was relieved that he suffered no more than a few shed feathers, he was unharmed otherwise. Curiously, he sniffed the tiny hole he was enclosed in. An unfamiliar smell, yet unmistakenly avian. It seemed like some other birds had used this for a nest long ago, but not anytime recent. He would be safe here for a time.
	Patiently, he curled up his talons and sat with wings folded, the tied violet letter capsule rest by his side. 
	


	

	
	
	

How is Xavier witty, charming, and free thinking? How does he come off the opposite of Tavian?
War is a big deal in Caelutera. Not supposed to exist in the goddess's utopia world where only the demons are the enemy. Make that a bigger theme. 
Make Senna and Xavier react more and share glances subtley as friends to the shocking fact that Magnus is suggesting war. Lots of rections spread out.
What would Ijia be doing today if Peval had not attacked them a week ago?
Up playing religion. 
WTF WAR?
What would XAVIER be doing if Pevali hadn't attack'd? How does he feel about war? Where was he when the attack happened?
Xavier was in a battle, he had to defend the castle from people storming it. He had to kill people to save others. How does he deal with that as a Paladin?
Everyone knows someone who died.

Pevali abducted Tavian to learn of his Arcana magick knowledge. Peval is the magick world police, they do not allow their own people to learn magick freely like Ijia and Lux Grande do. They are using the guise of taking it up on theirselves to stop Ijia from using their magicks freely, because they use shadow magick. This is unknown, as the world was based on magickal freedom.


Diame at table convinced to leave to see the bishop in Ijia, writes letter for Eljuk then quickly gathers things, leaves!

DAY 1 - Mersday, Mid morning
Diame sneaks out, scene with Sindha on a bridge, once she is out and over the hills, ending with Maji flying over her.

Xavier's chapter, sets out to forest fort.

Diame on the road and stops to have lunch, a merchant passes by and she gets a ride.


115 pages... Night 1!!!

NIGHT 1 - Nightfall
Tavian's chapter, heads to Jirata

Diame arrives at an inn at night with merchant, inn tavern scene (people talk of war between ijia and peval here) and she sleeps, thinking of arriving in Ijia the next day. 

Xavier arrives at the forest fort.

PAST, during when sleep would be
Mirnada origin story in Peval

DAY 2 - Morning
Diame and merchant get attacked deep in the forest by bandits, Xavier and paladins at forest fort save them. Xavier escorts Diame to Ijia, then goes to see Senna.

DAY 2 - Later
Tavian arrives in Jirata and meets up with Mirnada, heads to Ijia.

DAY 2 - near evening
Diame sees the bishop who dismisses her without hearing a word. She goes to get permission to see Queen Senna, is denied, and has a chance encounter with her anyway. 
NIGHT 2 - Saves her life that night and gains trust.

Small scene with Tavian steering the ship at night, thoughts of returning to Ijia.

DAY 3 - Dawn
Diame has morning scene with Xavier and Queen Senna, they are still not convinced to send anyone to the north lands with her, but war is declared against Pevali. 
Mirnada awakens to find Tavian piloting the ship into Ijian harbors, they enter the city. Tavian leaves her behind when he hears war was declared, he goes straight into the castle. Mirnada sneaks in right behind him.
With the four main characters together in the same room, it is decided they shall go together. Tavian wants Mirnada to stay behind, but reluctantly lets her come along.
Party departs to Desye

DAY 3 - Evening
On the ship the characters talk and reiterate slightly, Diame thinks heavily on how this is the third day of her cloister, she has to come outside and address her people the next morning. With the note saying tell them she is meditating longer, she figures she has another 3 days until she has to actually be back and revisit the water temple on Mersday. She resolves to find whatever it is she was meant to find and come back as quick as she can to make it back home in time.

DAY 4 - Morning
Eljuk discovers Diame is gone and her note, makes public announcement she is still meditating and shall be out soon. Some panic, but kept under wraps. Secretly, Gerard sends a letter straight to Lux Grande. He writes a whistle-blowing letter to get Diame into trouble for not sticking her duties, and makes Eljuk send it, and lies about the contents of the letter.
Party arrives in the Northlands, head to Desye

NIGHT 5- Evening and night
scenes with Madame Oakh and Tavian

DAY 5 - Morning - All day
Travel to the tower, fight with Fa'Mes

NIGHT 5 
Diame's battle with Leviathan
Azaria's chapter
Party takes care of Diame late at night at Gruphen's house.

DAY 6, Book 2, Windsday
Lux Grande representatives arrive in Teva, and demanding for Diame to come out with what she has learned from her visions, Eljuk stalls them.
Diame and party start their day in Desye, the guys have a scene in town, their mission complete, discuss preparations to leave. Oakh takes women to the Wind Temple and Diame has a vision there, one with words, and must get back to Teva village by tomorrow morning. They take a wolfsled with Gruphen and hastily make it back to their ship. They get attacked by SLOTH on the way. They encounter secret Merfolk man, and sail their way to Ijia. Diame is nervous of using her water powers, but figuring out how to use Wind aether for the first time, she makes the ship sail faster to get back to Ijia quickly. 

NIGHT 6
They arrive in Ijia the evening, a carriage and escort of just Xavier are arranged for Diame immediately so she can return to her village for the next vision the Water Temple would give her the next day. They travel the carriage all through the night, get attacked by a banshee even, and still make it before dawn the next day.
Tavian re-asserts his role as general, bitch scene with Magnus.

DAY 7 - Dawn of a new Mersday
Diame makes it back to Teva just before dawn with her escort, and sneaks back into her home past even lux grande acolytes outside her door. She changes into her ceremonial clothes and comes out of her house, to the church's surprise. As she approaches the water temple, she discovers the church had already replaced her with another Priestess! Once she is out in public, the other woman makes her good news of what she had seen a mindless spectacle, and Diame is taken back to Lux Grande for questioning for leaving.


And thats pretty much tit.










































 





	III. Waking into a Nightmare

AWAKENING INTO DARKNESS, he took a sharp gasp to find his eyes adjusting warily to the dim light of the small stone room. The young man's head throbbed, he reached to touch it and found a cloth bandage, wrapped tightly around his head and dried with blood. He had no memory of the bandage, much less the wound, and knew even less of where he was. His eyes were still adjusting to the room's lack of light, but he thought there were three walls around him, with the fourth wall aglow with the faint unknown light source, past a grate of metal bars. Anxious to see what was was beyond them, he shrugged to sit up, which was more of a struggle than he anticipated. His muscles ached unexpectedly and sharp pangs followed when he moved, but he managed to get leant up against the stone wall behind him. 
The young man aged twenty-two years checked what he had left to him after obviously being disarmed of his weapons. He wore only the garb of a Shadow Knight in battle, removed of the darksteel battle armor and chain mail. A dark cloth shirt under a leather jerkin covering his chest, black woolen trousers, and a single metallic right-handed glove. His gauntlet was wrought of dark-steel scale plates that fit over his hand smugly as if a second layer of skin, and a short plate that covered his back forearm secured with two dark-steel buckled straps of black wyvern leather. His eyes’ irises were dark silver hazel, serrated around the pupil with a deep ruby-red circle. They were stern with command over a ferocious temper kept only to be released in combat against threats to his home. His tan face had the beard of about a week, and he imagined he had been asleep for as long. He was of average height and had short jet-black hair slicked down with sweat. He wiped his ungloved hand against his clothes, they felt grimy and dirtied his hand more than cleansing it. The young man did not know how long he had been in this room, sitting in filth.
He strained his red-hazel eyes to see past the steel bars ahead, but it was too dark to see anything. He wanted to get up and press his face against the bars to possibly catch a glimpse down the hall, but he groaned at the thought of moving as he felt his whole body throb in pain. His stomach wretched with hunger, and his parched mouth worked words his mind was starting to piece together. Where have I been taken to...? What happened to the castle...? Pain from the left temple of his head pulsed, he ran his hand through his short black hair to find part of it sticky and caked with more of his dried blood, and the bandage hurt to touch. He vaguely rembered a battle, and fighting off countless enemy soldiers, ruthlessly fervent and clad in red and gold Peval armor. "Ugh, did I let my guard down? Nay, we were overwelmed at one point, I think, and then..." the young man asked himself aloud, and the more he pushed himself to try and remember anymore, the aching in his head pulsed harshly.
	An agonized sound utterly shattered the silence, so gruesome was it, he didn't want to believe it came from another human. Though it was muffled behind somewhere, and even with all the thunder of lungs was that muffled behind somewhere, the voice sounded familiar, even if indistinguishable. The sound echoed down the stone halls, resonating after a long distance. With shock and alarm, he willed to sit up, but could barely budge his sluggish and beaten body. Gathering all his strength, and was able to rise to his feet gritting his teeth and leant gently against the coldness of the stone wall, his legs felt almost too heavy to stand. He felt against the wall until he shuffled wearily to the grate of iron bars. The screams of unbearable pain resonated again, sounding of a man that would soon be beyond recognition.
	He placed his hands on the metal grating, built in with a locked door containing the young man within the stone, windowless room. The flesh of his left hand touched the harsh cold, and his gauntleted right glove clanked against the metal. "Where am I!" He meant to shout but his voice was hoarse, and he gulped, parched from food or drink. There was another distant yell, followed again by echoes into silence.
	Frustrated, the man clanked his steel hand against the metal bars, clanking the door loudly and resonating down the halls. He cleared his throat, and strained his parched voice to shout, "What wretched rats put me in here! Fie!" He punched the prison grating, "Let me out!"
	"Oi mate, I can hear ye!" a man's voice said nearby, followed by a hush. "Keep quiet and come here."
	The young man saw a hand reach out from the hallway, and a pale, scrawny man was poking his head out of the bars in the cell adjacent to him. He found the same place in the bars where a single bar was missing, possibly for meals, and cautiously looked around as he put his head and hands through as well. "Who are you? Where is this place"
	The other man squint the eyes on his gaunt face, "Whats it to you?! Stop asking me all these questions! I-I can't handle it!" His greasy frazzled hair fell into his face and he pushed it back as he caught his breath. "I, I apologize. He, he asks me questions every day and I hear the sounds of others and..." the man trailed off, his hallowed eyes were colored light yet had barely any life in them. He looked on the verge of sobbing.
	"I'm in an interrigation gaol? I was..." Taking pause to say it out loud making it true horrified him, "... I was captured? But, then where am I?" Before he could ask anymore, another yell muffled from a distance chilled him.
	The gaunt man reached out his hand in an attempt to grab at his, even though his reach was helplessly far away. "You are in Hell my friend. This is a dungeon beneath an abandoned house, a guise so no one will come looking here for anyone. And if they do..." His eyes widened, staring straight at him with a craze and began to weep. "They share the same fate as anyone else down here."
	 "Tell me who you are, not that I want to know." The young man replied, adding a touch more patience "I want out of here just as badly as you. Now, who are you, how long have you been here?"
	The man hung his head low, his long grimy hair hiding his face as he spoke to the floor. "Me name is Aluce, I am a hunter of rare wares and well... I w-was only lookin' for any abandoned junk no one would want, try to hock it, but... I found out what was really here, and was captured." He shuddered painfully, turning to face him with tears weeping down his face, wincing at the many wasted years here. He looked a man undone by hundreds of days inflicted pain and punishment by whatever demented people kept the place. The man gathered his wits once more and went on. "This is a hidden empireal dungeon for the worst of their tried and convicted in their courts, and apparently you lot of war criminals are the only thing they are interested in at the moment. Now, you tell me who you are and why they actually want you to be here! They say you're the leader of the knights they brought back over the sea."
	Captured in the attack, imprisoned and..., the young man's red-hazel eyes widened, "We are in Peval territory!?"
	Aluce let out a maddened cackle, and grinned madly. His pale, gaunt face stretched with a mocking glower, and he continued to laugh hysterically. Another struggled groan chilled the air in the hallway, and the man stopped abruptly. "Tell me your name if you want to know a single thing more." He snarled.
	Taking a long pause, he did remember who he was. That was a relief, atleast. "I am Tavian, of house Drakon." The young man said.
	"So, you are the Ijian General? Eyes watch over us, the empire may yet be unstoppable." Aluce bore a kind of hopelessness, then gave Tavian a harsh look. "They sought you out. I know, He has been talking of you every day, hoping you were not dead. I was praying for your sake that you were." 
	"Where are the other Shadow Knights that have been taken here?"
	"Whats it to you? You won't live to see the skies again,  your Lordship." Aluce scoffed. "Consign to life in your tiny cell. They built this dungeon set up on myths of tortures inflicted in the underworld. The different chambers for prisoners are named after kingdoms ruled by daemons, and I can only imagine this is where they wanted to truly break a man's soul, and instill despair to the point that you regret being able to still draw breath. Nary a man will want to after a few days, and nary one escapes."
	"You seem to know a lot about this gaol." Tavian spoke with wit intentioned to be humorous, then regretted the words.
	Aluce repeated it, "Nary one escapes." he uttered in a chilled whisper.
	Tavian heard the yelling resonate the prison walls once more, shouted words that sounded like desperate pleading. He and Aluce stared at one other uneasily. There was silence, and then followed by very faint muffled conversation, as if two people talking. Several clanks of metal repeated, and then a metal door took its time screeched open, slowly spilling a bright orange glow flickering across the stone wall before Tavian.
	The man in the cell next to him was staring down behind him, eyes widened with terror. Aluce slunk his head back through the steel bars, Tavian did the same, and to his disgust, the new light made him aware of the cell he was within. The stone walls were all scraped and bloodied, tiny indentations where fingernails scratched until they were bloody stumps streaked across the walls indiscriminately. Tavian's stomach churned, and uneasily thought of how many had been forced in this room, and were mutilated by whatever madmen jailer Peval kept in their employ. The Shadow Knight slunk into the center of the cell, huddled on the stone floor away from any of the perturbing wall marks. He noticed more scratch marks on the ground, leading a straight line out of the cell, and turning down the hall. He blocked the image out and sat, desperately keeping his thoughts clear.
	The voices carrying on the distant conversation gradually grew closer, the orange light against the wall drew shapes of living shadows, they crept along with echoed footsteps, the words' faint cadence gradually grew audiable.
	“... Aye, but because of careless slips of the blade, a secret on the tip of a tongue forever gone!” a man grumbled with scorn. 
	“I apologize, sir.” A different man responded in meek acquiescence which sounded more a patient mock, “However, I did behoove you not to pressure me with what I do. A very delicate procedure provides the best information from chipping away at a personality to find every little thing out about them." There were a few more steps, and it seemed he was waiting for the angry man to begin talking before the oily speaking man interrupted him. "I don't even have need to explain the details of what I do, you would have seen first hand had you not paced around, commanding me to, 'press harder', like one of your soldiers. As I did what you said, you altered my entire process. I'd almost think you liked ordering me to kill. When it grew too tantalizing for you to end a man's life, with his innards proffered open on the slab, aye?” he chuckled belittlingly.
	The angry voice scoffed, and two shadows stood still in the orange hue, their silhouttes facing one another, and a man raised a threatening hand to the other and began shouting. “Nay, Inquisitor! You have failed in the last task you were given, he died with the knife in your hand, you bloody dolt. Has living underground for so many years rotted your mind to where you can not simply make a man talk?! We hold nary an Ijian prisoner more who can speak, and the last of which who you can't even tell whether if he is alive or not!" 
	The oily voice man's shadow was tall, yet sunk quietly, listening without defiance.
	Seeming to see his sign of diffidence, the angry man continued to speak, tightening the leash on his temper. "He leads the pagan knights Ijia houses, we wist not what they are capable of. Our duty is to learn of their wicked, unnatural magicks which infect Evaz'sa's holy world of light. Wist you the urgent importance of your next task and the dangers if I leave you unabided? They are aethermancers that house an evil shadow craft, magicks of the ancient world, they say, and perhaps a vital key to understanding the uncovered legends of that elusive regent called a 'mana pool', hidden in the northern lands. God-Emperor Kilnero himself inquires daily of any progress with my task, and I have to look an inept fool making excessive excuses!” There was a long pause followed by the angry man stalking over the other man, shaking with intimidation, “If you dare tell me you have failed me once more-”
	“Then do not waste my vital time with idle threats, Lord General.” the oily voiced man scoffed, “Are you not busy with your other tasks at hand? You know nary a man can keep their tongue tightened in my lair." His shadow straightened his back and waved the stalking man dismissively. "My guest would beg to convey whatever words kept clandestine and part with whatever oathes sworn on his life, if only to briefly quiet the screams I loosen from his soul.”
	The angry shadow crossed his arms and began to motion off, “Time is of the essence, you’d best be quick.” He raised his hand pointing down the hall, and a blurr of other shadows joined the scene.
	Sitting cross-legged, Tavian couldn't help but nervously stare at the reflected light and shadows as he fingered the stone floor with his metal plated hand. This must not be real, I must have hit my head harder than I thought. I can not possibly be in Pevali territory! His red-hazel eyes shifted on the blurred shadows, trying to discern what was happening.
	The movement settled and the orange light from some unseen room grew as metal clanged against stone, and loud thumps followed by a slow shuffle of footsteps and something being dragged. Another metal door creaked open and shut a few moments later with a slam.
	Sweat beaded down his face, Tavian nearly began to shake but he steeled his nerves. He had been trained rigorously in the Shadow Knight ways, methods to transfer physical pain into concentrated, powerful spells. He being one of the most powerful users of this magick, but, it was apparent he was in a weak state where conducting even a simple spell would be difficult, as he was severely wounded and barely alive from being starved for more days than he should have survived. Oh, but I am in the cruel heart of the blood blinded empire. This gaol's walls are haunted with spirits cursed to dwell here after their time. I need to escape, but I am in Peval, far, far away from home. His head wound throbbed, his red-hazel eyes widened, and a flicker of dark red light filled them for a moment, and winked out. 
Boot steps walking away, followed by steps advancing closer and a figure in the firelight drawing nearer. A door in the distance slammed loudly, and a tall hunched shadow halted before Tavian's cell bars. 
Tavian pushed his sweat matted hair out from his dirty face, and stared at the creature of a human approach him. Though the young general kept calm and did not make any more movements, the drum of his heart felt as if pounding against his ribcage, and his stomach turned sick with acid. 
The man's ghostly figure approached the steel bars, the side of his face and white coat appeared in the stretched light as he stepped before the bars, standing ridgidly and belittling, a warden examining his prisoner. The pale man leaned in closer to peer over him, dark eyes carefully staring at the man sitting in the center of his cell. He stood tall and very thin with leather belts holding his coat tight, and only now did Tavian notice the visible bloody filth running down his front. His head and face were clean shaved, and his eyes were pitch-black, cold and ruthlessly vacant. He obviously was aware Tavian had stirred in his cell, after he must have not moved for several days. Baring a slight teethy grin, he leaned forward against the metal bars with condescending words, "So, you decide to finally tell me you were alive this whole time." He said without empathy.
Raising to meet his gaze, Tavian stared back with a resistant glare.
"Did you enjoy wasting my time sleeping for nearly a whole seven nights? Pift, a trifle problem at the moment, that long-winded man is gone and with you all to myself, I can take all the time needed to make sure you can still speak. With you finally awake, let us make haste. Stand, prisoner Tavian!" The man stared at him with dangerous intentions anticipated in his eyes.
	"I could hand a heap of horseshite for your wasted time. Your haste made best be spent opening this damnable cage with my release at once!" Tavian snapped back with a scowl. I will not submit to a single word of this madman's warped mind!
	The man curled his leathery lips and let out a mocking cackle. He shook his head, "I'd expect nary any less fire from General Tavian Drakon, a man corrupted so deeply in daemonic arts. Even after you were brought here with that gash in your head, I bandaged you and tried to keep you alive, not that I truly expected you to live. Yet your unnatural magicks did not disappoint, here roaring with your pagan kingdom's bloodlust ever at the ready. How fortunate, you may now enjoy the privelage of a long, unique relationship. I will ask you  After a few years, you may get to know me as well as my pet does." A faint whimper came from Aluce's cell, and the man clad in the dirty white garb let out a sinister laugh.
	Ignoring the madman, Tavian maintained a steeled stare. "Who are you?!" He cut off the man's evil chuckle.
	A trickle of blood dripped down the man's brow, and he brought a hand to brush it aside of his sleeve, a faint smear remaining across his face. "I am the questioner retained by secret members of the Empereal military. You will address me as Lord Inquisitor Fracelan. I’ve been patiently waiting a long time for you to wake up, Tavian... very patiently." he put emphasis on the words as he locked his fingers through filthy gloves, "I was so eager to question you when they brought word a general of accursed Ijia had been ta'en. But, you were on the verge of death, and I was told not to let you die. Apparently, only a wound that rent you undone was the only way to subdue you, though it would have felled a normal man."
	The wound on his head felt as though his skull had been cracked over by a shillelagh. Tavian faintly remembered being at the front lines of a fierce battle in the midst of a night that could have been the same one as now with lapse of memory of anything else happening. He pieced together fighting ruthless Peval knights attempting to charge the castle over the fallen wall, however, he seemed to remember facing multiple foes at once, as his knights were overwhelmed. The Pevali seemed to be set on to overtake Ijia, yet their blades were turned on the Shadow Knights. In fact, did many of their soldiers ever pass the front lines, even with their greater numbers? All was a blurr in his head, then he realized an even worse thing could have happened if he was here. "Was the castle taken? Did Ijia fall?!" The General asked in a worry.
	With a disecting look, Fracelan answered, somewhat pleased by the fact his prisoner seemed to be already shaken. "Your kingdom of the far west still stands with your dangerous ilk, albeit the only reason why Ijia is not a burning pile of rubble is because the Empireal fleet commanded a strategic retreat. Of course, once you, along with a few other select knights utilizing your kingdom's forbidden magick were dealt with and loaded onto the ships, the task Peval set out to do was completed." He said with the satisfaction of having Ijia's general set so before him.
	Shock gaped Tavian's jaw for a moment, then he quickly closed it, and a hateful grimace replaced it. "You mean to tell me, the entire skirish was a ruse?!" Ignoring his body's wounds and pain, he began to stand, meeting his captor's dark eyes with his enraged glare. "You mean to tell me," He forced himself over to the wall of metal bars, aching muscles moving with the fervent haste of a slug, "Scores of men have died, on either side of the battlefield, just so Peval would capture Ijian knights," He placed his hands gripping the bars, "for a mad man to question them on their magick?! Why? Why do this?! Where are my knights!" Tavian shouted nearly in the man's face.
	A frown of dissatisfaction met with the prisoner before him, and Fracelan squint his eyes thoughtfully at him once more, "As for why we have taken an interest in your magick, soon enough, you will know. Very, very, soon." A hateful grin twisted his face, and he let out a brief yet not any less mad, heartless chuckle. "Taking the time to understand your kingdom's use of pagan aethermancy, I did have the opportunity to tinker with some Ijian Paladins as well as the Shadow Knights you once commanded. Aye, the few white knights I questioned did not demonstrate their Paladin magick. They only uttered desperate prayers to Evaz'sa's merciful light, yet their voices did fill these chamber walls but not with words of use beyond the sounds they made whilst mine blade enjoyed splitting open their bellies." A crazed smile split his pointed teeth, eyes rolling as if recalling the sick ecstacy of one of many a sadistic moment. "They prayed to the light, and sank into darkness, never to see the outside of the Furnace!" he bocked an ironic laugh. "My orders never spoke of their lives' importance, and after they met their end, I was ready to begin on your Shadow Knights. They were an interesting lot."
	Tavian's gauntleted and bare hands grabbed against the bars, staring the vile man with his dark eyes full of a deep, seething hatred. The most cruellest of criminals hired to do the unspeakable work of the empire, an inquisitor in his bloody high necked uniform coat, giving gnawing grins and staring at him with intentions to somehow piece him apart. Even worse, this thing of a man liked to do this to noble Shadow Knights Tavian knew and commanded. They were not to be remembered recieving a valiant warrior's death fighting Underworld creatures in an attempt to defend their country, nay, this Empire of the East set out to torture Ijian lives! They met their end at the hands of a madman in this forsaken gaol! "Who did you murder?" he exhaustedly asked the heavy question, and tightened his hands around the bars, his gauntleted hand scraping loudly against the metal. "How many Ijian lives did you take, you bile breathing bastard!" He managed to raise his voice to meet with his captor's.
	Crossing his gloves covered black with filth, Fracelan removed them one after another, uncaring if blood slicked his pale, elongated hands. "You have demanded many answers to a mountain of questions, I answer only because I need to see how cognitive your brain still is. I inform you to better the words you speak, but mostly because you were not awake to hear your comrades beg for mercy."
	"You lie!" Tavian roared hoarsely.
	"Oh, your Ijians allies fought back and struggled, curses to my name and even warned that I would be placed on my own slab. Hah!" Fracelan turned to the light source staring at something down the hall, the wet slick of his coat reflecting the flickering orange light. "It makes nary a difference what threats a man makes with his innards gutted out. Although I did learn much of your Shadow Knight Arcana in this process, oddly enough, but only as they died. Their unnatural eyes glowed and at times could mend their own flesh where cut, which was fascinating, but unfortunately for them it only prolonged their lives and suffering, although not nearly enough to learn anymore. Not so in the case with you," He turned his unkind glare with a certain unsettling glimmer, growing somewhat excited, and slowly closing in on Tavian within his cell. "I had to stave off the, the longing to feel my knife cut into your flesh... Waiting so patiently when you would awaken, if you would awaken, to hear the locked away words you will beg to disclose to me.” Fracelan gave Tavian a twisted grin with his pointed teeth. 
	Banging his gauntleted hand, the door and bars confining Tavian rattled and resonated, but the painful punch took everything for him to maintain his balance afterwards. A worthwhile rouse that did cause his captor to flinch, and it fired the young man's retort. "Nay, I'll never betray a single word to the Pevali Inquisition!" Struggling through feeling like his whole body was one giant ache, Tavian managed keep on his feet, albeit wobbly. “I’d sooner endeavor any pain and take what it is you seek to the grave before I would utter a single breath of a word!” He held still, keeping his mirth fast.
	Composing himself, Fracelan had underestimated the fight left in this captured man, but he went back to standing ridgidly as if his prisoner hadn't startled him off guard. “I do not have plans to let you see a grave, you see, you are all that is needed, and while you withhold words, you rot in this cell as the moons pass by. Maintain your resistance with nothing to say, and even while your body lay before me to vivisect, your silence will break for the sounds of secret words, but I do long to hear your screams. In time, your spirit will break and perhaps with mercy I will spill your innards out before you. Answer my questions I have for you as you may, in the end, you will feel my infinite mercy, giving you the cold, tantalizing embrace of death you’ll yearn for.” Pausing for a hard stare, Fracelan then started to dig through a pouch in the side of his coat. "In fact, I grow impatient with the wasting of my time. I think I shall welcome you to the hearth of your new home, and show you the true horror. Excruciating toils beyond your imagination will now become real nightmares that you shall never awaken from." Out from his filthy coat he pulled a long coil of thumb-sized dark metal links, a sinister glee painted his gaunt, hairless face as he fingered the chain expectantly.
	His chest pounding, Tavian thought of something to say, something to do. I need to be in Ijia, I have to tell them what I know! What will become of me?! He wanted to look around for an escape but knew there was one. The young general stared down the frightful man holding the chain, though he had no intention of letting Fracelan use it on him. "You detestable fiend! Damn you and all of Peval! I care not what disgusting acts you desire to inflict, or whatever emperial dog barks your orders, I will never succumb to pain of torture! Is the empire so afeared of Ijia's Shadow Knights they must capture and kill them akin to kiniving spiders, afeared to face a warrior in battle! I will never divulge secrets to such a weak, pathetic coward! You will witness the full fire of my resistance, the leader of the Shadow you so fear!" He panted for a breath, and tried to will his hazey mind to concentrate, desperately trying to tap into his magick known as Arcana. 
	The tight bandage around his temple wracked the throbbing wound to his head, his mind hurt in the attempt to use his aethermancy, but the master of Darkness Magick would not give up so easily. I should be able to gather enough of the aether in here to return some of mine lost strength. Inevitably, he must open the door, I can then overpower him by surprise. With all his might he ignored the pain at his wound, feeling as though his head would split further. 
	Sensing the cold darkness energies in the gaol cells, Tavian felt old feelings of long suffered anguish and despair, the wall splatters marking the countless human suffering. Such actions had left lingering aether of the Darkness element at the place, the secrets of the Shadow Knights can harness the element into strengh. Such was the powerful discipline of Arcana, utilizing what dark intentions that once caused harm in the past to themselves or others, and become an embodiment of revenge. So fierce and feared are these knights by underworld spawn or cruel men who would commit truly wicked acts, the surprise to Tavian was underwhelming when he found himself trapped in the evil empire's gaol, with them at the ready to find out what makes his magick tick. What truly evil things were they doing to require knowledge of Arcana magick passed Tavian's thoughts, but dismissed it as he continued to concentrate on conducting.
	Eyes burning with their red glow, Tavian felt the flows of the darkness aether enter his body from head to toe through small, thin wisps of black mist that seemed to ooze out of the walls. Warming his blood and soothing the aches in his muscles, the dark energy around him replaced his lost strength with a rush of energy that swelled fiercely like battlefield adrenaline. He could feel his flesh restored from within, his limbs aching and numb from atrophy swelled with the warm aether flowing through him. He was unaware if Fracelan knew what he was doing, or if he could see the spell or the aether he was conducting, but nonetheless, the man watched with hateful eyes piqued with perturbing curiosity, and yet did not look worried to stop him. Tavian figured that as long as a wall of steel bars separated him from the torturer, he should manage to finish his spell uninterrupted.
	A sort of unexpected heaviness came down up on Tavian as he conducted the cell's lingering dark magick energies within himself. He throught it odd, but reminded himself he had lost a lot of strength, and had suffered from a headwound and starvation. He could feel the connection to the walls, every pock hole in its surface, every ripple and scratch mark he felt with his mind, every drop of dried dark red streaked down it. That bastard! I will show him the strength of Ijia and teach him to fear the Shadow! He tried to draw energies around him more, drinking deeper of the dark aether staining the walls around him. The heaviness suddenly took over his body, and he collapsed to his hands and knees, writhing as a sickness pummeled his stomach, and his body felt paralyzed as if his limbs were all sluggish with rot. He struggled to stay even sitting on his knees, and could not stop from absorbing the room's energies, no matter how hard he tried to sever the flows he had made into himself. A burning sensation grew over him, he felt as if every bone in his body were bruised and broken, and he had his mouth agaped to yell from the unimaginable pain sensation that had overtaken him, but only a hoarse, airy whisper escaped. The Shadow Knight general lay helpless, mind dazed and lost for reason for what had happened to him.
	Cautiously, Fracelan bent his neck, lowering his head down the stiff collar of his filthy coat. Standing over the man hunched over in pain, he wore a grin of pure satisfaction through his pointed teeth. "Aye, Lord General Tavian, you should learn to kneel before me sooner rather than later, however it helps you not." 
	There was a rattling of metal, and Tavian strained his downcast gaze to turn up to see what his captor was doing, even though fighting the agony from whatever wicked spell continued to do so to him. Metal links rattled metallically as pale Fracelan pushed the coiled chain through through the rectangle opening in the confining cell bars where he had thought would be for taking in a prisoner's meal. I can not move but only feel this pain, what does he expect me to do? Willingly bind myself? I can barely move as it is as I'm eaten away by detestable uses of aethermancy! With a clamor of metal, the chain tossed within the cell landed by Tavian's bare feet on the dimly lit stone floor. Unable to move beyond invuluntary spasms, he wondered briefly what Fracelan planned to do with the chain, then he felt cold metal slithering around his legs, binding them tightly, and continueing to wrap up his body. He fell off his hands and tried to grab at the chain and wrestled with it and with his might pulled to loosen its hold, but it made no difference and wrapped around his arms as well, tossing him flat to the ground and hitting his wounded head against the stone floor. In a daze, Tavian saw a flash of light, then the dark room became an even darker blurr. Sounds became distant and he knew his head hurt, but whatever he was percieving now was beyond a state of disorientation.
	 The chain tightened taught and then stopped as Tavian felt the cold metal pieces dig into him through his clothes, constricting his breathing and aching his wounded body. Wrapped tightly as if the interconnected chains were all one piece of meta continueing to bend and warp, then flattened. 	Hitting against the floor again, Tavian's bandaged head throbbed and his vision blurred, the dim light of the room was hazey, and he could hear repetative clicking sounds of metal. The long shriek of the rusted door creak open nailed an echo to the walls, resounding of wailing spirits. He could feel himself being dragged against the floor with the constant sound of chains scraping with the stone.
	A blaring orange effulgence of wildly flickering firelight at the end of a long tunnel eclipsed by a black shadow looming from above, its arms outreached for him. He felt the coolness of the stone floor rasp against his skin and sore body as step by step the shadow dragged him closer towards the orange glow. Tavian could only watch the dim bars of light cast into empty cells fade in and out of existance as he passed them by.
	As Tavian approached the solid orange glow of the vertical rectangular entrance, the shadow dragging him crossed the threshold, Fracelan's face seen with a grin as he passed into the light, then he was too bright to see. A moment of shock as Tavian saw shadows cast from faces above him, yet he knew no one stood there as he was dragged into the orange light. He strained his head against the chain wrapped around his neck, and a brief look back down the hallway chilled him. Tavian swore he saw hundreds of faces, all shadows and wisps, all at the height of where men would stand, but no bodies beneath. No shock filled him, no time for worrying about anything else but his life. A surreal sight, or a trick of my wounded mind? A malicious trap of suffered false illusions? Whatever the shadowed faces filling the air in the hallway were, or weren't, they still hovered there, dark eyeless stares faded all together as he was dragged completely into the light. The heavy metal door reflecting of the fire swung slowly, closing out the dark hallway, then shut with a clang that echoed briefly in the small room.










		III.2 Within the Furnace

	Tavian's eyes wearily adjusted to the brightness of the room, and the warm pool he was laying in, bound to the coiled chain. He became aware of the horrible stench violating his nostrils, the smell of gore and burnt blood, and worst of all the water he lay in was red and rank. His bindings were pulled and Fracelan dragged him, then propped him upright against the wall, and then shackled metal manacles to his wrists binding his hands; metal and flesh both. Fracelan pulled at the chains against the wall, pulling taut and hoisting Tavian up. He tried struggling, but movement was sluggish and he could barely put the thought to move his limbs in the daze he was in. The leather jerkin he wore came off, leather straps cut off with scissors, as was his dark shirt. Deep scars of long past were bore into Tavian's chest, running down his stomach, the old cuts were rippled into one another from countless cuts suffered during battle. Fracelan eyed the old wounds thoughtfully, then continued to pull at the rest of his clothing, removing his trousers and smallclothes, stripping him bare. Then shackled his feet to the wall as well, tightened with chains.
	Trying to intake the small room with the bright heat in the back through his blurry vision was a challenge for Tavian, as was puzzling out what was being done to him. The tall man carried something dunked into a barrel and came at him with it. The young man opened his lungs for breath to shout expecting pain, and instead felt his body splashed with ice cold water, he coughed on it as he gasped for air. His red-hazel eyes squint, and he could see, catching his wind as he snapped out of his daze. 
	The stone room held a large hearth built into the wall filled with a roaring fire that lit up the room with a hot, dark red and orange flame through a metal grating. Affixed to the wall above it were knives and swords, hanging from the stone ceiling were hooks from chains, and the walls were black and red from gore. The floor was a slick of water and sticky red blood scattered with tiny pieces of torn flesh. A giant stone slab with shackles at either end lay on the ground nearly covered with gore and filth. A long wooden table nearby it held rusted instruments, saws, knives, screws with spiked tips, and an array of small yet cruel devices, some he knew as thumbscrews or leg splitters, others were strangely shaped metal machines that were a blade or two rested in a gear turned by crank. Tavian had never seen the kinds of objects ever employed for questioning in before, especially not in Ijia. How they were used were unknown yet each device seemed crafted so intricately heinous he desired not the knowledge. 
	In the middle of this room, Fracelan stood, tall in his filthy white coat, surrounded by the glow of the fire in the questioning room. "This is the Furnace, where all in my gaol spill their secrets until I deign they may meet their end."
	Pulling at the shackles around his arms and legs did Tavian any help, even his right hand of gauntleted metal pulled against the chains to no avail. He was suspended a hand or two off the stone ground, unable to fight, bound with his back against a wood board affixed to the wall. "You vile coward, I shall speak not a single word in response to what questions you may ask. I will keep Ijia safe even as I die, if only to keep the knowledge you seek away from you." Tavian snarled at him, pulling at his chains, trying to tear them out of the wall with what strength he could muster.
	Watching him attempt to break free of his chain binds, Fracelan stood thoughtfully weighing his captive. "A violent brute of a lad, aren't you?" He examined Tavian with a frown, unafraid of how he pulled at the confining chains as he approached close enough as if discecting him in his mind. "What strength, but of a passionate, true warrior that will never give up, or perhaps it is the result of the long use of wicked magicks that bestow these unnatural powers. As you struggle for your life, it would be considered admirable by many. However, to be so corrupted by daemonic magick and to desperately make use of it to save ones own wicked life when put near death is pathetic. A natural death should have brought an end to you long ago it seems, monster." He pointed his finger to the numerous aged tears through the lads skin, each burrowed deep in numerous places in the flesh of his torso, and scoffed, "So many old openings in the flesh that tell of would-be mortal wounds on your Shadow Knights, and for you, you're covered in them. Yet, you're younger and less experienced than them, and are the most proficient in your magick? How could you be a more seasoned warrior? How is it that you are still even are alive now?" Fracelan turned his back to the struggling prisoner, musing his questions to himself as he walked towards the fire. "What unnatural muscle you have twisted your body into, and wounds that would have felled a normal man seemed to have been shrugged off, it could be all due to the continued use of shadow magick, or what you Ijians call Arcana." A metal scraped open, and the grating to the furnace swung wide, resting against the stone wall containing the blaze. A long dagger was resting on a mount, hilt sticking out of the fire, blade resting within. Grabbing the wood hilt, Fracelan turned round from the furnace with a red-hot blade in his sickly white hand.
	Pulling at the reinforced chains randomly had little use and only cut into the flesh of Tavian's left hand. He hung by his wrists and feet, still pulling tightly at his binds but well aware of the madman wielding the dagger approaching him.
	"Those are just a few of the myriad of questions I have been pondering, and I do not have the patience to continue asking the same questions over and over like a fool. So for the time you waste, I will entertain myself listening to the sounds I will wring from the depths of your belly, or wherever else I'll savor splitting open. Speak or not, you will provide answers so that I understand how your kingdom's unnatural magicks works."
	It became more apparent to Tavian that his captor meant his eyes' irises, the serrated pattern of red over hazel. It was unknown even to him how his eyes were this way, but it made no difference to Fracelan who seemed to believe nothing but everything daemonic about him and the Shadow Knights he had already murdered. Whatever this maggot-brained dog of the empire seeks comes from he has already decided I am nothing but evil! "Oh, I will tell you, since your idiot emperor has shed so much innocent blood over nothing!" With a hoarse strain of his voice, Tavian shouted, then continued, staring down the tall man with the red hot blade in his hand, "We fight against the Underworld spawn, and what we know of them is widely unaccepted as mere lore, and we stay true to our oathes known to be only for the purpose of protecting others so that they may sleep peacefully without fear of creatures sneaking in their homes at night. I have seen and hunted down daemonic creatures known as myths, and we keep them just. Our common enemy is the threat of any creatures from beneath the surface of Caelutera, and Ijia's magick Shadow Knights as well as her Paladins keep their armies strong merely for that purpose. Your Legions of Peval on the other hand imprison and impoverish one kingdom after the next, and slaughter any resistance, now you turn your blood-blinded eyes to Ijia. How can you bastards of the empire make any sense of the killing you do?" He pulled his face away from the heat of the dagger as Fracelan held it out, taunting the words he spoke.
	Holding the blade close to Tavian's throat, Fracelan let his victim feel the heat of the knife for a harsh moment, to behold the imminent threat. "I know the tales spun of heroism that may trick one less clever as I into believing that such twisted magicks could be a nothing less than the result of dark dealings with the underworld. Whatever lies you believe or have indoctrined others into matter not. The clear fact is that what you and your knights are are unnatural beings in the eyes of God, and what wicked magicks you use perverse Caelutera." A grin crept across his pointed teeth, "Now, tell me it is wise to believe a man who swears on his wicked life to tell me nothing then blurts out the most base spun tale imaginable. End the lies, lad, and tell me what you and the other damnable Shadow Knights have done to aid the Underworld and their kin. I want to know more of how Ijia uses its Arcana magick, and need to see more of how your daemonic magick works. Tell me of the blood pacts your knights have made, and how your daemon masters make you stronger." He awaited answer, and the knife he held showed the bredth of his patience.
	The fearless glare from Tavian's red-hazel eyes froze still and cold as ice, "You would have to help me create the rest of that tale, since those facts exist not." Ignoring the heat from the blade close to his throat, his voice was slow and cool as he stared down the tall man. 
	With a widening grin of pointed teeth, Fracelan waved the red hot blade disapproving in front of Tavian's face, "An unwise descision, but nonetheless..." 
	The hot red pike before Tavian's face made his eyes wince and his neck gulp as the heated blade lowered, the heat held over his scarred chest, and he watched as a disturbing craze built in the inquisitor's dark eyes. The red-hot dagger pressed against his skin, cauterizing the flesh as the cut sizzled. Tavian braced against the chains in a strain to endure the pain, as the heated point of the sharp dagger cut against his chest, dragged to his right shoulder. He grunted and shifted in his binds as the knife burnt him, then a loud groan that withheld a ferocious yell as the madman sank the weapon deeper into his flesh, the excruciating pain writhed it, and he endured as a warrior would take a wound in battle, though it made the pain no different. 
	"Curse you!" Tavian shouted, and he looked away, turning a focus to the flames roaring in the furnace. The dagger was pulled out, yet he still felt the sharpness that had pierced his flesh and bones. The cool sting of his own cruor running down his side did not reduce his rage, and he attempted in the desperate moment to reach for the Fire Aether across the room. He invisioned the the furnace fires' in his mind, he wanted the wall to burst open in an inferno that would consume his captor.  Although the room's glow brightened and the flames billowed for a brief moment, even powerful enough causing Fraclan to turn his attention. But then the flames fluttered back to how they had been, and Tavian felt a burning sensation take over his body, and nearly choked on his breath as if consumed in flame for a moment. He felt as though his flesh were a melting candle, burning out of his skin, and he writhed in his chains, panting for breath. Reluctantly, yet none too quickly he pushed the thoughts of the fire out of his mind, releasing the aether from the grasp of his affinity, and in an instant the burning sensation ceased building, he knew he was no longer at a threat of suffering a further backlash. What remaining magickal residue of the spell felt like his skin had all but been singed off, but he was still alive, and if he truly felt what was happening to him he knew he would be dead.
	Turning halfway to carefully watch Tavian and the furnace return to normal, Fracelan glowered at the man recovering from the phantom pain. "That would be a sprung trap, if you will. A precaution for a creature of dangerous magicks, such as you, general."
	The Shadow Knight could barely stand to hear the disgusting man speak as Tavian began to understand his situation. I had conducted the wisps of darkness aether earlier, and when I felt that surge of strength it quickly depleted. As I tapped into the fire to use it to my will, the aether conduit seemed to reverse and fight back with burns as soon as I barely could tap into it! His thoughts trailed off, the burns from magickal trickery were not as severe as before, and indeed faded away. Thin wisps of smoke arose from the cuts where Tavian felt the burns' scathe the the most. He endured, and the pain of the heat ceased. "Curse you..." Tavian muttered, his voice rasped.
	The tall man stood with the red hot razor in his hand, and frowned at Tavian with disdain. "What fight you have in you. You were willing to even sustain burning yourself to ash, just to attempt in vain to, to," Tavian even noted a hint of surprise on the man's face. "to do harm to me."
	Tavian wheezed as he regained his breath, the smoke around him dissipating, and the burns a memory, he raised his head to meet with his captor. He pulled at the metal manacles on his wrists, wearing out his already weary muscles, and strained his neck thrusting his head forward, teeth grit, he heaved through them. "If these chains bound me not, I would paint the walls darker red with your blood, smash your skull to the stone, and besmear this chamber with your skinless flesh!" He growled through his grin of rage. "You're filth that can be assured, I would gladly die as a proud Shadow Knight, even just to harm you, even just enough to deform you so you could never do your sick acts on another living person again." He snarled, taking a deep satisfaction as he obviously had the tortuerer startled and on his toes. He'll let his guard down, and when he does I'll-
	As quick as a viper could swipe, a brutal backhand struck Tavian's face, his neck twisted to the side, and saw a momentary, dizzying flash of light. Tavian heaved his breath heavily, and ignored the pain, the disorientation, raised his head to levelly stare into the face of his captor. "Is that all you can muster? That could have been how hard your grandmother used to spank you as a boy?!" The Shadow Knight's red-hazel eyes were staring at the tall man as if he were meat ready to vivisect in piece meal, completely disregarding his binds. The taste of his own blood filling his mouth didn't help to dissuade those thoughts. Tavian felt like an chained, hungry animal that would act as such to this deserving pray given the chance.
	The tall inquisitor stood darkened by the roaring fire behind him. "Whatever you're trying to accomplish, I welcome you to tire yourself trying." A displeased snarl twisted the leathery lips on Fracelan's pale, shaven face. "You, the propagator of your wicked knights, whatever magicks you instilled in them, whatever magicks are within you, that is more than quelled and controlled. You seem to think yourself in power, still in command of your knights, and please delude yourself that you are actually in a battle you can win." He looked at Tavian, chained and stripped as a creature less than human, and with what seemed with a reassured nerve that his captive was indeed secured, he raised his red hot knife once more. "Indeed, you have lost. Your pagan home is wounded, and the Kingdom of Ijia and her black magick knights shall fall. Now, we were talking of-" As bloody saliva spat into his eyes, Fracelan's words interrupted, replaced with a gasp and a short, yet loud, indignant growl. 
	The sound replacing the echo in the small chamber was Tavian's mocking chuckle, his red-hazel eyes captor with contempt and belittlement. "We were talking of how much you cried as a boy, and how now, you're naught but a sniveling little torturesome coward!" Tavian had his gaze readied to meet with Fracelan's as soon as he had finished struggling to wipe out his eyes, and he wanted the blinded man to hear his chiding, spiteful laughs.
	The tall man had some trouble wiping his eyes out on his coat, the only clean spaces were his shoulders, and that did not suffice, apparently. The inquisitor's idnignant groan turned into a flurry of furious curses, muttered in a barely coherent low roar after his failed tries at cleaning out his eyes with the bloody backs of his glove, an effortful act in vain. He endeavored digging his leathern fingers into the corners of his eyes, another mistake making his vision worse than it already was before. He gripped one gloved hand with the fingers of the other holding the knife, and peeled off the leather wrapped around his pale skin. Dropping the bloody glove to the floor with his knife wielding hand, he used his bare hand to wipe some of the blood and spit from his sight, and in minimal vision, caught glimpse of the open water casque in the corner. He rushed over to it as soon as he remembered it was there, and scooped a handful of water to splash into his eyes, and another, whilst his curses and mutterings cooled. 
	Tavian knew his rouse to intensify the animosity between him and his captor deftly brought him the results he wanted when Fracelan turned to him, gnashing his pointed teeth at him making a beastly growl, coming from well beyond contempt. 
	The inquisitor's clawed at lids split wide revealing his veiny reddened eyes, bulging from his skull with seething rancor focused straight into Tavian's sight. He raised the knife with his gloved hand, now glowing a dull orange but still hot enough to sear through flesh nonetheless, and threatened it outwards to Tavian, ready to strike. Then Fracelan's gnashing teeth stopped thoughtfully, and his leathery lips twisted into a grit smile, something clever had crossed his mind. "Nay, I shall take my time with you, to ensure you learn a harsh lesson before I make you beg for death. You'll wish I had ended your life here and now!" He said, raising his bare hand in a fist to strike.
	Tavian's bared teeth, having making fool smiles and laughter full of scorn to his blinded captor moments before, now opened like a sprung trap readied for a feral beast. The knight lunged out to meet with Fracelan's fist, and sank his teeth deep into the flesh of his captor's hand. Tavian had a firm, relentless grip of Fracelan's hand in his teeth, and would not stop, sinking his bite in deeper. The man's blood filling his mouth, the screams he made, nor how he struggled to pull his hand free stopped the chained man pushed to his limits from ceasing his desperate attack.
	Pulling his hand away did naught to free himself from the chained man's bite, and as Fracelan's own blood gushed down his struggling arm, the teeth tore deeper into his flesh. The excruciating pain grew as agonizingly as his sinew snapped and bones broke, and in panicked desperation, he stabbed with the dagger from his gloved hand. Burying the blade into Tavian’s ribcage, red cruor burst forth with every strike, splattering across the knight as well as as the inquisitor as he repetatively stabbed the bound man in his torso and chest with voracious, fervent strikes in quick succession. "LET. ME. GO!" Fracelan shouted with the last three strikes that left Tavian's scarred body a riddled mess of wounds that blood ceaselessly flowed and dripped from.
	As the strikes to his lungs and organs tore his flesh, Tavian kept his grip strong with his final drifting thoughts brought about by the loss of blood and shock. His body went completely ragged, his eyes rolled, and his neck went limp, his head downcast as the knight slowly died, teeth still in hold on Fracelan's flesh, defiant even in his own death.
	Throwing the knife to the ground, the last bit of the blade's heat sizzled with the damp blood on the floor. Fracelan grabbed Tavian's lifeless face, and wedged his gloved hand between his teeth, and pried his jaws open, an with a wince and loud yelp of pain, he pulled out his deformed hand. Blood poured in a long rustic stream from Tavian's mouth, as well as from his own wound down his arm. He held up his hand and grabbed it with the other, nursing in vain his wound that left a raw chuck of flesh hanging by skin, his bone bitten through and pointed, tendons and blood vessels that well never heal back together. His hand was completely ruined, and he stared at the bite marks in his flesh, and back to Tavian's body with a sort of hatred that he could only realize now, after his victim was dead and he was deformed. Rage filled his soul, then the pain of his wound chided him, and he let out a resounding wail in frustration. "Curse you! God damn it all, you bastard!" He screamed with strained scorn at the dead man.
	Straining himself reminded him of the open wound, as the pain stabbed up his arm, he realized he had to continue his duties as is. He hobbled to a chair near his table of favorite cruel devices, and muttered curses as he rest his wounded hand on the table, and with the other grabbed a small metal box from the floor and placed it on the table. Opening the latch with his gloved fingers, he opened up a box with strips of thick cloth bandages, and grabbed one. He forced himself to place a hanging piece of flesh back to where it was on his lower palm, and wrapped, disfigured flesh back into place, staunching the bloodflow and cursing and wincing at the pain at every moment. "Damned fool!" He breathed faster and faster to the point he would hyperventilate, "I have learned barely anything useful of their magicks, nor their accursed kingdom! Every one of these Ijian knights had been," he looked over to Tavian's bleeding corpse hanging by chains to the wall and took his eyes off the sight immediately, "vicious, savages with pagan beliefs that make them more animal than human! What else is there to know!? Ouch, damn it!" He yelped as he tightened the bandage, stopping the bleeding but doing nothing for the excruciating pain, he felt as though he would nearly pass out as he dressed his wound. He grit his gnashed teeth, and growled in agony as he wrapped the bandage tighter, tears of pain streamed down his bloody face. "Eyes curse you!" he muttered as he had at last wrapped it tight enough to stop the blood flow to his mangled hand.
	Fracelan sat quietly for a moment, taking in what had happened in his chamber he fondly called The Furnace, the man he had just slain a bloody reminder of his failure hung on the wall, a man covered in more fresh blood and open wounds than flesh. "The leader of the Shadow Knights, pfah!" he spat on the ground, "I learned nothing, and their leader is undone. What further harm could Ijia's army pose to us?" the inquisitor shook his head, "Nay, that will not be a satisfactory report to tell... him." He shivered at the thought, and then looked around the room glowing in orange fire, burning from a metallic grating in the wall. The hanging corpse reflected of the light, and Fracelan could not stand the sight of his falure any longer.
	"I've learned all I can, I suppose it would be waste of time to dwell on what I can not change." He stood, and made his way around the table, through a sticky puddle of blood in his boots, to the bloody body bound by the wrists and ankles. "I still have work for the Great Empire to do, I'll take this to the morgue, I suppose." He stared at the dead man, full of fight and fury moments ago, now mere vacant eyes staring at the floor, head and limbs lifeless. "You will be the cause of more problems harsher still for me, but I shall survive. As for you, friend," He grabbed his ring of keys from his coat poke, and with a click, unlocked the metal manacles around the corpse's ankles, then one wrist, the man hung by his steel gauntlet. The inquisitor frowned thoughtfully at the man's metal gauntlet he only wore on his right hand as he unlocked the manacle over it. "Who knows what you were." He said to the corpse as the body fell limp and ragged as a cloth doll to the puddles of blood on the ground. 
	Looking down at the naked body on the floor, Fracelan almost felt bad for the man he had just slain, even worse that he died withholding valuable enemy secrets he was supposed to learn. "Fortunes be tough all round, aye?" He said as he knelt down to grab the corpse by the legs. 
	With invisible strength, Tavian reached for the knife in the puddle of blood with his gauntleted hand. In a quick motion, he swiped the blade in a clean slice through Fracelan's bootheel, severing the man's Achilles' tendon.
	Letting out a yelp from the unexpected strike, Fracelan fell backwards, slamming his head against his workplace with the torture devices and bandage box, toppling the table and everything atop it over. Knives, screws and clean bandages  soaking up old blood littered the floor, Fracelan stared at the moving corpse in horror as he could only crawl backwards on one hand and one foot, slipping with every step against the blood slicked floor.
	Laying flat, Tavian bent his knees inwards, placing his feet beneath his back. Then he began to straighten out his legs, rising up completely pivoting on his knees with his back out, completely bent as if he were in a limbo. His blood drenched torso and chest rose upright, and then crowned with Tavian's head, centered with a pair of half open eyes, full of glowing bright red that bore into the inquisitor on the floor beneath him.
	"How?!" Fracelan shouted as he tried to crawl back to little avail, slipping in the blood and trying to get around the toppled table. "How in hell do you still live?!" He gazed up in disbelief and doom at the man with eyes of firelight above him, and raised his bandaged hand, quivering. 
	As Tavian reacclaimated to standing upright, he also felt he was in another state of mind, one full of aether, magick power ready to be used. The strength he could feel surging in his body surprised him, for he looked down at his torn apart body, he knew he was not standing alive by any normal means. He became very aware of his wounds even though he could not feel the pain, and as soon as the thought came to his mind, the blood stopped trickling from his body. The dripping cruor slowed, and dried into thick scabs in bruised patches over Tavian's body, and smoothed over. All his open wounds closed and puckered skin dissolved, leaving only lighter colored cuts of scar tissue, adding to riddles of battle scars already covering Tavian's chest and torso. He felt his lungs made whole, able to draw breath once again, and to his surprise, suddenly noticed the pulse of his heart beat return. He looked down at the man slipping on the floor, backed up against the toppled table, and even still squirming away. "It was death's release," Tavian opened his glowing red eyes fully, and stared down at the inquisitor, befitting his place crawling on the floor. "that freed my mind from the curse you placed on my aethermancy." An ingratiating grin crept across his face to meet with the dumbstruck look Fracelan returned to the man ressurected before him. He took a single step towards the man on the floor, "How now, might you answer questions of my own, inquisitor." He took another step forward, red eyes still locked. "Such as... what is your life worth to you, and if I should I spare it?"
	"Wicked beast!" Holding up his bandaged hand defensively as Fracelan slid back, slipping through blood on his unwounded hand and foot, making his way around the table. "You stay back!" he said as he kicked aggressively, gradually making his way away against the slick blood puddles. He let out a yelp feeling a sharpness, and pulled his crawling hand up in bated shock. A cut straight through his glove from one of the scattered knives strewn about stopped him from going back any further, and Fracelan looked back over his shoulder to the roaring furnace, all his his fond devices strewn in a firelit path behind him. He realized if that crawling back any futher he'd shred himself on his own devices. "Back with your daemon magicks, I say!" He sat leant on his elbow, holding his bloody hands up.
	As Tavian took another step forward to stand over the squirming torturesome man below him. "You have assumed so much of my magicks, even while you knew so little." He looked around the room, pausing time to time as if to hear some sort of quiet conversation. "Well, you did bring me here to learn of what it is that your empire so feared of my nation Ijia." Then his glowing red eyes averted back to the man on the floor, the gaze itself giving him a jolt. A smirk knowing of the disabled man's harmlessness crossed Tavian's bloody lips, and then to further show he had pacified the man, the knight extended his gauntleted hand in an act of chivalry. "You have yet still to see what magicks the leader of the Shadow Knights is capable of, aye?"
	Taken completely by surprise, Fracelan looked at the man's outreached metal hand with wide-eyed fear as if the gauntlet were an open fanged addler. The inquisitor pulled his bandaged hand back and looked up at Tavian, clearly untrusting of the man with glowing red eyes that was supposed to be his captive. But when he looked around him, the floor was covered in sharp objects and indeed he was too injured to escape either way. "What are you going to do?!"
	Distract as if his attention was turned elsewhere, Tavian looked side to side, "The Aether in this room," his red-hazel eyes searched past the glowing light bore from them. "It swells nearly out of control. The sheer amount of human energies released in this room..." The man trailed off distract, staring intently at something on the wall at eye level, barely still aware he stood over someone who had just posed a threat to him. 
	Unsure what possible intentions the man with glowing eyes could be thinking, his response was breathy and hesitant. "Wh-what is it that you see?" Fracelan could not help but ask inquisitively. 
	"I am able to not only see..." Tavian paused, wincing slightly as if he were in the middle of trying to pay attention to hear something out. "I can hear it."
	Looking around him, Fracelan strained to hear nothing but the low growls of air eaten by the furnace flames. "Hear what? How?" He asked with his insatiable curiosity.
	A slight grin swept across Tavian's face and bloody teeth, once again ingratiated by the inquisitor's cooperation. He once more reached out his metallic hand. "The pinnacle of magickal wisdom, wrought from aethermancy techniques only I have the knowledge of, or the skill to use." He nodded knowingly to meet with the man's skeptic looks, keeping his hand outreached. 
	Fracelan looked at the gauntleted hand still with uncertainty, and at Tavian, and at his own wounds and what had become of his chamber. It was his duty to question those taken to him, and failure was only realized when his victims would die before he could learn anything of use. He had failed, letting the most valuable source of information trick him, being outwitted into killing the man, and allowing him to think he was dead just to escape his bindings, even injuring his captor so he could heal his own wounds. Even after this, the man had survived with the power of his magicks, and whatever state of mind he was in, he seemed to be willing to share his knowledge. After struggling so much to get any info out of this prisoner, to only fail and consign himself to inevitable punishment, could this be a sign of redemption? This man brought back to life could be a second chance to complete his job and forego reprimand? What possible reason would this man have to share his secrets, after he as already freed? But, if this is indeed his second chance... could he not afford to lose the opportunity to see what ultimate secrets this man knew. Only after he but merely took the man by his metallic hand, he would see and hear this knowledge? Gulping hard, Fracelan mustered the strength to keep talking to the man who had overpowered him. "You tell me, what is it exactly you are going to do?"
	"Inquisitor, if you but take hold, I shall allow aid to your eyes and ears to but witness the workings of my magicks, and learn the secrets I speak of revealed for yourself first hand." Tavian moved not his outstretched hand, and waited for the man's reply patiently.
	Staring at the metallic hand before him, Fracelan raised his quivering bandaged hand, and reluctantly reached it out.
	His gauntleted fingers wrapped around the man's shaking wrist, and Tavian held it fast in an icy metalic grip. His grip tightened, the blood painted grin stretched his face nearly to a split. The red light emitting from his eyes swelled brightly, and the glow expanded around his entire head, then his entire body.
	Before Fracelan's eyes, the red light had taken over his entire Furnace, and even combined with the fire's glaring orange light. What seemed would be blindingly bright did not harm his eyes at all, yet with all the light in the room it was difficult to see much of anything. He could feel more than see the gauntlet holding him by the wrist, he could barely even make out the blurred shining metal in the light. While he strained his eyes to make out some sort of images in the brightness, his neck twisted searching in fear as a gutteral howl filled his ears. The sound itself was not what chilled him, but the familiarity of the voice. The sound was too strained to recognize, but somehow, he did, like a distant unforgetable memory. The howl silenced, and Fracelan searched around the light for where it came from. "What is this!? What vile magicks are you-" Another howl resonated, echoing the walls with a wail that cowed the inquisitor, grating against his ears, trying to deafen him like metal dulling to stone. "Stop this!" He shouted, his own voice barely audiable over the sounds of screaming filling his head. The voice stopped, then started again, as if had taken another breath, and he searched among the red light, and could see nothing but. He pulled his hand away from Tavian's metallic grip, he might as well as been trying to remove his wrist from an invisible block of solid ice. "I have seen and heard enough! End this at once and I will," he stuttered over his pleading words as he listened to the sounds of anguish over and over nervously, "I-I will let you go free!" He pulled at his hand again to no avail. 
	"Inquisitor," Tavian's voice broke through the din of dischorded voices, and all was silent but his voice and the faint roar of fire.
	He jolted and turned his sweat drenched face, dark, beady eyes searched for the prisoner holding him from within an aura of effulgent light. "Release me at once!" He shouted at the red void.
	Amid all the red, two eyes glowed white with light, "I am afraid I can not." Tavian's voice darkened and deepened, then he became visible as a dark shadow with eyes of fire within the abyss of light. "There are many present who wish..." Around him, conical plumes of shadowy mist formed, the red light turned black as if burnt, "nay, compel me to show you, so that you may bear witness."
	The wisps of dark aether spun into a vortex, thin lines of light extended within its edges, and bulged back in as depth began to form. A tunnel of light stretched down an impossible distance, past the boundries of the chamber walls, silhouetting the shadow of the knight standing at its threshold.
	Fracelan's already sickly pale face took on an even whiter shade, and the air he had gasped to shout with froze in his throat. Out of the spinning tunnel of light, there stood an army of the dead he had slain.



Aluce 
	
	
	
screams and shadows
faces made of fire
illusiary fists and teeth of flame
	

	


Tavian throws the bandage off his head, for his headwound is healed. He tears it off and throws it to the ground, and ends the nightmare. Symbolism!













"i wonder if the guards you are screaming for could differenciate from any other sound coming from this chamber"
	




	
	
	

	
	






	“Be silent.” Tavian said, then he outreached his gauntleted hand.
Fracelan was confused by this act, but he grabbed Tavian’s hand and stood up, limping, then he quickly slammed Tavian’s hand onto the table and took one of the knives and stabbed it through the gauntlet and into the wooden table, he then stumbled backwards into his chair. 
Tavian seemed unphased by this new wound and pulled the dagger out with ease. “Nice try,” he held up his gauntlet and looked at Fracelan through the new hole in it “... but I am more than just flesh.” Fracelan looked up in terror and yelled “What the hell are you?!”
	With his steel hand, Tavian grabbed Fracelan by the throat and slammed his head into the fiery hearth. Fracelan struggled to get out of Tavian’s steel grip, but he could only scream into the flames as his flesh seared off and eyes melted. 
	The sounds stopped and Fracelan ceased struggling; his body fell limp and lifeless. Tavian pull the head out and dropped the blackened skull still attached to the fleshy body to the ground. He leaned over to the melted ear and he said in a dark voice “... I am a Shadow Knight.”


	Tavian walked over to the water cask and filled the bucket then poured it over his body to wash off the blood. He grabbed his jerkin and trousers and clothed himself, and then he took one of the dirks and the ring of keys on Fracelan’s body. He walked to the large door and opened it with a loud creak, then slammed it shut and ended the nightmare. 










 the gauntlet, magick, shadow knight magick, can only heal, fracelan asking tavian about daemonic magick with the hopes that he is one, for fracelan is slightly using daemonic magick too, and seeking more of the power.

When Fracelan uses the metal box to heal himself, he remarks thoughts about how he had only ever used the bandage box to keep people alive he needed info from, never on his own wounds. He usually can keep people alive being careful, and using bandages if need be, but he was pressued by Ozwyn to keep going until the man before Tavian died. He thought of using the box to save him, but did not at Ozwyn's command.
	III.3 The Escape

	The

	III.4 Diame Night

	In drifting quiet, Diame found herself standing alone in her white ceremonial robes and gold circlet surrounded by the tall grass of the wide open field, dimly lit by dusk darkened sky. In the billowing dark clouds above, streaks of fire lit around a shadowed image, a large creature with long horns protruding from a beastly body. The priestess realized with a chill of terror it must be the daemon seen from her visions, flying across the sky again and again, looming over her and the world below. No matter where it lurched to in the distance or where it turned, the creature of shadows seemed to keep its head turned, focusing completely on Diame. She felt a sort of fear, an instinct telling her to run, and her bare feet took off, the skirts of her robe whisking through the grass. To her surprise, the creature was there always before her as soon as she picked a direction, stalking in the clouds of fire. She turned sharply to the east, and the daemon swooped to the side, engulfing that horizon as well. Even though she did not realize what was happening, she did not stop, and kept running will all her might, all she could do. A jet of fire burst from where the mouth of the shadowed beast would be, and the violent glow grew into a pillar of flame, aimed down at Diame. She had to keep running. She turned around, heading west, and still, the daemon revolved as she turned in the fire-lit clouds above, leaving orange streaks of flame across the sky in its wake. Even though it was before her now, she still felt compelled to run. The daemon in the distance billowed the flames, and the falling spiral of burning light stretched and encircled every horizon around Diame, the grass in the distance catching fire, quickly drawing nearer, and even faster as she ran. The field was completely a blaze of red raging flames, and with all the heat of the air she might as well been breathing hot ash. She never stopped running, though, yet thoughts crossed her mind, pleasant thoughts of cold Tevan mist, or a snow storm, even as all was fire around her. She ran until the engulfing heat swallowed her whole, and all the burning light turned darkness.
	
	A cool breeze stirred around her, and the chill in the air woke Diame with a shiver. She could vaguely remember some sort of dream she was having after nodding off some time ago. To her surprise, from when she had gotten into the merchant's cart some time in the late morning, to awakening just now as the sun had just set. She did remember waking time to time to see the path still moving behind her and the sound of Shul's speaking fondly of his work and family, and she supposed she had nodded off from time to time.
	Shul was still dutifully at the reins of the small cart, and the ass still towing the squeaky wooden wheels, while the apple on string towed the animal. Diame took notice of the drastic changes in scenery, it was quite dark where she was, as more trees surrounded them on all sides, and the path lead on to where a forest began. The sky above was dark and void of almost all sunlight, a slight glow to the west showed where the sun had just set. By now, she figured she must have traveled twice as far by cart as she could have walked on her own, and she wasn't even the least bit exhausted, she felt over rested even, although the constant jerking and pull of the cart had left her rump only somewhat sore. Coming all this way so swiftly, Diame had thanks to Shul for letting her hitch a ride, she would repay her gratitude to the man sometime in the future.
	Shifting against the lumpy sack of produce, Diame stretched out her arms and stifled a yawn with her fist, then with another chill of the cold night, covered her head and curls of red tighter in the warmth of her blue cloak. I wonder where we could be? For all the lack of light, I pray I am near Ijia, or nearer to an Inn. From what she could tell in the dark, they weren't in the wide open field, but surrounded by broken up copses of looming trees that grew thicker as they traveled down the unseen road before them. A very unfamiliar place to her indeed, she decided it was time to ask where they were, and leant forward to speak softly, "Master Shul?"
	Jumping only a tiny bit, Shul looked over his shoulder as if he had forgotten Diame was in his cart. "Aye, mi'lady?" he could be smiling his gap-filled grin at her, but it was too dark to see, espcially under his straw hat at night. "Di' ye rest well, Mistress Delandra?" He turned back to face the road, steering the mule down the road that weaved between the low boughs of maple trees' dewey leaves. "Ye were ou' fer a while, aye. W' crossed the flat grasslands an' continued the trail north. Jus' now enterin' the southern outskirts of the Crow's Forest, t'at crosses right through th' mountain ranges, bu', we won't be passin' through t'night." 
	Another turn around a thick copse of maple tree leaves broke up a dim glow of some sort of light. As the cart made a full turn in the road, a well lit two-storied cabin planted in the road crept into vision out of the trees. Spilled light from its windows illuminated the dark path, and just enough light brightened a painted sign hanging from the building, a nest with blue eggs that had a dark bird landing in it, the sign simply read "The Travelers' Roost Inn."
	With a pull at the reins, Shul slowed the mule down, and directed it to a nearby wooden stables where a few horses had their reins looped over pegs beneath a slanted roof, and nearby a troth of water. After they had stopped Shul lowered the back hatch, and began to speak of how he always stopped at this Inn, and how a noblelady would find it quite accomidating. "You go on in 'n get yerself a room 'n' some mead, Mi'Lady Delandra. I 'ave a few businesses to take care of b'fore we pass the forest in the morrow." Shul swung out of his cart, and retracted the pole carrying the apple, lowering it within reach of the mule, and the animal excitedly began chomping large bites out of his crisp and sweet reward.
	With a hop out of the cart, Diame's legs were stiff from the ride, but atleast not sore with walking. She approached Shul while he was rummaging around his bags in the cart and gave him a formal bow, "You have my greatest thanks for your kindness, sir."
	Shaking his head fervently, he looked embarrased he was being bowed to, "Nay, nay, Mistress, 'tis no matter. Pray, take a rest, the Roost is kind t' new faces, especially one as pretty as yers." As Shul gave her a kind gap-toothed smile, Diame returned the gesture and made her way down the worn, earthy path to the door of the storied cabin, movements of people within the brightly lit windows showed the inn had a fair amount of patrons.
	Opening the heavy door, the sonorous sound of harpstrings plucked quietly accompaniec by the clamor of murmored conversations. Many dressed in simple countryside clothes were seated at a table, each with a drink and engaged with company seated next to them as if well known. Diame lowered her hood as she entered, she didn't need a new face causing a stir, and rest on her walking staff as she looked around the interior for a place to sit among the patrons. An empty booth was nearby a small table occupied by men each distracted with their goblets held up and with their eyes on the maiden songtress playing the small lyre. Diame made her way around the tavern and serving girls with trays of wine and food nodding to her and motioning in welcome, moving aside to let her seat herself wherever she liked.
	A vacant booth by a window that could have seated four or five people was in a quiet corner, and Diame sat, laying her staff to rest against the wall and sat her bag beside her. The table held a lantern in a brass holder, the flame's light reflected in the window, the darkness of the outside remained unseen.
	A serving lass with brown hair near Diame's age came to her, and spoke just loud enough to be heard over the tavern's music and talk. "Fortunate you made it to the Roost just after sundown, mi'lady. I take it you'd like a room and dinner sup?"
	Once she was told what was on the menu ranging from beef mutton to pork livers, Diame decided the forest greens soup was the most appetizing, and least expensive. She brought very little money with her, but it would suffice for the rest of her travels. She didn't have much time to prepare too much on her sudden take of leave, and certainly the guilt of breaking the  oathes to stay within Teva was weighing on her mind. She let out a long sigh. Even though my legs did not have to travel too far, I should settle my restless thoughts, I still have a long ways to go and I do not need to burden my mind further. The message I have to deliver is burdensome enough. She sighed again as she sat back in her seat, and opened up her bag, laying out the leather wrap holding the old map of the region. The yellow flower fell out onto the table, and Diame smiled as she picked it back up, placing it back in her bag. I am here to protect Teva. I will not forget that. 
	Pouring over the map lit brightly by the nearby lantern light, Diame took her time tracing the path down from the mountains of Teva to the road she traveled in the lower fields. She found about where she stopped Shul to give her a ride, and followed the path that lead straight to the Crow's Forest, inlaid between the rockface mountains. The terrain of the forest was drawn small, and she found the road she was on and about where the inn she was in would be. Diame was surprised that the soup she had ordered was already on the table along with water in blue colored glass by the time she had looked up from the map. "I guess I could pinpoint where I am, but it makes nary a difference if I am not traveling any more for the evening." She decided as she folded the map up back into her bags, and folded her hood back over her shoulders, letting her curls of red hair down her back. She found her appitite had returned to her, and she sipped the first spoonful of the savory bright green soup.
	The harmonious lyrestrings slowed into loud trills, and the songstress sang the last few words of the song, ending a story Diame was half listening to about a lass's lost love at sea. The fair haired lass leant over her golden skirts to place her lyre on its case near where she was seated herself before the inn crowd, then took her bow for applause, then enjoyed a sip of her wine goblet. She began at the strings singing anew, this time a fast paced song that could have been a reel if accompanied by a band of fiddlers.
	Only a few of the patrons got up to dance as the lively lyre resonated through the inn's large dining room. Though some kept seated to eat, and with faces hidden in their drinks, yet still tapping their feet to the beat. Diame took pleasure in the melody as well as she sipped on peppered vegetable soup, finding it quite palpable, as well as the jollity of the atmosphere. She was reminded of Alura's songs on holidays to liven the festivities with such songs of good cheer, and Teva's parade grounds would be full of the whole village on torch lit nights under the stars. I wonder if Teva is alright? I am the one responsible for the years' successful harvests, will they have another feastday if I do not return? She shook her head, finishing the last spoon of her soup, and tried to calmly sip from her waterglass. I need to focus on what is importand and why I am here. I know what I have seen chilled my nerves, and I must not entertain such thoughts. I will return to Teva once I have made certain the Church is aware of what I have foreseen, and that will be done tomorrow, and none too soon. She stared at the clear, bubbled glass holding her drink of water, and took in the music and dancing in the room. I shall let my mind rest for now, for there is much jollity to lose one's self in and repose the spirit. I shall partake by merely watching. Sitting back in the wooden booth contentedly, she immersed herself in the lively song and dance of the small crowd in the tavern.
	Beyond the heads and mixed faces of the country people at the table near her, men who were silent with their faces hidden in their drinks surfaced. The low trills of the young songstress' lyre harmonically added to lyrics of well known Ijian military jody, a humorous tale of a soldier returning early from a far off outpost to find out his love had been proposed to by three other men of noble stature, and she had not told any of them she was already taken.
	With rolling eyes, finding little amusement in the sultry tone of the song, Diame took in the entirity of the inn's bar room. Near the back walls where she sat in her booth, an open doorway into the kitchen revealed a dark haired women in an apron tight around her plump sides. She fervently stirred a long wooden spoon in a large iron pot while other aproned servent girls were in a hurry filling bowls with soup and plates with meat and potatoes, carrying them into the crowded room with glass goblets full of water and wine. She wondered how the restaurant kept so well stocked with food and how it could bring in so much business in the middle of a forest, but she figured there must be many a hungry traveler on these roads late at night, such as she and Shul. 
	Looking at the consumed bowl of soup, Diame wondered if any of the hearty vegetables in her stomach were traded from Tevan farms. It wouldn't be unlikely, since this is a well traveled road for trade, and most of the bar's patrons looked like they were constant travelers.
	The young songstress reached a part of her song's story of how the soldier would teach his love a lesson by sending her suitors all letters of agreement. In the morning, the soldier waited amongst the crowd of the three men's families in the village church, all upset with no bride in sight, causing a fair amount of commotion. While nearly the whole village waited for the fair maiden, the three would-be grooms argued amongst themselves, each claiming over and over that he was the one whom she had rightfully given her hand to. Hours of arguing passed, all the while, the soldier entertaining himself thoroughly. The scene grew so ridiculous, he was unable to contain his mischievious laughter any longer, and burst out in a raucous fit of chuckling that deafened all other sound in the church. He stood before the hateful eyes of the three noblemen and scandelized crowd, and with a grin, proclamed the three men fools for this display over the same woman. As he turned to leave through the big church doors, they opened to his love, who had come to light a candle in prayer for the soldier stationed far away, unbeknownst of a sudden wedding. When she saw the scene before her, the soldier returned, her three suitors at the altar looking displeased to say the least, and nearly the entire town, she had the look as if she would faint, but instead ran as fast as the wind as the three noblemen chased her, all professing their undying love in competition to one another. The tale ended with the soldier having an ale at his home tavern with a buxom lass by his side, and his lost love wrote a story about three husbands sharing one bride.
	As the last trills of the lyre finished the tale, many in the tavern scoffed and chuckled, and some where heartily cheering and applauding. Diame smirked and began snickering herself. "What an utter farce!" She giggled. Though he could have confronted her like an honest man for her infidelity, but I suppose that would defeat the purpose of the song. Indeed, she earned her just deserts I suppose. I haven't heard these kinds of songs sung by Alura before, I wonder if they would pass well in Teva? She giggled even more to herself, knowing full well that such a song would right be the talk of the small town for weeks, and not necessarily in a positive way. The tavern was indeed much livelier, if anything, Diame did not hear any of the ongoing conversations around her resume without added chuckles. 
	The young songstress in her plain dress sat on her barstool as if it were a throne of pure satisfaction meeting with the smiles of the patrons. Diame caught the lass catching a nod of approval from a stocky man with a dark beard behind the counter of the bar, and she placed her lyre to rest on its case, and grabbed a nearby bottle of wine and refilled her own glass, able to rest herself.
	Smiling in admiration, Diame took a breath wistfully, imagining what life would be like as an entertainer. Certainly living freely would be a lot simpler and less dutiful. How hard is it to strum a few strings and tell a tale anyhow? 
	Just then, the tavern door opened, and Shul entered as he took of his straw hat. As he was dressed, he seemed to fit in among the road worn crowd. He made large turns of his head, searching.
	Diame motioned with a wave to him, and his eyes turned, and with a visable sign of relief. "The man must be even more tired that I. I wonder what kept him?" She motioned him to sit at her booth as he made his way hurriedly to her through the tavern crowd.
	"Oh, 'ere ye be, Mistress Delandra, err, how fares ye? 'Ave ya 'ad a naice 'ot meal 'nd 'ad a room readied yet, ma'am?" Shul said, his voice shakey with fatigue.
	"You are so kind to show such concern for my well being, Master Shul." Diame motioned to the seat across the booth's table. "Won't you please join me, surely you'd like some food for yourself?"
	Before she could finish her sentance he threw his rough hewn hands up in protest. "Oh, nay, ma'am, I shan't be seen sharing a table with, err, a lady of such high stature as yerself. Simply will not do for ye to be seen conversin' with me. I'll take me meal outside to talk with Betsy. Th' ass may not look like much of an animal, she 'as good ears." 
	Does he speak of his mule? She wondered. Before she could respond, a burst of laughter at a nearby table caught Diame's attention. The young songstress was there, chatting with a group of gentlemen who all looked as though they were enjoying their fair share of the beer as well as the entertainment. She turned back to Shul and motioned once more. "Oh, nonsense! The songstress is singing merry songs, and many are partaking in drink." Shul seemed reluctant, he genuinely seemed like he did not want to intrude on her. This polite man has done so much for me, he doesn't need to feel like he can't be seen with me. "We've sat together all day, I feel like I've barely gotten the chance to talk to you face to face. Please, sir? I do have some questions of where we are and when we will leave tomorrow as well..."
	Weighted with what seemed like the man realized he could finally take a break, Shul at last sat down before Diame, wringing at his hat and glancing over his shoulders. "Well, aye, I just needed to tend to something really quickly, you see," He glanced over his shoulders again, and the bar door opened yet again, and his eyes widened, as if reminded of something. "Oh! Aye, I did have something to give ye, ma'am." He looked back at her, and dug through his trouser pockets, "Uh, somewhere around here, uh, oh bloody-, I just put it-,"
	"A gift? I couldn't possibly accept something after all you've done already." Diame protested in disbelief as she watched the man hurriedly rifle through himself. The bar door closed with a slam as a new patron entered, her attention swept to a man with his back turned, talking to the bearded man at the bar. He wore a long black coat and an odd shaped top hat, with cropped dark hair, he looked very formal. The man at the bar looked at him very grimly, nodding his head and muttering agreeing words, and quickly sent orders to some serving girls, and they, too, hurried to do whatever it was the man in the black coat asked. He sat at the bar. That man looks important, but he looks as though he commands a lot of authority wherever he goes. He looks quite intimidating, actually.
	"H-here!" Shul dug out of his front coat pocket a large silver coin, the size of his palm. The bird with a sword and shield in each talon etched on the surface glimmered in the faint light of the table lamp. The symbol of Ijian currency.
	Diame's mouth opened with a gasp, and she gathered  her wits and shook her head, "Master Shul, I believe I have enough coin on me to pay for my meal and, I think I can afford a small room with what I have. I couldn't possibly accept-."
	"Now, now... Nary a reason to get so excited over it."  Shul stared at the coin uncertainly, then back at her, looking almost worried that she wouldn't take his gift. "I have a, uh, special tab here." He gulped. "On long travels, me boss will let me use the room for nobles here, he's a kind hearted trader that would reinburse me. I've worked for him for years you see, so don't you mind taking Shul's room, I have me own, next to Betsy. Uh, nevermind about that. By the by," Placing the heavy coin down with a metal clank, he slid the silver emblem of Ijia half way across the table, "the point is I have me own room, and this is meant to be for ye." Shul's dark eyes widened with endearment, and widened his gap-toothed smile, and holding his hat up to his heart.
	Is this something I could possibly take from this man?  Diame's smiled awkwardly to meet with Shul's, and it was indeed plausable this man was merely trying to be kind hearted, to let a noble woman to take his room in his stead. But, that would be taking far too much of an advantage of this man. I have done so enough being on his cart. She shook her head. "The simple answer is nay, Master Shul." 
	What look of happiness on the man's face was replaced with shock, then pleadingly, he stammered, seemingly to think of more words to convince her. 
	"I appreciate everything you've done so far, truly I do. Thank you for taking me here, I just need to know when we might leave in the morning to Ijia..." Diame spoke over his stammered pleading, and eyed the silver coin dubiously. She didn't quite know how to take this anymore, and reached for her staff and bag. "Um, I think I may just take my room now, and leave early to walk the rest of the way, if the forest's weather is fair."
	Shul's eyes bulged out of his head, and he shook his head and softened his gaze, then began to chuckle light heartedly, and then he ceased when Diame stood. "Uh, Mistress Delandra, wait, please," 
	"And why should I?" She turned to Shul, "You keep insisting on paying me to sleep in your room tonight, but I have already said nay!" 
	A few heads turned of the patrons at the nearby table, then looked at Shul, scandalized.  
	Shul's jaw dropped at what she was insinuating, be it intentional or not, then he brinked and gasped further in surprise to a man walking up to them.
	To Diame's surprise as well, the nobleman dressed in black just finished his last stride across the crowded room to her and Shul's table. He stood tall, a hand resting on a black wooden cane with a gold grinning monkey head atop it. With a swoop of his hand, he lowered his hat, revealing the cleanly shaven face of a pale, youthful looking middle-aged man. "Good even, mi'lady. I am Lord Igore, a well established merchant and trader. I see you have made friends with my mule driver, Shul." He said with a voice that spoke of power as smooth as silk, and stared at her kindly with handsome, light brown eyes.
	"A-aye, I have, and I was just thanking him for all his kindness, having brought me here." Diame said with a nod to him, meant to mean she had no further words.
	"Shul here was just saying goodbye and seeing his way to his room for the night, weren't you Shul?" Lord Igore did not avert his eyes from Diame's.
	As quickly as bolting to his feet, Shul bowed to the youthful man in his dark cloak, "Aye, I wuhs too! Good even Lord Igore," and he bowed to Diame, "Good even Mis'ress Delandra!" He said as he bowed, and placed his straw hat back on as he spun round, holding it so it didn't fall off as he steadfastily made his way to the door, dodging around tables and serving maids.
	"I beg your pardon," Lord Igore said as he did a half bow to her, "I understand if my mule driver may have upset you Mistress Delandra, um, may I call you that? I just came over here to have a simple word of safe passage, as I hear Shul is transporting you as well as my cargo to the Ijian markets."
	"Oh, I... I see." Diame nodded. "Well, I indeed am headed to Ijia, for a religious pilgrimage. I thank you for letting me use a seat in your driver's cart today, but I would like to get a room so that I may be well rested for my travels ahead."
	"Ah, but your room for the night is exactly what I wanted to discuss with you." Lord Igore looked down at the floor diffidently, "Forgive me if there was any misunderstanding, I simply wished to pay for you to have the best room available, mi'lady. A gift of some kind of luxury not outside of a lady's means. It is harsh enough you are traveling by cart and not stagecoach. Uh, may we sit? I have much to ask you, and to answer any questions of yours."
	Softening her frown, Diame nodded, as she did have some questions, but she didn't want to stay for a long conversation. Who knows if I can trust this man, much less anyone out on my own. Well, I am out here on my own, I did trust Shul, and maybe this Lord Igore can explain himself. "Very well, but I am quite tired." Diame said as she slowly sat back down, showing she was still wary of the man. 
	"Thank you, Mistress." With a turn of his head, he nodded to a nearby servent girl, who rushed over to him. 
	Mechanically, she took his odd shaped hat and removed his black cloak for him, then bowed, but gave Diame a hurried, wide-eyed glance before she scurried off. 
	Lord Igore wore a completely unmarred white shirt wrapped in a black vest, and he sat before Diame. The pommel of his cane with the gilt monkey head stared at her, resting against the booth back as the young man locked his brown eyes with this young traveling noble woman of mysterious heritage inquisitively. 
	She felt as though he was searching her face to answer questions he could retain the compulsion to ask. For all he is dressed and how dashing he looks, perhaps he just expects all to trust him and he does as he pleases. Diame cleared her throat gingerly, "If you do not mind, may we finish our business so that I might take a room?"
	"Oh, but of course," He nodded to her knowingly, "Simply put, as you are in my company's transportation for whatever the reason, I only wish for you to have a safe passage with as little trouble as possible. I happened to be passing through here, and when my mule driver saw me, he told me he was helping a lady in need. Noblewoman or no, a woman traveling alone should always be within in her comforts. Forgive me if my gift of staying in the nicest room was presumptuous and had offended you. It's, well," he leant in forward slightly, as so he could not be overheard in the din of chatter, "some of the rooms' cleanliness have seen better days, or weeks, even. On busy nights, they may put more than one person to a room. I wouldn't even want my mule driver to stay in a room with those kinds of conditions. However, they put all their attentions to the couple of decadent rooms, so when a nobleman arrives they ensure they stay here. Most of the regulars who come here are workers in the mountains who stop here for their drink, then pass out, and go back to work, you see." He glanced over his shoulder for a moment at the crowd of the tavern, then back to Diame with a smile. He tapped the floor with the cane at his side, turning the golden monkey face side to side as he idly did so. "So, simply put, my driver out of kindness told me he wished to offer you the fee for the room I had given him before he set off to retieve his cargo from the south. I admired his generocity, and gave him another silver crown he could use for himself tonight or whenever he wanted. So, with money not an issue, you are welcome to rest in a room with nicer accomidations, and with the full attentions and service of the Traveler's Roost establishment that comes with it. These things I use for myself when traveling or allow Shul to use, and this inn appeciates the business, so it is quite alright, um, should you accept, Mistress Delandra." He eyed the silver coin bearing the mark of Ijia, the heavy metal glimmering in the tiny lantern light, then back to Diame.
	She patiently listened to everything, and took a moment to take in the multiple reasons to accept his kindness. "I hadn't thought about the fact there were nicer rooms with better levels of cleanliness and privacy, hmm..." Diame looked at the coin, then back to the young lord across the table from her. I certainly wouldn't want to stay in a dirty room, especially with someone I didn't know. Surely it would be alright if I did take this man up on his kind offer, though I felt wary of taking strangers up on their kindness, I feel like this room would be safer. "Well, I can see why you both would insist on using the nicer room. Very well then. I thank you for your gift, sir. Eyes watch over you." Diame said with a gracious smile.
	A look of relief swept over Lord Igore's face, and he leant forward, "Ah, I am heartened to hear that. It is simply just more befitting that a woman of your stature stay within respectable means, especially when traveling and saving one's money down the road." His smile widened to a grin, knowing of wealth. 
	"Indeed." Diame nodded, pulling her staff to her side. "Well, I thank you again for your kindness. By and by, I tire and would certainly like to go lie down." Well, perhaps I was wrong. These people seem to be a lot nicer than I thought they were. She reached across the table to the silver coin, "I'll not forget your kindness, sir." She smiled as her fingertips touched the glimmering eagle motif. The expected coolness of the metalic coin was met as though she had touched a hot stove, and blue gems of electricity bolted high into the air, followed by a blinding flash of light.
	The booth spun around her, the sight of the tavern turned sideways and engulfed in brightness, she felt as though she were lifted out of her seat and into the air. 

	Outside under the starry night, Diame's bare feet landed on the yellow bricks paving the parade grounds alongside the lake of Teva Village, the sixteen waterfalls of the Water Temple falling four by four into giant plumes of mist. The seven tall pillars of blue stone surrounded her, holding the garden canopy over head as she stood within a crowd of familiar faces, all frozen still with food and drink before her. Alura with her fingers mid-strum and and mouth mid-note of a song, Eljuk in acolyte attire, unarmed though looking dutiful and watchful even when celebrating with a goblet of mudberry wine, Sindha playing with Edjar among other kids watched by Sister Mariden donned with the domed hat of her habit. 
	This is the dream world, not reality! Why am I seeing this? Being within her vision suddenly, finding herself back home in the parade grounds of Teva. What is happening? My visions are forcing their way into my head, but how?! Why now?! The priestess looked around the familiar reality, the imagined place before the Water Temple that exists only as a memory within visions.
	The stars above were peaking through the twilight, and she only noticed how clear the sky was when she saw the dark Eastern horizon, marred by dark clouds. A puff of red light appeared from them, followed by a distant roar of a gutteral beast that made the ground tremble. Bolts of red lightning burst forth from the clouds, and their darkness stretched across the sky, blocking the starry constellations with lightning and clouds.
	"What is happening to me! To my swevens! Merciful Evaz'sa, help m-!" Diame shouted at the sky before she fell back, shook off balance to the paved ground from the combined consecutive booms of thunder exploding from an entire sky of roiling lightning. As she landed on the quaking earth, all she could see was the clouds as they opened up their waters, and poured forth glowing droplets of fire down across all she could see. She could feel the aethereal pull of the energies of the Water Temple surging, overflowing with power. I have to protect them! A distant memory urgently called to her. On instinct, she pulled at the overflowing water aether flowing from the temple, and the entire surrounding lake levitated into a vortex pulled into the fiery sky.
	
	Her eyes sprank wide open, and Diame awoke with a start, sitting upright with a jolt at her booth in the inn's tavern. The silver coin glimmered in her hand, but to her surprise, Lord Igore was not seated across the table as he was a moment ago. 
	What furthered the Water Priestess's surprise was that she noticed a cloud of mist, blue, transparent and thick, that had surrounded her. She dropped the heavy coin on the table with a clank, and before she could search for an explaination, she watched as her fingertips emanated thick plumes of blue mist, even her driftwood staff resting at her side seemed to blast water aether into the air. Her mouth opened to ask questions of why and how, but no words came out. I do not understand! I thought I was in control of my thoughts, my magick! Why!? Diame gasped as she saw her glass wobble side to side, its water spinning within it so quickly it looked as though it would fall over. She grabbed it on reflex when it started to tip, and as she did so, the water within spun even faster, to a point that it hovered out at the glass's rim, and reformed as a floating sphere in the middle. Nay! What are you doing?! Regain control of your magicks, girl! You don't want the whole tavern to see a display of magick tricks! Diame picked up the glass and held it up to her lips, covering the spinning orb of water from view with one hand, trying to sip the magicked sphere down. Nary any set of eyes besides those of an aethermancer can see aethereal mists, but anyone could certainly see a floating ball of water! I must regain control, none can be allowed to see this! I'd never pass for a simple traveling noblewoman at this rate. Nay! I am in complete control of my magicks. She looked around the tavern, holding the glass nearly to her lips and sipping from the spinning water. 
	She nearly choked as she looked over to the nearby table, the songstress sitting on a man's lap, holding up her own wine glass to the light and staring in it with a quirked eyebrow, possibly weighing the reasons why a spiral of wine spun within.
	Staring uncertainly at the blue clouds of mist around her as she sipped down her class, Diame waited for them to dissipate as she reiterated her mental mantra. I am in complete control of my magicks, I am in complete control of my magicks... 
	"Hurry up, girls! Those dishes won't wash themselves!" A shout from the kitchen spoke with a touch of agitation.
	Diame's blue eyes swept to the kitchen, and her blue eyed gaze caught the rounded cook turning away from the inner kitchen with looks of dissatisfaction at flustered serving maidens running about. The dark haired woman's face that looked like she had commanded serving girls tightly for years was stuck with complete abashment as she stood over her cookpot. The long wooden spoon that she had been vigorously stirring beforehand was stirring itself, completing full turns around the circumference of the cookpot in rapid rotations. 
	The priestess eyes widened, and a quick look around the room showed her that nearly every patron with a drink glass stared at each's own with a strange curiosity. Diame shook her head as she finished drinking the water sphere hovering out of her glass down to the size of a marble. I am in complete control of my magicks, I am in complete control of my magicks! She willed herself as strong as she could, trying to sever the link of aether connecting her mind to all the water in the room.
	The invisible blue glow of the room wavered, and flickered out of her sight, but the swell of aether kept the room in the strong glow of the magickal light. Diame could feel the water spin in everything, the drink, the food, the air. She even started to sense the flow of blood in everyones veins, the thoughts and emotions in the waters of their minds.
	"I am in complete control of my magicks!" Diame said aloud in frustration, and stamped her empty glass down on the table as she began to fear she would never quell her magicks.
	As soon as she made the motion, the glowing mist around her snaked together and coalesced, bursting into rays of blue light, then thinned out of existance. 
	Relieviedly, Diame felt the aether she had unwittingly released finally dissipate, and couldn't feel the sensations she had felt before, those of somehow feeling spinning water and other people's emotions. She straightened up in her seat, and looked around the tavern, and it had indeed grown quiet. 
	Some of the patrons had taken their eyes off of their goblets of beer, and all shared a look of bemusement, as if each man thought only they saw something strange. The young songstress at the nearby table looked at her goblet of wine, puzzled with uncertainty, and excused herself politely by slinking off of the gentleman's lap, and went back to her barstool with her lyre on its case. She placed her glass of wine down, and stared at it, while she idly grabbed a wine bottle, and she went to pour. Suddenly she gave an odd look at the both, and perhaps decided she had enough to drink, and for some reason put the bottle back down and seemed dissinterested in inbibing any more alcohol all together. She picked up her lyre, and strummed the tinkling strings, and sang an unfamiliar, although jolly tune about the mischievious faeries that live in the local forests. The crowd seemed to immediately take interest, and nodded at their beers in quiet agreement, and went back to drink and chatter once more.
	It appears as though my display of magicks was only seen by eyes of those who can not see aethereal mists. Good. Diame thought cautiously to herself, and gave another quick glance, truly seeing that another aethermancer had not seen her. While that is a relief, I am beginning to wonder if I am truly able to keep control over with the magicks I have carried with me from the Water Temple. She always had to control her magick especially after she recieved a sweven, and now of all times given the most vivid vision she had ever seen, she imagined that it would be mildly more difficult keeping her powers over water under control. It worried her that this happened, as she was out in unfamiliar grounds, and having no idea what caused it. The symbol of Ijia glimmered on the silver coin, and Diame remembered the purpose of her journey. I still have another day worth of travels in the morrow, I think it would behoove me if I retired for the evening. She remembered the very purpose of the money before her, she was supposed to use the coin to pay for the room suggested to her by Lord Igore. It was very kind of him to be concerned about my comforts, I suppose. I wonder where that man went anyway? As soon as the thought passed her mind, she noticed a serving maiden with dark hair standing by her side. 
	"Would you like anything at all, mi'lady? Do you desire any more food or drink? Ready to retire to one of The Roost's rooms perhaps?" The young lass said as soon as Diame took note of her, grinning readily with servitude.
	I do think I shall take a room, I can gather my thoughts in private there atleast. "Aye, I would like a room." Diame picked up the silver coin, and placed it in the palm of the serving maid, whose jaw dropped for one moment, then it closed shut, turned into an even wider grin. "I was told you have an array of rooms to choose from, which one might this purchase?"
	The serving girl stared at her calmly although stricken with shock, then at the coin in her hand. The emblem side down, showing a crown shimmering atop a swordhilt, with palm leaves engraved from the blade in a circle around the silver coin. "Why mi'lady! Let me show you to the deluxe royal suite immediately!" And with that, she snatched up Diame's satchel, and motioned to lead her.
	Diame blinked, shocked herself that that was the room she would be staying in, but would not now waiver the protective identity of a traveling noblewoman she had taken. "Very well, take me to my room, good lass." She said astutely, and took her walking staff, following the serving lass as she made her way around crowded tables in the tavern.
	They came to a thick door that the maid opened for Diame, and it lead her into a small lobby with a staircase. A tall woman with a drawn yet kindly face in some sort of liverly green dress stood behind a counter with books for keeping guestnames and a lamp. When told she would be staying until dawn, she took down simply 'Lady Delandra' for Diame's name, and the serving girl passed on the silver crown to the woman at the counter, who eyed the coin, raising her brow excitedly as she took it and placed it somewhere beneath the counter. The girl carried Diame's satchel up the staircase and motioned to her, "Right this way, mi'lady. Mind your step."
	Up the stairs Diame went, holding up the furls of her blue robe with the same hand as her staff, and took the railing with her free hand to turn down a lantern lit corridor. Five plain wood doors went down it, all looking too close together to possibly have enough space for the amount of people from the tavern that could potentially be staying here, all sharing these five rooms. Before the thought could perturb her curiosity to peek inside a lit room whose door was was ajar, the serving girl was down the hall and about to make another turn, "This way, mi'lady." She said as she motioned with the bag.
	Down the corridor she turned the corner, and there were two doors of polished oak, and one had a wreathe of flowers carved finely into the woodwork. "Our small inn has a big legend we stand by," The serving girl said as she took a key out of her pockets, and worked the lock on the gilt handle. "Once, a long time ago, the inn recieved word that Her Highness, the Queen of Ijia, would be passing through and wished to stay a night here while she was traveling to the south. The Traveler's Roost has these two suites, but neither were yet befitting for a queen." 
	When the lock clicked open, the serving girl pushed open the decorated door, and produced a long matchstick from her apron. "Just a moment, please." the girl said as she got a light from a nearby oil lamp, and covered the flame with her hand as she walked into the darkness. 
	Diame watched as the girl made her way in to the table in the dim light spilt in from the hall, and lit a big yellow wax candle, carved as a naked woman sitting, holding an urn overhead with the wick atop. As light gradually spilt up the pale blue curtains covering two windows on adjacent walls, Diame stepped in, and from what she could see, realized she must have had the largest room in the inn, a nice corner room with two big windows that had to be about two or three times the size of the other rooms. After the serving girl put Diame's bag down on a cushioned chair near the table, she found her way around to two more candle lamps, both on night stands on either end of a large bed with dark blue covers and pillows. The room was very much full of light, and Diame amazedly took in the decadent suite, an exoticly painted partition neared a large wardrobe woodworked with rosebuds and thorns and a lacquered oak dresser table with a ceramic washbowl and cloth atop it.
	 The serving girl fluffed the sheets and pillows, and continued, "So, the inn owner spared nary a coin of his life savings to make sure every comfort of Her Highness was met, as you can see." The girl got atop a wooden step stool, and then she extended the long match to begin lighting five candles circling a silver-worked chandelier hanging above the table from a long chain from the ceiling. "By and by, when the time came that Queen Senna herself stayed here, she was indeed so pleased, she spread word commending the inn, and out of kindness, reimbursed the inn of all expenses the owner had paid for her room. Well, now we have this special room reserved for the luxury of nobles, and the good word of the queen has always guided travelers of all color of coin to stay here on their journeys." She said as she stepped back down and put out the match, then bowed to Diame in all humbleness. "Well, please get your rest mi'lady. You have generously paid more than enough for one night's stay and dinner, tomomorrow morning your breakfast will be readied early. If there is anything else I can do for you, do not hesitate to ask. I, and the rest of the Traveler's Roost are at your beck and call. If you need anything, just give a holler. The lady at the counter will hear you and get one of us."
	Diame still was taking in the finely crafted decorations of the room she was staying in, and when she followed the chain up, she took in the now lit up artwork on the ceiling. Sky filled with a long winged legion of angels encircling the sun, painted with bright colors that mimicked gold. The sunlight shone around an image of Evaz'Sa, the painting showed a kindly young woman nearly all nude with body and skin glistening blue and her outstretched wings the color of the sky, partially covered by a long sarong of dark blue silk. "Nay, I am fine, thank you." She said absently. This room is... the most gorgeous place I have ever seen, only comparable to the decor at Lux Grande. "I feel more than taken care of."
	The servent girl bowed deeply as she neared the door, "I am at your beck and call. Good night, mistress. May Eyes watch over you." She said as she closed the door behind her. It was only then Diame realized that beside the door she had come in from were a small table with an opaline vase containing a humongous bouquet of sweet scented flowers with blue crescent shaped petals. The other side had a painting hanging off the wall of what was a view from above of the forest she was in, followed by a wide open grassy landscape, and in the distance of the surrounding areas, an ocean surrounding a castle built at the base of one of the twin mountains, the Kingdom of Ijia herself.
	"Wow." Diame said breathlessly as she sat on the soft covers of the bed, leaning her driftwood walking staff against the bedpost, an oaken column carved with vines of flowerpetals leading up to a sheer, white silk canopy overhead. She kicked her boots off, and slid off her blue robe, then pulled down the overstuffed comforter. The priestess laid back in the bed in exhaust, taking in the softness of the thick feather mattress and navy blue pillow against her weary head, still awe struck at the masterful piece of artwork, the image of Evaz'Sa herself indeed watching her from above. I have only seen artworks of God herself as detailed as this within the great halls of Lux Grande itself. I wonder how anyone painted on the ceiling anyhow? 	She had never wondered anything about all the origins of the paintings and tapestries of the divine before when she lived in Lux Grande, where she called home all those years before she first set foot in Teva. The preponderance of the world's faithful gather there as what is called The Church to the rest of the world, so that all may take joy in paying homage to the God of the Sun, Evaz'Sa. To see her likeness here on her travels after getting to where she is now so haphazardly, to her it seemed more than meant to be. 
	The flickering of the candles light gave the room a calming ambience, as if lit by a home fire. I wonder how Eljuk and all of Teva fares? I keep seeing visions that I know can not be possibly be happening, I have faith that holy Evaz'Sa is protecting them, and me on my path. Yet what I have seen... She tossed to her side, and pulled the soft covers tightly over her back, giving a shiver as the bed warmed her. Nay, I am here to prevent such a disaster. In the morrow, I shall set off to Ijia, and when I meet with Bishop Malbourne, I will explain why I had hastily come. She nodded to herself, then realized she still wore her circlet. She gave a chortle at herself, then slid the weaved strands of gold with the dangling pearl out from around her curls of red hair, and set it on the nightstand. She pushed all her bountiful locks back from her cream colored face, and rest her head, closing her starry blue eyes, making cozy once more in the soft sheets. I indeed need to sleep, I wonder why I am so tired? I slept most of the day. Probably just all the day's excitement has tired me out. She calmly drifted in her thoughts, concerning if she could travel the rest of the way through the forest alone or must seek Master Shul's help once more. Then she thought of Teva, her oathes to protect her flock, and if this is the right thing she was doing now to protect them compared to being in her cloister meditating up on it? If she was wrong, if the bishop had sent a letter in response to her and was in flight at this very moment, she would feel guilty for being out sleeping in an inn's luxurious suite on someone else's coin. Then she even thought about how strange it was that she was doing just that, and why Lord Igore left without saying goodbye after he had been so kind? Before she could give it a second thought as she lay in comfort, sleep swathed over her.

	Shrouded in the shadows from the dim light of the moon, the pidgeon-hawk sat perched on a branch within a tree's thick-leaved canopy. As light left, creatures of the dark rustled though the forest in land and sky. Among owls hooting their noise, Maji found it safe to emerge from the rockface he was pidgeonholed in, finding it safe to take flight by night. There was a faint scent that nudged him to where he smelled nothing else but humans and their animals and food.
	He hopped down a branch to get a closer look through the window of the building in the middle of the forest, could it have been the place his master wished him to find? It had the faint scent of moonblossoms wafting out from within the window, yet another familiar scent carried with it. A human his master sometimes meets with, her scent travels with him after a visit from his home of Teva. 
	Maji blinked his gold-rimmed pupils for eyes, it was the woman who always visited the giant fountain, and always smelled like the lake. From time to time in his flight, catches of the paper within the capsule crossed his keen beak, also smelling of her nest. He tilted his head in puzzlement and wondered why she was out here as well, but didn't put too much thought to it as his attentions shifted. The cold winds in the night blew in from the north, where the silver moonblossom trees' blue leaves give off their sweet scent most pungently under a cool full moon's night, such as this one. He extended his brown and white feathered wings, and caught the gust, ascending quickly above the forest tops. At the speed he lifted up, he would be out of the forest before long, and if he stayed with the wind he might be able to follow it all into the night. The pidgeon-hawk made his way north where he could smell the ocean, riding the winds, unharried under a starlit sky.
	
	With one boot out of the stirrup of his Shire, General Xavier unmounted his horse, placing his feet firmly to the ground for the final time this long day, and now he and his men could rest this night at Fort Forestglenn. The day had been tougher than anticipated for the Sky Saints as they made their way along the coast of Ijia. 
	One stop after another, local peoples in the farms and hamlets spoke to them of barbaric theft, bandit gangs running amuck time to time. They spoke not only of theft of people's valuables, but even burning of barns and homes, to murders and kidnappings. The aftermath of what chaos resulted from the attack on Ijia Castle itself was catastrophic for the daily lives of the commonfolk. They helped as they could, taking descriptions of the bandits, where they may be hiding, and how much were their damages they could help the villagers regain or rebuild some of what they had lost. After stopping to meet with hamlet after hamlet, they arrived at Fort Forestglenn, and just as well, had heard the Crows' Forest surrounding the southern mountains gave refuge to all sorts of villains and ruffians. If any gangs hid within the shelter of the forest, the Sky Saints would find them in the morrow.
	The fort itself was a three story tower surrounded by a stone wall tall as two men, one on the others' shoulders. Within the enclosure, their horses where tied to stableposts, and a building built into the walls and tower was the barracks. Xavier would rest tonight, and awaken early with the command of the Sky Saints, ready to scour the evil from the land.

	
	




	
		

























	
	


	Shul enters, talks with Diame hurriedly
Diame keeps him for conversation and to thank him, he stays and acts nervous. Diame has flashbacks of having good times in Teva at the parade grounds.
	Big dark bad guy, looking like a nobleman, walks in to tavern over to Shul and Diame. Shul leaves abruptly, and bad guy sits down with Diame, and explains he is Shul's employer. 
	Guy offers to pay for Diame's meal and room, and places a silver coin on the table. He curses it with a spell that will probe Diame, it will see if she is a user of magick, and if so force a tiny spark of it out to see. She kindly refuses, but doesn't know if she can afford a room yet, so she decides to take him up on his kindness, since she is in such a good mood and Shul is so nice. 
	When she touches the coin, it makes her return to the thoughts she just had of Teva village, and a reoccurance of the vision she had at the Water Temple. She has a strong desire to grab for water, and the flood comes, and then she snaps back into reality touching the coin. 
	Diame can see her blue aether mist glowing out of her, and her goblet of water begins to spin on its own. She grabs it to hide it with her hands from the Guy seeing her water act out of control. Her holding it causes it to spin into an orb floating out of the glass. She still hides this with her hands, and tries to play it off by drinking the floating orb from her glass. She wonders what is happening, and tries to get the orb to slow down and regain control of her powers. Kind of in denial she is out of control.
	She nearly chokes on her water she drinks when she looks into the kitchen, hearing some sort of commotion. The chef mistress is yelling at the girls to get back to work pouring wine, and sees the chef turned around at the maids staring at the glasses, then nodding in acquisance and continueing to work. When the chef turns around to continue on her cookpot, she is agast in astonishment. From Diame's view, the spoon is spinning around all on its own. She then looks around the bar, everyone is staring at their glass oddly. The songstress she takes particular note of quirking an eyebrow to a clear goblet with spinning wine. 
	Diame powerfully asserts herself that her magick is under control, and can see the mists of aether disappear. The Guy is looking at her with concern and asks if she is alright. She says she is, and that she must leave immediately. Grabs her stuff and says thank you and good night.
	She finds the servant girl who gave her her soup from before and gives her the silver coin and asks if it is enough for her food and and a room. The servant girl delightfully says its more than enough, and shows her to her room, and basically starts treating Lady Delandra like royalty.
	Diame relaxes in her room, and recounts her nightmare  at the beggining of the chapter. She also chastises herself to be more careful about keeping her aethermancy under control, as she might have caused an even commotion in the tavern. She is reminded about how in her cloister when she first wakes up, she had to meditate. When she woke up from her nap, her guard must have been down. She meditates for a minute by lanturn light, and prays, then goes to sleep.

The Audacious Aries; a youthful girl aged seven years. She had short yet shaggy black hair and tanned skin. She wore a tattered tunic and slacks, clothes she’s been wearing forever. The most noticeable attribute was her eyes, they were a vibrant red color, slightly brown. They had a look of fear and determination, innocence and sin, and maturity and youthfulness.

Peval: Rome
Pevali: Roman

Look at all these sick and starving people
Impoverished by their own government
Look at how the police, paid filthy rich by the government, are supposed to be opposed to those weaker than they

Do not the common people have it bad enough that they have to fear their fragile freedom taken away at the slightest infraction? By those who protect the rich and punish the poor?

The picture of the poorest of the poor, and the government helps them not, but rather pays for police to enforce the law that must be upheld. Whats the point to punish those who already have it bad enough?
	IV. The Fiery Heart

	A clear blue sky stretched overhead from the early morning sun over the neighborhood of Tikour, a bustling marketplace as well as residences for merchants and locals alike. The streetblocks alone would be big enough to hold an entire village in a countryside plot, Tikour was but a few streets, a square mile within a city within the inner walls of The Empire of Pevali. Its capital, situated in the northern reaches of the Eastern continent, was built at the base of the Burning Mountains, housing the Temple of Fire. In the lands surrounding the outer walls of the empire is a score of smaller countries that have fallen to Pevali’s might and were subsequently annexed. Now the Empire rules its puppet nations, their rulers usurped from their thrones and replaced with men who have sold their lives to be the strings to the emperyal crown.
	Ever still, their power grows under the rule of the ambitious Emperor Kilnero and his power over the Empyreal Legions. Their fearsome knights inspired tales of those who traveled like a living fortress, conquering one nation after the next, leaving crumbled castles of those who fought back lay in their wake. Endless arrows wiped out whole armies, and one entire nation after the next would become another stronghold for the Pevali Empire. 
	The looted kingdoms wealth went straight to the empire's coffers, creating the High Aristocracy within the inner walls of the capital. Outside of the privelaged nobility are the towns of the wealthy, Terrace being the largest home to those who provide services for the wealthy, their commonfolk being doctors and law mages, fine restaurant establishments and keepers of magick orchards, or gambling parlors and exclusive brothels. Even though the emperor and nobility bost of being the wealthiest and most populated nation on the surface of Caelutera, outside of Terrace, many of the towns within the empyreal walls are impoverished slums. The littered streets, crowded with the common folk, are home to many merchants, gamblers, travelers and thieves. In the poorest of these towns lies the slums, where the coin is copper and nickel, the homeless survive day to day, and feral young raised by the streets struggle in this poverty.
	
	A group of young street urchins traipsed the streets of Tikour on a sunny day's morning ten years ago. In the history of the empire, a decade past was when the empire's war to take over the surrounding countries had turned the bloodiest. The continent was turned into a violent warzone, within what was the harshest of times for the people on both ends of the battlefield. The impoverished Pevali people suffered the most at this time, and the harshness of the streets gave shelter to orphaned children from drafted parents fallen in battle. Others were abandoned simply because the extra food could simply not be provided for them, and were left on doorsteps or street corners.
	A dirt street crowded with the usual merchants selling  charred sticks of skewered bite-sized meat and vegtables, cooked from big hotstoves. Crowds of the commons came daily for what bargains in the open bushels full of local produce hauled in from fields outside the city walls. Many of the vendor stands had small trinkets and jewelries to proffer to at those who looked like they had the coin. In the slum's open streets, business was as usual, even when crime was high and thieves were nigh.
	An audacious girl aged seven years lowered the brim of her brown cape's hood partially covering her dirty face, but not so much that she would garner any unwanted suspicion. Her unwashed black hair was shaggy and neck length, and covered part of her dark tan face at times, then she would brush it away with grimy hands that had been picking through refuse for foodscraps. She wore a tattered and dirtied once white tunic and blue slacks, clothes she had been wearing for as long as she could remember. Her most noticeable attribute of the girl's profile was her eyes, they were a vibrant red hue like a rabbit's, but with brown specks of pigment. They had a look of fear and determination, innocence containing sin, maturity and naïvety.
	She peered around the corner of a yellow dirt-brick street building from its allyway, her eyes hungrily focused on the rack of freshly baked bread loaves and apples in open display on a row on a cloth covered table. The old and grayed traveling merchant stood in a silken white tunic and brown trousers, and tended to keeping his display, every fruit for sale and breadloaf fresh in the shade of an umbrella. Straining to listen over the crowd at someone he throught was standing there, then correcting himself and going back to tidying, it was obvious his senses were not as keen as they used to be. He looked wary though, as he was a usual target for the girl and other thieves, but his wares were fully stocked and his coinpurse looked full, so business for him must be good, he wouldn't notice a few missing apples. And if that was true, then he probably wouldn't miss his coinpurse, either. When her accomplice arrived, she would find out for certain.
	The old man started to turn in her direction, and the gamine darted her head back around the ally and leant back against the corner of the allyway, just out of sight. Curses! The old man's wary of his new wares, he's lookin' all around for thieves today. Just our luck. Where is he? Adem said to wait right here. She shifted her cloak, watching the daily crowd of Tikour's people walk up and down the streets of the marketplace, all wore simple colors of brown, white and blue.  Most were common dressed in tunics and slacks for men, few women wore those and seemed to favor wearing simple skirts and plain blouses. Not the little girl who waited to steal her next meal, a skirt would do hardly any good when she inevitably had to run. The worn leather of the stolen shoes she wore would help with escape too, yet she'd have to steal a new pair soon.
	"A good day, shopkeep." A familiar young voice spoke spryly. "Might I see your wares?"
	Finally, he has him distract. The girl peered out of the corner once more, and the old merchant was turned to a boy dressed similar as she, wearing a cap over his head with long, shaggy brown hair, and bright green eyes.
	"You! I, I think I recognize you! I'm sure of it!" The man shouted among the deafening din of the crowd, and bent down squinting his slightly cataract eyes at the lad before him.
	The girl cautiously kept her eyes on the old man with his back turned to the stands behind him.
	"Why sir, I have but been sent by my grandmother for a loaf of bread." The boy named Adem said each word in a shout over the marketplace carefully so the old man would hear him, and motioned slowly to the round loaves on the top shelf of a display, taking his time so the graying merchant would see him.
	The old man squinted his milky blue colored eyes, and bent closer to the lad, "Who is yer grandmum?" He said low and was not afraid to add a touch of meanness.
	The hooded girl peeking out behind the corner of the wall waited, unsure if the old man had found them out or not.
	Meeting his harsh stare that was aimed a foot higher than his actual height, Adem responded quickly. "Uh, Miss Cobbleburt down the street, sir." The boy spoke with honesty ringing true in his voice.
	Holding his grimace for a few seconds more, the merchant softened his look at last, and asked, "Well, we have wheat, flax seed, hemp seed, poppy seed," and named off others on the top shelf of the display rack.
	Darting out from around the corner, the young girl ducked under the legs of the table displaying the fruit, she was small and was as quiet as she was quick. The coinpurse tied in a knot around the merchant's belt hung behind his hip, and her fingers pulled at the leather cords in a loop around it. With one tug the leather cords were undone, and the coin purse was free, and she took it carefully so the merchant would not feel the weight of it. It weighed only a few coins, but any heavier he might have detected it, behooving the early bird. He did not, luckily, and turned suddenly to reach around to a shelf holding sweetcakes. The short girl stood behind the merchant and yellow stone building the man's awning was put up against, staying out of sight.
	"Um, what are those ones over there?" Adem asked excitedly as he pointed to the other side of the merchant's bread display.
	"Oh those? Pumpernickel, sourdough, rye," the merchant shuffled through more shelves of bread.
	Ducking out from the fruitstand, she slipped the coinpurse within a pocket in her trousers, and popped right up standing before the apples in a line. With a look to her side, pretending to stare at something on the ground and stretch, as she made the motion, she snagged one of the ripe green apples and it went into a deep pocket specially sewn in to the inner lining of her brown cape. The hand that was just clenched in theft turned into a fist that stifled a yawn as the girl stretched again, waving her hand to the boy in a gesture that spoke of success. Then she made a squeak to add to her yawn, and made it loud enough the old merchant could hear. She picked up an apple and held it up into the sunlight, "S'cuse me!" the girl said in a yell over the sounds of the street bustle and passersby.
	"Huhnh? Just a moment, I'm busy with- hey, put that down!" The merchant said over his shoulder, then turned to the kid in boy's clothes whose face was partially covered by her hair and hood. He reached forth and snatched the fruit from her hand, "Gonnae naw be stealin' none of me fruits! Hear me, you little pestilent urchin?" The greyed hair one scoured her with his partially whitened eyes.
	She deepened her voice, and tried to mimick the tone how Adem spoke, "Pardons, sir. I wish to, uhh, buy this?" the word was strange enough to say for her, but then reaching in her poke to produce the money for it was even stranger. She reached within the very pouch she had just stolen and pulled a single copper coin out from the bag hidden in her trouser poke, and held it out to the merchant. "Will this do, sir?" She said slowly and carefully over the streetnoise.
	Eyeing the glimmering coin in the sunlight carefully, he leant forward and took it, nodded to her, and handed the green apple back. "Now, if you're done,"
	"Oh no, sir. I wanted to know if you have any oranges you could sell to me on this fine day?" The girl asked very slowly, meeting eyes with the merchant, but still watching Adem out of the corner of her eyes, stuffing one of each of the bread loaves he could reach for into a jute sack and slung it around his back.
	"We do not sell oranges here, go look in the noble's stands if ye are lookin for exotic foodstuffs. Now begone, I am already seeing to another customer." He turned to Adem, unaware he stood with a bag brimming with bread behind his back. "Now, what was it you decided to-" The merchant noticed his array of breads were a bit stark, and he knew he could not have sold that many already this morning. "Oy, what have we here? Where did all me loaves go!" He darted eyes of icy daggers to the boy, "You! What did you do to my bread display!? Do you plan to pay for all that?!" 
	"Aye, I believe I can, but I only wanted one loaf of hempen bread." The boy said to the merchant, whose addled vision was turned from the girl now grabbing apple after apple, getting as many as four more into her cape pocket. 
	"What! What is that on your back!?" The old merchant leant forward, the icy daggers for eyes now even more so as he squinted to see the sack on the boy's back. "Don't play with me! I'll call for the watch! Now pay up or give it all back at once!" He demanded with a snarl.
	"Oh by all means, but I'm afraid my friend is holding your coin." The boy responded as he slowly took a step back and pointed behind the man.
	"Where do you think you're going?!" The merchant shouted, and then he turned his head and saw the girl stuffing her cape full of apples. "You street filth!" He completely swung around, and reached out his hand to snatch the girl's arm.
	With a quick retreat of her hand, the girl jumped back, and her hood fell from her face and her hair tossed aside, revealing the sly young girl's vividly red eyes, staring up defiantly at the merchant.
	When the shock of recognizing the most notorious thief in Tikour took him, he tripped on his step, and fell onto his apple display, knocking a few to the ground. "You! I know for certain who you are!" But before he could utter her name, he heard footsteps trotting away heavily behind him, and he turned to see the boy darting into the street crowd, a cloth sack full of ovals and baguettes at his back. "Me bread! Come back here!" The old man turned and shouted at the boy as he disappeared into the crowd. Then the girl behind him darted away down the alleyway, and when he turned back to her, the child was gone as well. "Me apples! You vile thieves!" the old merchant strained to shout over the street noise, and passersby hardly seemed to notice. 

	The merchant's shouts trailed off behind her, and the girl ran down the deserted alleyway, dodging around litter and refuse bins she had sifted through for scraps late last night. When hunger drove her and her friends to steal, and adrenaline helped her escape with it, the only task left was finding a place to safely hide. Waiting to be able to eat once her empty stomach was not tied in knots from running and nerves was another task all together. 
	At the end of the alleyway she came about the corner to another street, darting past two merchants' boothes selling lengths of brightly colored sheets of silk, and lengths were stretched from long spools and hung from the awnings. She slowed her step as to not rouse suspicion, and stepped around the colorful walls of red and yellow silks draped around the merchants' boothes.
	The streets of Tikour changed from the worn dirt of the foodmarkets to paved cement in the area that had more expensive wares to sell, and most of the market goers here wore similar clothes colored white and blue, mostly blouses on women and all men in tunics and trousers. There seemed to be some people of stature walking around the streets, men and woman alike dressed in jewelries and exoticly cut silken clothes. She didn't exactly blend in, but if she could cross the crowd, on the other side of the street was an escape route. In the next alley, an unrepaired sewer hatch can be removed and placed back. 
	She knew of such quick escape routes such as this one she could use for a quick slip from pursuit, and the clever street thief would make her way through underground tunnels of Tikour's aquaducts. A few blocks traveled safely in this manner would take her to an escape hatch near the surface the hideout where Adem would be waiting, as well as the rest of their young gang of thieves.
	She moved through the wide paved streets, moving around the thickness of the crowd. If any nobles gave the little slum urchin scornful looks, she could not tell under her hood she redonned, nor did she care. Halfway across the street she got a clear view of the alleyway, undesirables in tattered brown clothing crowding there as well, huddled around a small fire.  That was where another older gang of thieves live, certainly not her usual territory, but all who stole to survive shared the streets, and the escapes. 
	She stepped quickly around an obese nobleman in a red silken shirt and black trousers, both stretched nearly to bursting, and to her surprise as soon as she passed him, his cane was under her foot, and she went tumbling forward. Regaining her balance, she stood upright and glowered at the man who just tripped her. "Wot di' ya d'tht fer, y' fat oaf!" She shouted at the man by reaction, her red with brown specked eyes stared at him ready to trip him back. Just then she noticed a red and green pair of apples rolling around on the cement away from her, and she gasped. 
	"Little streetrats shouldn't dart around those with important places to go!" The man in red spouted as he glowered down at her with a shaven face and a hooked nose with dark eyes. His uniformly curled grey hair shook from the sides of his head, topped with a gold plumed dark hat. 
	She returned the unkind look, but she would not waste any more words with the man. The red apple rolled down the street a few strides towards a company of five of the commonsguard, and the girl's eyes widened as she well recognized them. Clad in chest plates of glistening silver over gray, and dark blue uniform slacks with black boots, white sleeved shirts lined with multitudes of seven-pointed stars for rank. Their conical helmets were topped with a small metal stud, and the captain of the guard stood there with his back turned, she recognized the short silver pike topping his helmet.
 	Ulp! Th' cap's out t'day? She gulped as she lowered her hood over her face, and started for the alleyway, mind void of if the nobleman still scorned at her, and dared not linger so the commonsguard would notice her.
	"Hmm! Don't you think you dropped something!" The round nobleman shouted at her.
	She turned her head back in disbelief the nobleman was trying to call attention to her, she preparing to give him a final dirty look and perhaps spit over her shoulder. But when she did, she caught a glimpse through the moving throng of passersby the at the end side of the street, and stumbling out of the alleyway was the apple merchant with cataract eyes. Looking incredulous and beside himself with fury, he scoured his aged vision fervently through the crowd, an obvious search for her in vain. "Thieves are about! God help me!" He shouted left to right, hoping someone in the crowd would pay him mind, yet the passersby gawked at him as if he were a madman worth the entertainment, and nonetheless kept on.
	The girl did the same and kept towards the alleyway, a thick throng of customers crowded the entrance while talking with the mechants selling jewelries at their boothes. She started to push her way through the noble crowd awaiting their turn to purchace the pricy golden goods. She garnered quite a large amount of mutters among the crowd, she knew many were turning and murmuring about her. 
	"Lo, and behold, old sir!" The voice of the noble carried over the crowd, "Your little thief is over here!"
	The girl froze in her tracks to glance back, incredulous herself, witnessing through the crowd the nobleman motioning with one hand to the old man, and pointing at her through the people standing in line. 
	The apple merchant saw the man's signals, somehow, and rushed over, stumbling out of the busy street traffic. She yet thought the old merchant's senses and speed would have been duller. However, she did not have any time for pondering any of that, the scowled looks she recieved from the crowd in line before the jewelry vendors were unkind, and growing in their meanness. A woman with several glimmering fireopal rings around her gloved hand was saying something surely vile to her that she didn't have the time to hear, as she pushed past her, she only regretted not having the time to pick all her jewelry off her. 
	Darting through the crowd, the line ahead waiting to buy golden rings and trinkets barely noticed her or the commotion behind them. Good, she just had to make it through the nobles hypnotized by their gold and get into the blasted alleyway, and she would be done dealing with the harsh adults on the surface.
	"Over there! Quickly now!" The nobleman motioned to the old merchant now by his side, "She is in there, trying to steal gems and gold now." He glared disgustedly at the apples littered on the ground, "What a shame you allow such theft and feed the rats!"
	A glance over her shoulder showed the parting of the crowd, nobles clutching their belongings close and letting out cries of bewildered panic. "Damn it!" the girl muttered. An elderly noblewoman gave her an especially dark sneer for her curses, the strain to her face looked like it marred the white porcelain paint carefully covering the wrinkles of her ancient face.
	"Nay, sir! I assure ye, I be done feedin' the rats, mi'lord!" The old merchant responsed estutely. "Is that not the watch o'er yonder, mi'lord?"
	"'Tis indeed!" The nobleman responded, "Now, I take my leave, that child took nearly enough of my valuable time this morn. Now, to ensure you don't let your, thieves," he breathed the word scandilized, "disturb our streets again. You see the constable, so I pray you know what to do?" 
	They wouldn't dare! The girl thought, "Aye, they w'uld." She assured herself in a mutter, watching from within the crowd of silk cloaks and finely pantalooned legs standing in line. The nobleman in red turned and go about his way and the old merchant in white motioned towards the alleyway, beyond the rich waiting to buy jewelries. 
	The small huddle of thieves kept their backs turned to the commotion, meaning they knew she was coming. They'll help me get outta this mess. She hurried as she shoved past  the last of the few people ahead of her, and darted towards the narrow alleyway between the vendors.
	"Lord Constable!" the merchant shouted shrilly, "Come quickly! I beg of ye!"
	Catching a final glimpse of the group of the commonsguard, they kept their backs turned to the shouts, and even looked as though they were making steps to leave. She also saw the crowd she pushed past give her vile looks, and she turned away, and stopped short of bumping into a huddled boy a year or two older than she.
	 He and the others wore a cape such as she, and held their hands out on a small open fire made of woodscraps, glowing dully within the shade of the alley's dirty walls. The boy turned and gave her a cold look from dark eyes, and even gave her a small grimace from his soot-smeared face as if he looked ashamed, but nonetheless, sympathetic.
	Before she could speak, the merchants voice broke throught the crowd, "Don't ignore me! It's that little runt Mirnada and her vile lot! Running away with me wares they pluck'd as sure as I draw breath!" He finished his hoarse shout near breathlessness in the distance, echoing down the walls of the alleyway.
	In the shade of the alley, the young thief held out her hands to the bonfire, and with her cape's hood over her head, Mirnada looked just like any other of the homeless, enjoying the warmth of the flame in the alley, and she certainly blended in with this group. She dared not linger too long though, for the notoriety of her name would garner the townsguard's attention for sure. Those in the alley who leant up against the walls were older, aged from adults to the decrepit, and most were either asleep or babbling in their usual daze from finding some grog to drink, and saving their energy so they could scavenge for food during the night. Dressed in clothes even more ragged than hers, they sat in the alley against the dirty yellow brick walls. 
	The girl with earthern red eyes gulped from a dry mouth, and blurted words out without any more time to tarry, "Ah'm usin' th' ol' sewer 'atch an' Ah'll b'gone as fast as ah came." Mirnada tightened her cape over her head, and whispered over her parched tongue, yearning for as soon as she was safe and hidden for a crisp apple. "Thank ye in a'vance fer lettin' make use uh'it." She grinned, and expected a friendly smile in return she could part from.
	They with their hands to the flame didn't move, and flat out ignored her every word. The boy and a few other of the younger ones all stared at her with harshness in their eyes. The fellow thieves all seemed to be acting bemused that she was even talking to them.
	Taken aback, Mirnada flinched and took a step away from them. "I'm sorreh! This ol' man is jus' chasin' meh, so I'll be on meh way!" The heat from the flame was still warm against her skin as she made a fist in fear.
	"Aye, do nae linger aroun' too long, lass." A drunk man to her side hunched against to the grimy bricks shouted at her, "Nary a friend to b'found in that lot, t'be sure. And ever more join!" He ended his cautions with a hearty belch.
	 Over the heads of the hooded thieves, the crowd of nobles parted in a shuffle from the shouts of three armored men of the townswatch to make way. All were fully clad in their burnished silver armor, painted with stripes of rank and followed the largest wearing the piked officers helmet. Even at a distance and their leader's face was shadowed, his icy blue eyes spotted straight at the hooded girl. An open snarl partially hidden behind a bar of iron barked at the civilians to make way between him and the girl he would arrest, and the officer nearly shoved all aside who did not heed his shouts.
	Turning away from the police officers and their captain with all haste, Mirnada sprinted down the alleyway and ran as fast as she could. She dodged around other unfortunate souls, huddled in rags over other small cookfires, or slumped in a daze, and made her way past them and made a turn. 
	Down the alley not a soul loitered, and bolted iron doors lined the brick walls, exits for businesses. Just above them on the next floor were a row of windows with different colored curtains, the homes of multiple merchant families that shared the same common space above the different businesses open to the streets on the floor below. At the farthest corner of the shaded dead end before her, a familiar metal grating embedded into the base of the building shone with a grimy luster in a stray ray of sunlight. 
	The sewer hatch was one of many little known secrets to escape the law for thieves like her, they ran narrow corridors beneath the streets. She knew all the winding passages in Tikour that would eventually take her to her gang's hideout on the outskirts of town. She'd actually be able to enjoy the apples in her cape pockets, but she had no time to feel the knots of hunger in her stomach now. 
	As Mirnada came up on the grating, in the daylight she could faintly see the concrete walkways around a river of murky waters beneath the roads she, and everyone in the markets stood on. Without any time to hassle, she grabbed at the metal bars, and pulled at them, and they budged not an inch. She frowned. "Wot?" The girl muttered. She yanked at the metal again, to her surprise where she expected there to not be any bolts, four shiny new screws a thumb thick stuck through the once loosened grating, securing it to the brick wall. Her hands trembled and she felt as if she had the air knocked out of her lungs. "Th' bast'rds knew n' di' naw ev'n tell meh! Damn th' lot o' 'em!" Mirnada muttered in frustration after realizing the harsh betrayal. "I got'a get out'a 'ere!" She said with a turn, and hurried back down the alleyway lined with barred doors.
	Mirnada's breath heaved and her face flushed, but she focused on running, if she grew distract and began crying she would be captured for sure, she reminded herself. Any hope of escape left her thoughts as soon as she turned the corner, the guardsman in armor had lined up the homeless thieves around their campfire, and two of the adults in rags pointed right at the corner that Mirnada had halted in her tracks by.
	Immediately, the lead officer's icy stare found the girl on the run all the way past the other slouched over woebegone people drunkenly strewn about. "Halt, thief!" his booming shout echoed down the alley, and he charged in pursuit of her. None who loitered around truly paid much mind to him, and the lead officer and the two policeman behind him dodged their way around them to make their way to capture the young thief.
	Dodging around the corner merely out of sight, Mirnada stood looking down at the dead end, and knew another route of escape existed not in this alleyway. She anguished at hearing the incoming shouts of the officers on their way to arrest her, and a punishment was inevitable. "Nay, gonnae naw 'appen today." She told herself. There has to be another way. She looked around, the iron back doors of the business buildings lined down the alley, but they would surely be kept locked and secured from thieves such as her. 
	The girl's attentions turned up at the sound of a window sliding open, and some blue and white striped curtains furled with hands dissapearing back within from someone unseen.
	"You can not escape!" A shout that sounded too close for comfort echoed loudly around her. "Surrender to the Pevali Police Guard at once!"
	Sweating from the fear of her pursuers, Mirnada heaved her breath from the adrenaline rush heating her blood. She herself did not know why her nerves made her stomach feel like it sank to her knees, she had never been caught before and the thought of it shuddered her. Fear began to paralyze her mind, but she shook herself out of it quickly, her determination to survive this and escape reforged her resolve. Yet, the heat from her head was almost too much to bear, and she gasped a sudden heave. She pulled at the neck of her tunic, "Wot is 'appenin?" She said as she faintly recognized the sensation of feverish heat dripping down her neck, through her body, down her chest out to her fingers and toes. When she felt like this, her memories became hazy for some reason, unable to recall clearly much else of what happened aftewords. "Agh! Why'sit so blazin' 'ot!"
	Stomping around the corner in his full armor was the police officer, his face a twist of scorn and his eyes wide behind a bar of metal from his helmet. "Halt in the name of the law!" He reached out with both arms, and lunged at the girl to grab her.
	Acting on reflex, Mirnada jumped swiftly back, unintentionally leaping so hard she threw herself against the alleyway wall. To her further surprise, she left a noticeably large trail of flames and smoke, but hadn't a moment to worry about it while the officer stumbled as he grabbed at air. As he started to fall over in his heavy armor, in the same motion, the young girl kicked back off of the wall, and left a set of flamming shoeprints into the brick, then sprang off of the officer's back, and leapt up to the window above. 
	Grabbing tightly onto the metal of the windowsill, she lifted up the rest of her body and swung her legs up and planted her feet on the sill. She ducked under the glass through the striped blue curtains, and observed a kitchen with a small stove with a pan of frying beef cutlets just below her, so she squatted there in the windowframe momentary observing and querying what to do next.
	A fair skinned cook in a blue blouse with dark hair in a bun had her back turned at the girl at her windowsill, and was busying herself bent over an open oven beside an open walkway that lead out into another room bubbling with the sounds of a large family.
	"She's up there! Bloody hell!" Echoed angry shouts from below, and Mirnada turned over her shoulder to peek back through the window. The guardsmen below pointed up at her, and one getting off the ground with a scorchmark on his armor.
	A sharp inhale sound made Mirnada turn forward, and the middle aged woman was stricken with shock as she stood in her apron and held a bubbling, lattuced pie with a pair of white oven mitts. "Oh!" The woman exclaimed, and stared at Mirnada dumbfounded.
	Before the girl could respond, boots heavily trotted down the alley, commands of "Surround the building!" resonated outside.
	I'm gettin' the 'ell out of 'ere! Mirnada decided without hesitation. She pushed against her hands against the windowsill and flung her legs over the sizzling cookstove, landing on her feet on the tiled kitchen floor. "Pard'n me, ma'm, I was jus' on me way out, bu' ye' migh' 'ave summore gues's fer sup soon!" She said with a ducking bow as she bolted down the small hallway. 
	Avoiding all the home's decorations of large vases on stands and propped against built in shelves, Mirnada burst into the family's livingroom, and a large family of about twenty or so people sat at a large, rounded table with plates of bread and salad, awaiting what was being prepared within. Young and old alike were talking amongst themselves at the family table, and most hardly noticed the young girl dashing in.
	There was a stairway leading down, probably down to the ground level where she could escape out to the streets from, and a doorway with a peephole on it that would most likely lead out into the buildings commonspace. Mirnada decided that to get out into the open as soon as possible would be her best best, so she darted around the large family, and swiftly as to not break any of the earthern pots or finely decorated vases lining the house. An open window let in noise of some sort of commotion out in the streets, but she hadn't any time to worry of it then as she dashed down the stairs. She heard someone from above shout "Hey! Who was that?!" 
	Minada found a door at the base of the stairs, and she opened it as she ran in, then halted with a stumble just before a store counter complete with register. She took in the sight of hundreds of vases each on display, stacked high on wooden shelves, shining in the sunlight let in from glass windows showing the busy streets outside. A young girl older than she to her side stood beside an older man in the pottery shop, both in common clothes with a fair skinned and dark haired resemblence to their family above, and both sharing a look of complete bemusement. A woman in a nobles gown stood before the counter set with a large red vase and a few scattered gold crowns. The startled woman gasped at the girl darting out of the door, and even let out a shriek as Mirnada placed her hands on the counter and leapt over, and then started to run at the front door, open to the loudness of the busy streets.
	"There she is! Get her!" Barked from somewhere, and Mirnada saw the three police officers eyeing her through the window, and dashing towards the open front door. 
	I've worked too hard gettin' these apples and no ones gonna stop me! The girl in the cape thought to herself as she crouched behind a shelf stacked to the ceiling with an assortment of colored vases. The store entrance was nearby, and the officers entered one by one, their eyes ascout for her, hidden behind a large urn. As soon as they move from the entrance, I'll make my move and hide among the street crowd. She peered her auburn red eyes out from around the shelf corner, and the three officers were no where to be seen near the door. Curiosly stepping forward, she stood out of her crouch, "Where'd they g-"
	"Got you, little runt!" Said a harsh shout through the shelves which startled the girl.
	Turning her head, Mirnada ducked as two gloved hands reached around a vase on a shelf, an officer in helmet glowering behind the mask of steel. "Halt!"
	Paying no mind to the guard in the next aisle of vases,  Mirnada dashed to the door. As soon as she neared the threshold, she saw an officer charging in after her.
	"Stop! You can no' get away!" He shouted through his metal helmet.
	Making a dash back through the potter family's store, she swiftly went down the small pathway between shelves of vases on display. The shopkeepers' and the customer's jaws all dropped at the sound of a dull bump from behind, and as she ran at them, a loud cacophony of crashing and tumbling turned Mirnada's attention back, and her mouth gaped as well at what she saw. 
	While the armored officers' made chase, one apparently had bumped a shelf in their haste, and as it toppled over, thirty or so vases slid to the floor. As they crashed in unison, bits of colored porcelain and clay fragments flew about, and the fallen shelf tumbled onto another, and that shelf crashed onto another, making a continual chain of the destruction.
	The policemen stopped a moment, aware of what damage they had caused, and continued to cause on its own as they paused to watched hundreds of priceless vases shatter sequentially, seemingly embarrassed of their own carelessness. Yet, they were surely furious to have been made such fools of merely by a troublesome thief, and ended their short repreive of looking at the spectacle they had made by making shouts of "Get the girl!" and "Just stop her!" and resumed their chase. They ran at her in what little walkway remained as shelves and vases fell by the dozens at a time, and the officers attempted to shout something at Mirnada over the sound of hundreds of vases breaking.
	Ignoring the chaos behind her and the shopkeeps and customer completely frozen and slack-jawed from what they were witnessing, Mirnada hopped up an over the counter, and went through door leading back up the stairs. 
	As she turned the corner, she startled at the sight of a balding middle aged man in white and blue common clothes standing there on a couple stairs above her. He looked gravely concerned, and at the sight of the girl he looked at her and held up his hand with a single gold wedding ring on his finger. "What in the name of all the Saints is happening in my shop!"
	Mirnada paused for a moment, but instead of answering his question she ducked under his arm, and ran up the stairs. Curses! I need a way out of here and fast!
	"Hey, this is my house! Get the 'ell out!" The man shouted with shaking anger up the stairs at the girl running from him. "I'm warning you! I'll call the townsguard!"
	"Step aside, citizen!" A policeman's commanding voice echoed up the stairway.
	"Dammit, th' cap jus' won't bugger off!" Mirnada made her way to the top of the stairs and turned around to see the lead officer marching his two other officers up the stairs after her, whilst the middle aged man pressed himself against the wall with his hands tossed up, his face of indescrible surprise painted pale as clay. 
	A large, earthern pot thick and glazed blue was on a stand beside her, and she knew that she would not regret what she was going to do, if the shop keeper would not miss one more vase. She lifted the heavy thing up, and turned to the staircase.
	Wide-eyed with horror, the balding shop owner raised his arms up at her in protest, "Put that down! Don't break one of my priceless artworks!" he beseeched up at her.
	Rolling onto the floor and down the stairs, the large blue pot tumbled down quickly, hitting against each step with  heavy force. The lead officer charging up the stairs stopped and braced his hands forward to catch the vase, and the policemen behind him stumbled forward over one another, and knocked the lead off balance. The heavy vase crashed against the lead as he blocked it, and backwards he tumbled, falling atop the two officers below him, and the three tumbled together down the flight of stairs. Plates of body armor clamored heavily one atop another as the officers landed one atop another, and the large blue vase landing atop them, and then rolled on the floor.
	"Good God! That nearly broke! Are you daft, girl?!" The balding shopkeep shouted at Mirnada, beside himself at what was unfolding within his home. He descended the stairs to check his vase, which surprisingly seemed to have not broken. "Fool girl! Breaking a masterpiece like that would have cost me a fortune to make another!" He stated as he inspected it for scratches, nearby the policemen began to their feet, although slowly.
	Sticking her tongue out and even having the nerve to blow a raspberry at them, Mirnada stood at the top of the stairs. That should buy me enough time to get long gone out of here. She started to run at the home's front door, and met with the looks of the entire family seated at the table, all with mouthes agaped, wide-eyed and silent. The girl ran past them and unlatched their front door and swung it open. She went out into the commons hallway, where not a person was in sight.
	Slamming the door behind her, Mirnada ran down the hall, trying at each doorknob she passed, and to her dismay, all were locked. "Ugh!" She exclaimed and looked down the stretching hallway, it went on until it turned at a corner out of vision in either direction. "'ow am I t'get ou' o' 'ere?" She asked herself worriedly.
	"She couldn't have gone far!" A shout boomed from down the hall, "Spread out and search!" A second shout commanded. The door at the end of the hall from whence she came started to open. 
	Mirnada gasped, then as she turned away, ready to bolt down the hall, a door nearby opened, and a man in his late-middle years stood in its threshold. He wore a long, open coat of dark green that nearly swept the floor, his vest vertical green and yellow stripes, and had a multitude of gold chains attached to loops in his vest, and various sizes of pocketwatches all hung from his sides. She turned to him as he stood there before his home placing a dark green top hat on his graying head, and catching himself in surprise when he saw the small girl standing before him. "Oh, I say!" He squinted at her through a pair of gold rimmed spectacles that looked tiny on his long nose. "Err, can I help you, lass?"
	"W-well," The girl stuttered, "Uh, y'see,"
	"After your arrest I'll ensure the harshest punishments  will be used to please my ears with the sounds of your screams, child!" Echoed a roar violently shredding the silence of the halls, and followed it charging down the hallway was a stampede of metal bootheels. The lead constable charged straight at her with the other two officers in tow.
	Facing back to the gentleman standing before his home Mirnada met his look of astonishment and answered, "As a mat'er of fact, aye, y'can!" she said with a bow, then pushed around him, dashing into his home. A din of mechanical clicking from hundreds of clocks hanging from the wall and arranged on table displays, each different with with seemingly similar craftsmanship. 
	"Hey! Who said you could enter my home? Get out!" The clocksmith demanded of the girl.
	Running past the various woodworked grandfather clocks with gilt dials of the sun and moon lining the hallway, Mirnada poured into a living parlor, vacant but full of the noise of ticking clocks. Ornate gold and silver chased clocks on end tables tick-tocked in the living parlor, but as she hadn't the time to admire them. 
	"Step aside, citizen!" A policeman's shout from the hall boomed into the home.
	"Good heavens!" Replied the shakey voice of the aged man, followed by the stomps of boots.
	Movement through a partially closed doorway caught Mirnada's eye, and she darted through it, approaching a dark haired workwoman in plain white liverly attire. She was bent before a basket of laundry, hanging smallclothes by clips on two lines of rope extending out the window. As she went to crank a pulley and rotate the drying clothes hung above the streets, she noticed Mirnada, and startled, but awaited her to speak, she seemed unsure if this girl were an execpected guest. 
	"In there! After her!"  An angry voice boomed in the living parlor and drowned out all the tick-tocking within the home.
	Hopping onto the windowsill and planting her two feet onto the ledge of the open window, Mirnada grabbed ahold of the laundry line connecting from one set of pulleys to another mounted against the wall of a building across the street. Another set of ropes with an assortment of clothes in sizes and colors hung from ropes just below, and the commonstreets were just a flight of stairs beneath them, but the height seemed much larger for the girl watching the people, smaller when seen from above. They were scurrying about within the bustling din of the steets and paid no mind to what was happening above them. Placing a shoed foot softly on the rope, it held her weight, and she carefully balanced her two feet on the clothesline as she held onto the one above.
	"Wh-what are you doing?" The servant girl inquired, worried at what the girl was doing for her safety. "That's dangerous, y'know!"
	"Halt!" The policeman in armor entered the laundry room and ignored the serving girl's shrieks, and ran to the window to grab the girl suspended above the streets.
	Shimmying with her life depending on it, Mirnada made her way sidestepping across the laundry line. She was thankful that she made enough space that she was out of arms lengths when the armored officer leant out the window to grab her, and he nearly fell out into the streets below in the attempt.
	"Get to the o'er side, now!" The lead constable commanded his officers, and back within they ran. The laundry girl stood there, and watched them flee, dumbfounded.
	Hands tight on the rope, Mirnada shuffled between hanging clothes, and gradually made her way across, and she tried not to think of the streets below. This was a horrible idea!  She hastened her shimmies, and unclipped a few articles of laundry which fell to the streets below. Nevermind that, just get across!
	A gust of wind caught the various clothes like a sudden sail, and the shake of the ropes shook her from her grip, and she fell. Grasping onto the lower rope, her hands tired but she strained to retain her grip. Fool, get ahold of yourself! She continued to swing across, the paved streets below an unkind reminder if she fell now, not even halfway across.
	Another jerk in motion of the ropes caught her off guard, but before she knew the source of it, she noticed she was  speeding forward in motion. Looking back as she gripped for dear life, she saw the servant girl at the crank turning the laundry line, and was helping her along to the other building.
	Why is everyone trying to kill me today!? Among other panicked thoughts crossed the young girl's mind, then the line jerked to a stop, the girl holding on white-knuckled.
	"Up there!" A shout familiar in its irritation came from below. "Don't let her escape!" A policeman commanded.
	Shouts and screams from startled citizens below grated against Mirnada's nerves, and she did not want to look down and see how many people were watching her dangling by a rope. An open window presented itself, and she swung into the second story of the building on the other side of the street.
	She landed in some sort of librarium storeroom, walls stacked ceiling high with shelvesfull of scrolls of parchment, aged as well as new looking books, glass bottles of black ink and cups of bundled quills. With murmurs of whispers coming past the stacks of inventory, Mirnada knew she was not alone within. In a glance out the window, the servant girl across the street stood in her window, gesturing at her to hurry.
	Mirnada donned her hood, and scurried past the inventory of what she figured was a scribery store. Two men stood by an open doorway, talking quietly about boring bookwork wearing dark robes and strange black hats, squares with flat tops and tassles, and both had different cuts of curled powdered wigs. She ducked between them as she ran, and they barely noticed her, and their conversation was barely interrupted as the intellectuals went right back to it.
	Finding herself in a hallway of closed doors with a railing over the first floor, she overlooked the lower area of the caligraphy store, there were dozens more shelves stacked with stacks of thin parchment pages, giant jars of ink, and book bindings. There were more men dressed as the other scribes, and they were all in rows at small tables, each with quills in hand scribbling fervently, transcribing all sorts of open books around them.
	A man stood at the top of a latter pouring cup fulls of ink from a large jar into smaller ones, Mirnada figured it was easier than having to carry one of the big jars down if one only needed a small amount of ink.
	"I say, is there some reason a gamine such as yourself,"
	The startle spun Mirnada 'round to a tall, elderly man dressed in similar black robes, white wig and square hat looking quite displeased.
	"is traipsing around inside of my establish-"
	A thunderous roar of footsteps stumbled around from somewhere, and startled her and the scathing old man. 
	"Act'ly, ah wuz jus' leavin' ah wuz." Mirnada said with a bow and turn, and ran down the staircase to the first floor.
	"Come back here at once you rude little vermin!" Came the shouts of the old man, which were rightfully ignored by the girl, but caught the attention of a few of the scribes at work, who did little else but turn their heads momentarily.
	At the base of the stairs she ducked beneath the ladder, mindful of the man above her, and stayed by the wall, looking around the room for an escape. A window open to street level was at the far end of the room, she had found her escape route, and made her way along the edge of the scribes' workshop.
	Mirnada noticed a narrow hallway to her right as she ran by it, but the instant she decided to pay it no mind, two metallic hands reached out for her and clamped her arms in a tight grip. "Got you, troublesome brat!" The officer said as he lifted her in the air from behind. "I have her! Cuff her!" 
	Twisting and turning in an effortful fit for freedom, Mirnada tried to pull herself out of the policeman's metallic grasp, struggling to shift her weight to slip away. Apples from her pockets tossed side to side and rolled about, murmurs of the scribes' concern layered with the sounds of the struggling arrest before them.
	Trying to hold the squirming child took an effort, but the lead officer held the girl kicking against him while his fellow officer held a pair of cuffs at the ready. "Come with us quietly! Or I'll snap your arms like little twigs!" The man twisted his grip over the girls arms to show he meant it.
	"Agh!" Mirnada shrieked, and gave up her fight as the man holding her twisted her arms behind her back. "Stop!!! I gi'e u'!" She shouted, then began to cry in short heaves. "Don' hur' meh anehmo'e! Ah'll ne'er do i' agai'!" She started bawling, putting herself completely at their mercy.
	"Oh, you won't. I shall make bloody sure of that." The officer flung her arms forward to the cuffs and she whimpered. He kneed her in the side, and Mirnada fell to her hands and knees, catching the wind knocked out of her. He knelt down and leant over her head threateningly, "Shut up! Now be silent, or I'll make you cry all you want tonight, sweetheart." He pulled her upright by her shoulders and he nodded to the officer, and he readied her bindings. "Now, put your hands out and submit to the authority of the Empire!"
	In a desperate motion, Mirnada flung herself forcefully to the ground, and swept her leg quickly across the floor, giving a sharp kick to the ladder holding the man atop of it, and the entire support swayed in balance. 
	"What do you think you're doing!?" The officer captain shouted at her, and grabbed her once more, then watched what was unfolding up above.
	Up above, the man on the wobbling ladder leant side to side to regain himself as the thing shook him. In a forward lurch he caught himself, and rested against the high shelf, but then that, too, began to shake. A few small objects such as scrolls and quills fell, but it was immediately unseen that at the top, the man had jolted the large, open bottle of ink and it slowly began to slide.
	Seeing the man was unharmed the lead officer shouted down at the caped girl he held down with his arm wrung around her neck. "You'll regret all the trouble you've caused!" 
	"Shite! I dare say, look out!" Shouted someone that Mirnada could not see. 
	The policeman turned his head upright to see what the commotion was, and a small downpour of black rain drenched the armored officer. A jar of thick glass landed atop his metal helmet with a sound clank, split on its pike, and shattered to countless shards as it hit the floor. Glass shards carried with a spreading pool of ink that stretched out beneath the desks and all the scribes' feet, they stood up and backed away from the mess.
	As Mirnada looked up on the angry intellectuals as they shouted angry disapprovals for interrupting their work, then she realized the captor holding her had let go, and when she pulled away from him, the officer fell to the floor in a daze. 	The officer holding the cuffs turned to his partner of equal rank, "What are you waiting for! Grab the runt!"
	A step down the hall the other heavily armored officer charged at the girl with speed to tackle her, and the girl but merely hopped to the side on a dry patch of floor. The policeman, however slipped on apples, glass and inky slick, toppling over onto his fellow armored officer and they fell ontop one another, strugglin to get up in clamor of metallic clangs.
	This is too much, I'm out of here! The girl with the cape drenched in ink thought, and she leapt unto a vacated work desk as to not slip through the ink and glass. Unbeknowst to the child as she skipped from desk to desk, she left a trail of dark blue footprints over many a page of the scribes' handwritten books. 
	Making a final leap out the open window she landed in an open sidestreet scarce in people, away from the crowded streets open to businesses and bazaars. Tall ladders and stories of boards scaled a constructure of scaffolding alongside up a yellow brick building. A few people in common clothes wandered about the dirt road going on their way, and before any would take mind of someone who just came flying out of a window, Mirnada looked for another escape. She quickly made her way to the scaffolding and hopped up board to board, and at last at the top, climbed over the flat ledge spilling into an open rooftop. She shrugged against the short wall she scrambled over, folding herself over her sprawled out legs, panting deeply for breath.
	The city noise around the rooftops all but sounded it came from the furthest distance, although Mirnada couldn't hear much of it over the sound of her breathing and the blood beating to her ears. She recooperated from shock and disbelief of what had just happened, she had never come so close to being captured by the police of Tikour, she had always been able to outmaneuver them one step ahead of a chase. What all that had happened was a blur, and she didn't even want to try to recall any of it. She slumped back and filled her auburn eyes with the cloudless blue sky, slowing her breath.
	




	
	
	
	
	
	
	
		IV.1 Child of the Wild Streets

	A LONG-WINGED BIRD cut across the sky, and Mirnada followed the animal with her red flecked with brown eyes and took slower breaths. She could smell the cleaner air of  fields carried afar fram the higher winds, away from the faint familiarness of dust and dirt wafted up from Tikour's city streets below. Black droplets dripped from the brim of her hood, and she remembered she was soaking wet with ink. She scurried to get her cape off her, she didn't want to deem ruined yet as it was her only one. It lay on the flat cement rooftop in a lump in the corner, then as she remembered she had many apples within it, flopped it back open and went through the pockets.
	Inside the cape was dry, and thankfully the inner pocket wasn't wet with ink. When she reached within, however, there was a scarcity of how many apples she thought she had pilfered, and only one remained. "Huh? Oh bloody 'ell. All tha' work fer jus' one 'o 'em?" She held the fresh apple up to admire it in the sunlight, its green with yellow stripes glistened, completely unmarred by ink and dirt. She couldn't say the same for all the weeks of filth on her hands that beheld it. "Well, bett'r'n nuffin' I s'pose." She said as she bit into the first bite of the crisp, sweet apple, at last able to enjoy it.
	She sat up against one of the roof walls, admiring the view of the tall, smokey mountainranges in the distance as she ate. She could always see them when she was up on the rooftops, and even as uneducated as she was, she knew people called them the Mountains of Fire, and the emperor's palace was built surrounded by them. She wondered what the palace was like, how much treasure must be within, and the fabled High Aristocracy, nobility of the empyreal royal family.
	Of course she had never visited such places, merely told to her by her friends at the guild of young thieves she belonged to. They called themselves "The Hungry Gang" as they joked they had a sort of honor about not stealing anything but for food. But then, it was added to their young logic that if money could be stolen to purchase food, then unmissed trinkets could garner money thus procure food. Therefore, it was acceptable for them to steal anything, so long as it was for the benefit of the guild when they met at their secret hideout in an abadoned workshop, at the far end of town, away from current businesses.
	Thinking of such, Mirnada remembered she had a pouch of coin she stole off the old merchant, and reached within her trouser pocket to pull it out. When she did so, she noticed there was something else in her poke, and furthermore that the money pouch seemed heavier than when she first stole it. Curiously, she placed the pouch aside and reached in her poke once more to see what she had, and she dig into many cold metal objects.
	"Wha' in th' 'ell?" the girl muttered to herself, and pulled a small handful of jewelry, gold and silver rings, some studded with red and blue gemstones. Staring at them puzzled for a moment, let out a thoughtful "Hmm." then decided to think no deeper of when exactly she obtained them. "These musta ended up in mah pockets at th' bazaar." She guessed. She shifted forward on her knees to get a better look at the gemstone rings in the sunlight, and she felt a slight prick to her leg. "Ow!" she reached back within her pocket, and found a large object she hadn't noticed before, and pulled out a palm-sized brooch shaped like a swan, made of gold and embellished in a hoop of emeralds.
	She stared at the thing for a moment, and weighed its worth, and had enough of going over her treasures for now, and left them in a pile. "Well, ah know ah'll be jus' fine on food soon." Mirnada grinned with a satisfaction knowing she effortlessly still lived up to her title of most notorious thief in Tikour, tiresome as it was to maintain. "When ah get back to our hideout," She splayed back on the tiles, uncaring if she mussed her hair in rooftop dust. "Ev'ryone'll b'gawkin' o'er 'em, tot'lly aht a loss o' werds. Ah'll be th' one with th' mos' loot once ag'in fer shure!" She giggled in a large throw, rolling around in soot without a care in the world. She coughed and leant up, then stood quickly to her feet to dust her black hair off, pushing it out of her face, getting lungsfull of the fresh air.
	She could see all of Tikour from her rooftop view, square shaped building tops of various heights and sizes were scattered between cross streets. She could see block after block all the way into the next town over and the next, all separated by small inner city partition walls to differenciate the crammed together cities of different names. The outer city walls made of dark yellow stone surrounded all the cities as well as the entirity of the Pevali Empire and towered over her in the not too far off distance. She had never been outside of empryeal lands, much less the confining city walls as only travelers with either papers allowing them outside the walls or nobles with coin are allowed to pass them freely. Otherwise, the walls were said to keep the common townsfolk safe from invaders from the outside. 
	Mirnada, young as she was, never understood much of this, but knew she had hopes of seeing the outside world, and perhaps see a day where her and her guild did not have to steal day to day to survive. 
	She wandered around the rooftops, and took in all the sights and sounds of the sunny day. She had eaten mere scraps she had sifted through trash the night before, and the apple for breakfast sated her constant pangs of hunger, if only for an hour at most. She had a pocket full of treasure to feed herself and everyone in the Hungry Gang for weeks, and for a little while now as she stood high on top the town, she could enjoy the day without fear for her life or fear of hunger.
	Smiling to the sun, she stretched her arms out, intaking all the endless city scenery from the tall rooftops to the city walls and clouded mountains. The sun was bright as a summer's day and the sky was blue and beautiful and she felt at peace, having a moment to herself away from loud street crowds. The master thief watched people walk up and down the streets in the distance, and she giggled at her own cleverness, and thought fondly of her small piles of begemmed golden treasures. She had done so much good for her friends, they'll all be happy and not have to steal again, atleast for a while. She truly wished that they all could not have to steal at all, but she had never known a life to survive out of theft. One day, we'll be the ones ownin this town. Not that I don't already. But, still, I don't know why we even have to steal. Theres tons of apples to go around, aren't there? He had more than enough to miss what me and Adem stole. "Blimey, I di' forgo' all abou' 'im ah did! Oh, ah'll meet up wiff 'im la'er I s'pose. 'e's prolly made it down the nex' alley an' through th' sew'r 'atch an' b' lon' gone b'now." She assured herself, and fondly got back to thinking of what things she could provide for her gang once she hocked everything.
	Looking down the busy streets of Tikour, all the vendors were suddenly no longer places to steal from, and she became happy knowing she could soon buy all she needed from them with her own coin. I wonder what sauced meats and veggies are being cooked up in the streets today? "Ah think 'tis 'ndeed time fer noon sup." She grinned as she looked back to her treasure piles, and made her way away from the sounds of the busy streets far below her. 
	The clamor of people changed distinctly from street to street, from the merchants noisily shouting over eacher to peddle trinkets, to different softer cadences like cooing pigeons on paved streets catering gold to nobles overflowing with coin. Mirnada scoffed at the cacaphony of noise, and couldn't wait to gather her treasures up and finish her business in the markets. Probably vendors further within town where she hadn't caused a ruckus this particular day would be the best place to do her shopping. She snatched up the leathern pouch of coin she stole from the old merchant, and wondered how much coin was inside. Stolen money was usually more useful than trinkets, since those always had to be hocked first, and she would deal with that hassle once she had something else to eat. 
	The street noise was indeed loud and intense today, which was odd enough to distract even her from thinking of food. Some sort of disjointed yells and screams rising faintly from the streets above the usual dull murmur. She couldn't pinpoint where it was coming from, or convince herself that she had something to do with the disturbance below. The sounds of the town made the market streets seem like some sort of roar of untamed animals. "Wha' 'n th' 'ell is goin' on?" The girl looked at the bustling traffic around her, and it seemed that a few people were running to where she could hear a strange, shrill noise the loudest. Carrying the pouch of coin with her, the young girl moved along the edge of the rooftops, peering over its walls, trying to see where the commonfolk were going to.
	Hearing the strange noise again, Mirnada knew it to be a voice, but it didn't sound like anything but one, strained beyond normal recognition. There was a preponderance of the commonfolk crowding around three metal-clad men, and she recognized one unmistakenly by the dull glimmer of blue and black ink staining his suit of armor helmet to toe. She pressed her hands and leant herself against the short rooftop wall, in shock of what she saw. She recognized a boy in the middle of the crowd as well, even though she did not want to believe her eyes, it was Adem, his voice barely recognizable.
	Red eyes widening, Mirnada clasped her hands to her mouth, covering a shrill gasp. "N-, n-nay! They couldn't 'ave!" But they did, and she scorned herself right away if she dared deny what she saw.
	The crowd of commonfolk parted further in a bigger circle as the lead officer shook his helmet violently as he shouted loud enough that it was barely audiable to Mirnada's ears up where she was. Whatever he was shouting, the people deftly stood back from the boy with light hair and green eyes as he stood in a short shrivel with the breadsack on his back. Two officers stood behind him ready to tackle him if he dared run, and the lead officer stood over him, his voice roaring with loudness and thunder. 
	Adem moved not away except flinching and holding his hands up, making motions of defense and visibly, the boy was screaming in terror. But she could not hear him, only the shouts of the ink-covered officer whose commanding cadence drowned out the cries of the boy and the gaggle of mutters of the gathered townsfolk.	
	Run, Adem! Get away! The girl felt her vain yet hopeful thoughts of her friend escaping sink from her stomach to her feet as the boy was grabbed by the two officers. 
	In a short struggle the officers used more than enough force to subdue the small child, in the scuffle the boy's sack of stolen bread flung to the ground and loaves of various grain strewn out into the dirt streets. The lead officer with armor coated with dark-blue ink unsheathed a shortsword, golden hilted and decorated with a tassle for his rank as well. The two officers each planted a metal boot down on the boy, one on his back and the other on the back of his head. The two leant down kept Adem braced with their boots and held his arms back so the lead officer could ready his sword.
	The boy strained to turn his head with his neck under a boot, trying to glance over his shoulder, his green eyes peeled wide, tear and fearful.
	"Wh- what're th'gonnae do!?" Mirnada's trembling voice asked herself, hearing only stories of the law's punishment for thievery but never personally experienced it enacted. She shuddered and felt her breath freeze in her throat, fearing for her comrade's life, sharing his fear as she watched from above.
	At a commanding shout from their leader, the officer obeyed and in a twisting motion of an arm, one of Adem's hands was laid out against the metal plates of the policeman's protective boots. As the man's armored heel dug into the bones of the boy's back, the lead officer readied his decorated sword, and in a fell swoop, hacked but once. Blade met with boot metal, the boy's flesh sliced clean through the wrist, and blood spilt forth from a stump as the small fingers of Adem's lopped off hand curled lifelessly on the ground.
	 The boy's face was strained to a horrible extremity as he screamed in pain, but Mirnada could not hear his voice over the roaring din that took over the market place at the sight of violent bloodshed. A horrible, loud raucous of men and woman, the elderly and the young, all shouting and hooting one gigantic sound in unison. A burst of roars carried in a single wave of tangled noise, one of approval mixed with revoltion, with wails of empathy for the poor soul, added by cheers of enjoyment for the spectacle of justice enacted thusly.
	Gulping a sharp gasp through her hands clasped over her mouth, Mirnada burst in a short scream as she began to cry into her hands. From terrified red eyes tears streamed down her face, sharp inhales made a tight wrenching in her gut and made a rock in her throat. 
	The lead Pevali armored officer in dark blue ink quaked his piked helmet as he shouted another command through the mask of metal, but he made sure he did so right before the boy's face. The boy winced back and shook and strained to no avail beneath the policeman's boots. An officer grabbed Adem's other hand, and readied his wrist to be cut up on the bloodied steel of the officer's boot as well. The lead officer readied his blade.
	Slumping down into a ball against the short wall, Mirnada could not bear to watch the gruesome sight anymore, and was beside herself with grief and helplessness. Her hands pulled at something in her grip tightly, and looking down she was reminded of the pilfered leathern pouch she held, and had pulled it open by its cords without thinking. Inside were glimmering coins of copper, as she once expected, but as the metal slunk and shuffled, she discovered two larger coins. The golden pair of Empyreal crowns had the regal face of Emperor Kilnero's likeness pressed into the gold, lifelike and seemingly staring back at her. Dazed by her surprise, she stared at the money she had, and further heard the price her friend had to pay. The crowd roared again, the same shouts of excited glee and groans of empathized disgust, she didn't understand why people enjoyed watching the awe and spectacle, no matter how horrible the justice enacted made one anomg them suffer. She had to look. She had to see what had happened, if Adem was still alive or...
	When Mirnada peered over the rooftop wall, the crowd was still thick as if all the bazaar crowds were standing there, yet they hurried to part ways. The lead officer covered in ink was walking down the streets towards her which startled her, but she assured herself that he could have just so happened to be going the same direction. She did not think the armored man could see her hiding from the few stories she was up. 
	The ink-covered lead officer turned his armored head slowly, as if meeting every eye of the crowd behind his metal mask, and hundreds of people hurried to part ways for him and the two following officers, one wearing a blood-stained boot.
	Mirnada felt the color leave her face as the officer held up high in his gauntlet the punished boy's severed hands dripping with blood, and showed it proudly to the crowd. He didn't seem to be saying a single word but people were jumping out of the way, and the volume of loud voices slowly started to lower.
	Desperately she scoured for Adem as fast as she could among the bazaar crowd, and trailing behind the armored townsguard, a wall of people moving in a frenzy marred her view, but there he was. The boy was writhing in the dirt, his mouth gaped and Mirnada could barely hear his animalistic shrieks and groans as he held bloody stumps for wrists out before his eyes. She wanted to run to his side, but what could she do? How could she possibly help him now?
	 A small group of four young children emerged from the crowd, circling around Adem. Mirnada recognized them as thieves as they were clad in dirty common clothes. They're from that useless lot who wouldn't bother to help me in the alleyway, why are they trying to help now after its already too late!? Will they never learn how to lend aid to fellow thief when they need it?! She scorned them for their stupidity equally as her own, criminals were supposed to watch out for eachother. Honor amongst thieves required it, too many grim tales she heard passed between those who had to steal to survive, all warning of hands hewn or necks noosed. A harsh lesson learned for her, even harsher for her comrade.
	While she reminisced of the thieves' codes of honor in her outrage, she held her mental tongue in shock. The thieves' picked up the scattered loaves of bread off the earth, and the flung open jute sack, gathering what was left inside. In the next moment they scurried off, leaving the handless boy behind to bleed in complete disregard.
	Inablity to comprehend what she saw paralyzed her thoughts, everything she had ever been taught about how to survive and how many times thieves have helped her out to get away. She started to entertain revolting thoughts of what she saw could mean, how they waited for the police to be gone before they stole the bread for themselves. They encircled him like vultures! They eagerly waited to snatch all what we earned for themselves!? We would have shared if they had helped! If they but asked!! Mirnada tried to logicalize what she had witnessed, but nothing she had ever learned could help her make sense of this blatant betrayal. She knew she had to gather her nerve and do what she could for Adem. He was alive and needed help, and no one esle would. She desperately thought how she could help him now. "I-I got'a get 'im to a doc." Medical attention was the only thing she knew would save him. If a doctor saw his wounds, perhaps he could help if she paid him the gold she held. If he understood what happened, maybe he would help Adem, and take this coin. If its not enough, I still have my loot. However the reality struck her of rumors that doctors were not supposed to help her kind, but she had to try. She needed to help even if she failed. 
	She stood over the rooftop wall, and made note of where Adem was in the crowd, easy to spot at with how many people would would not walk near him, but busily darting around him. Heads turned away, common folk and nobility parted alike, and started away back to where they had been driven astray from shopping the bazaars. She tried to put her disgust for the crowd aside, and looked at the gold coins she held within a pouch in her hands.
	Her vision of the glimmering gold blurred, marred by tears that fell one another on the coins. Mirnada sobbed but stifled herself, wiping her tears aside on her shirtsleeve. I haven't the time to waste feeling sorry for myself. Get down there now, Mirnada, you dolt fool! She scorned herself and refound where Adem was in the distance, standing wearily among the thinning out streetcrowd, bright green eyes weeping into bleeding, handless stumps.
	A huddled figure in long, filthy rags leapt from the darkness of an alleyway,  the face of a long-nosed, old crone peaked out of her hood. Her unkempt white hair spilt from her shoulders down to the dirt and shuffled through her bare feet as she weaved through the crowd, attentions poised straight onto Adem.
	"Wh-wha' do' th' hag-witch want wiff 'im!?" Mirnada asked herself panged with worry. She flinched in fear and uncertainty as she watched her helpless friend be approached by the strange old woman.
	With one swoop, the old crone grabbed the boy under her arm, and looked over her shoulder and scornfully eyed the crowd with hateful, pale-blue eyes. The boy struggled weakly against her and she turned back to him and shouted something shrill that Mirnada couldn't make out. In the next moment, her ragged clothes furled, and she darted down a gap in the street and through another dark alleyway. Adem was gone from sight.
	At a sharp inhale of chill breath, the girl felt the ties to all hope she had to do anything for her friend torn from her. Gathering her strength with a mouth parched with sorrow, Mirnada muttered "Adem...!" As she felt the pain of her heart break. The handful of coins and all the treasure she had could do nothing for him. To worsen to her reality, she knew she would be treated the same way one day as well. Thoughts of all she had ever done, and memories of having to learn to steal to survive crashed down and she was doomed to share Adem's fate as well one day. Mirnada's hand tightened angrily around the pouch of stolen gold, cursing herself for her ever taking it.
	"I wouldn't imagined it would have been so difficult to locate one child in this tiny city." A man's voice stated astutely a few steps from behind Mirnada, with a loud emphasis to announce himself.
	Tossing her hands into the air in surprise, Mirnada spun around in the rooftop dust so quickly she nearly fell over herself into the small cloud of dirt arising from her feet. Gasping a harsh breathful of dust, she had a bit of a coughing fit while frantically searching for words to say to the man who snuck up on her. 
	The dust around her cleared and she focused on the large man standing over her, his shadow blocking out the afternoon sun. Mirnada's eyes adjusted to the sun's glare, and a middle aged man built huge with muscle stood, a draped orange cape fluttered in the wind behind him. The wrap of bright cloth hung around his neck, fastened to a gilt lion's head buckle on his shoulder, parting around a brown tunic stretched over chest and arms bursting with muscle. A rope belt tied around black breeches draped loosely over proportionate legs that could support the hulking man, tucked into long socks, worn under leather sandal-shoes. His long hair of dark silver shone dully in the sun, and fell down to his broad shoulders holding up folds of his cloak. He moved closer and what startled Mirnada even more about him was the red eyes flecked with brown that he had, a striking simularity to her own she was recognized for.
	"Although, you are hardly an ordinary child." The man spoke fondly as if he knew her, "And yet, this small city has so many people tightly packed into one place. It was a wonder I found you today of all days." The man gave a slight, compassionate smile across a face of that looked as though it could have been cut from stone. The tone of his skin was also tanned as if soaked full of the sun like the young girl's.
	"Who in th' bloody 'ell ar' yew!?" Mirnada shouted once she had the breath to, but as she said the words she realized she no longer held the pouch of gold, and it was no where in sight before her. "Wha' th'..." She spun around and flung herself against the rooftop wall and peered over the edge, and widened her red eyes in horror. 
	Directly above the busy bazaars, the pouch fell to the streets below, and just in the middle of a parting crowd marched several armored policeman, lead by the one completely drenched in glistening dark-blue ink. The leathern cord of the pouch hooked around the pike atop the lead officer's steel helmet, and hung before the metal mask's sight bars. The officer in dark blue ink reached up a gauntleted hand and snatched the pouch off its cord, then turned his attentions up, shaking the money pouch and pointing at Mirnada looking down at him. "You dare mock the empire, you filth!?" His voice roared up through the din of the market crowd, strained with exacerbated fury.
	Flinching a large step back, Mirnada backed away from the rooftop wall and turned to face the mysterious man who had startled her. "No' look wot yew did!" She tried to fight off tears of rage that flowed freely with the shock of being discovered, and now had someone to direct all the misfortune of her day at. "All mornin' ah've been tryin' t' give 'em th' slip bu' yew g'ahead and ruin i' all!" She wiped off her tears which left long smudges of dirt across the young girl's face. She approched the man who had snuck up on her and now flung his hands up defensively, she thought she recognized him for a fellow thief, but one lacking of honor for the code. "Fer wot? Di' ye' wan' a part o' wot ah stole or ah'll 'ave t'run from y'too?! Well g'luck wiff tha',  if y' thin' you'll ge' any' coin now, y'bloody fool's dumber than 'ell! All th' watch'll b'yup 'ere to t'deal wiff yew too s' y' jus' doomed yerself, wha'ever y'were plannin'." She gestured as if she were clapping her hands at him mockingly, and when he met her with a blank stare lowered his hands as if he took her less seriously now. She angrily scorned what she was doing as a lack of her own seriousness of the situation, then continued on chastising the mysterious man for breaking code. "Don't y' kno' any o' wha' thieves' do aroun' 'ere? Laike, donnae e'er sneak u' o' someone's hidin' spot?!" The dumbfounded stare the man with red eyes gave back frustrated her to the point it was a waste of time to talk to him any further. "Feh! was'e 'o time y'are." A ringing of a bell sounded in the not too far off distance, a sort of warning for when a threat to the common people is about.
	She turned and poked her head off the rooftop wall to the streets below to see the cause of the alarm, the townsguardsmen tromping around the streets below her. The armored officers filled the streets, at least ten were in a knot around the lead officer awash in dark-blue ink, and parted at his command. The armored guards spread out to surround the building, and three charged within from the streets.
	Mirnada glowered and turned back to the mysterious man with hatred trying to push past sadness in her eyes, "N' ma'er now! I 'ad a day o' peace n' quie' t'look forwar' t' b'fore y' muck'd e'erything u'!" She gave him an incredulous look, anger clashing with sadness restrained by wonder if she should even be lashing out at this person she just met.
	The man's tan, stoney face did not change much in expression, and he gave thoughtful pause, possibly weighing the girl's words. He gave her an unwavering stare from his red eyes that gave Mirnada a strange feeling, she then realized she had never seen anyone else in the city in her lifetime who also had eyes and skin akin her own. He stood and yet said nothing, but looking at her, completely uncaring of what might happen when the townsguard would find them. 
	"W-well?!" She pressed him angrily, "Nothin' t'say fer yerself?!" She could feel the faint vibrations of the rooftop rumbling beneath her feet, the marching of the officers' boots advancing up flights of stairs. "Argh! They're righ' u' on us!" She looked to the other rooftops to judge the gap with hopes she could jump across, but even for her the distance would be impossible and the likely fall deadly. "If ah coul' jus' get away fro' th' guard fer jus' a lil' while ev'rythin' woul' set'le down some and ah coul' get back to th' gang." And have to tell them what befell Adem today. She coldly reminded herself she would be doing a sad duty to her friend if she could even show her face to her friends again.
	Giving a thoughtful nod to her, the man seemed to be weighing her words, and spoke calmly as if nothing in the world was amiss. "Would it not be easier to live a life without constantly running away, always in fear of punishment?"
	A struck nerve made unwanted words surface, and Mirnada turned to the man with anger widening her auburn eyes. "O, yea! I' woul' b' naice woul'n't?! W'll guess wut, y'jus' maide mah laife a helluva lot hard'r!" She motioned to the wall of air around the rooftops. "Yer a fool's fool if y'thinkin' o' gettin' away from th' guard! We be trapped laike cornered rats!" She startled at the sound of a rush of stomps ending abruptly beneath her, followed by a pounding up on a square hatch of metal built into the rooftop. 
	"Open this door!" A voice bellowed from below.
	"Trapped as rats we may be, but the armored cats have yet to feast."
	With a grunt of frustration, Mirnada turned back to meet with the strange man. "This ain't th' taime fer stupid sayin's!" She startled again when he knelt down to meet her face to face, his red flecked with brown eyes looked deeply in to her own. "Bloody 'ell! Wha' d' y'want from me?" She wanted to jump a step back but she stood her ground, showing she was unafraid of him and much less didn't want to be around him. Who does he think he is!? She frowned fiercely.
	A clicking of metal with a commotion of loud mutters came from the door embedded in the rooftop floor, signaling nothing good.
	The huge man made a smirk at her, "If you swear your life to me, I shall take you all away from the slums of here." He looked off for a moment as if staring past the gigantic empereal walls encircling Tikour as well as all of Pevali. "Far, far away from here." He said with some sort of relief to his voice.
	"What are you talkin' abou'?!" Mirnada said very slowly in case the man was daft.
	The metal hatch flung open with a clang against the rooftop tiles, and a townsguardsmen emerged, clad in steel armor, followed by two in his command, one with a bloodied boot and the other with bloodied gauntlets. Dark blue ink glistened over the leader's high stripes of rank, and he heaved heavy breaths through his helmet. The lead officer had a jute sack grimly stained with blood tied to his belt, and the guardsman trio followed his advancement and stopped when he stopped. He thrust out his gauntleted hand and held out a familiar small leathern pouch, "Did you lose something, sweetheart?" he flung the bag of stolen coin to the ground before her angrily. "How your unfortunes double as I have found you in turn, and may God have mercy on your soul." He rest his hand on a set of handcuffs by the gilt hilt of his officer's sword.
	"Your life is mine, if I can save it. That is fair considering the alternative, aye?" The mysterious man stood upright and with a furl of his orange cape, faced the approaching guardsmen to meet them. He seemed to be almost as tall as one of the men including their full armor, standing still as stone just a stride or two before them.
	Standing beside the tall, hulking man didn't make Mirnada feel any better about the townsguard having the both of them cornered. "What're y' doin'! There's no' a chance o' reasonin' with 'em!" She shouted up at him. He may be a fool out of his mind but I sure as hell am not! She grumbled under her breath, and thought how she could possibly escape.
	"You there! Step aside from the girl!" The lead officer shouted and shifted in his armor, motioning at the large man standing tall over Mirnada. "She is a wanted thief and should you interfere with Pevali justice you shall suffer the same punishment as her!" The other two officers stood at attention by his side to show reinforced his words with all seriousness of duty.
	"Good Officers," Said the mysterious man, "Should I let you take this young girl into custody, would you not show her the same kindness you showed the young lad earlier?" He pointed at the bloody jute sack dripping down the man's inked armor.
	"That is none of your concern." Muttered the metal man. "Step aside, or you're under arrest as well!" He shouted.
	Scouring for a route of escape, Mirnada saw the lump of filthy rags in a distant corner reminded her where she had discarded her cape after she ascended the scaffolding. I can make my escape down and out of here if need be. I'm not caught yet, but this fool better not piss off the police and make it any more difficult for me than it already is! She grunted watched the adults argue, but the man just stood there without a response for the officers. Is he trying to make them madder?!
	"Argh! You too shall be taken in to custody, you're highly suspicious, attempting to help a criminal, and are interfering with empereal affairs." The lead officer stepped forward and grabbed the decorated hilt of his sword, brandishing just a glint of steel. "You are both under arrest under Pevali Law. Submit to my authority or die!"
	"Well, I certainly choose neither of those options." The large man grabbed at a buckled leather strap clasped on his shoulder and with a furl of vermillion hues in the sunlight, folded his orange cloak up, and tossed it to Mirnada in the same motion, which she caught by instinct and it draped over her arms. "Hold this," He took a step towards the officer trio, then turned his head over his muscled shoulder to add, "and don't let it get dirty."
	Before Mirnada could protest to the audacious request, the sonorous sound of metal brandished startled her, and the officers had drawn their blades at the man who approached them. "D'ya ev'n kno' who y' are y' dealin' with?!" She shouted to plead the strange man to listen to reason. "Lis'en y' 'are-brain'd foo', y' don't even 'ave a s'ord, if yer unarmed, 'ow are y' supposed t'-" She helplessly held the man's brightly colored cloak tightly to her in frustration as he walked away from her with no ear for her words. What is he thinking!? Making a sacrifice of himself?! Why do I have to hold his cloak! Although it isn't that heavy and the fabric is very fine, but I haven't any business in holding his clothing for him! Yet she wasn't going to throw such a fine thing away and she certainly didn't have one anymore, but bright colors attract so much attention, something she wished she had less of. She pondered on what to do while she still held the strange man's orange cloak as he approached the armed officers.
	The officer stained in ink swooped his blade, holding it towards the strange man into a threatening stance. "You'll regret challenging the law!" The officer roared, and he charged forward. In a fluid motion the muscled man swept his hand openly in a chop against the metal gauntlet the lead officer swung his sword in. 
	Mirnada blinked when she swore she saw a small yet bright burst of vermillion light where the man struck the armor over the officer's wrist, and her mouth gaped when the officer's gilt blade was knocked right out of his grip and fell to the ground. "Wha' d'ya think yer doin'!?" She yelled at the top of her voice to the group of fighting men, but directed at the man fool enough to attack them.
	Before the girl had finished shouting, the large muscled man kneed the lead officer in the stomach, making another small sphere of bright light flare up then wink out instantly, leaving a large dent into his inkstained armor and with the man doubling over. In the large, unarmed man's next motion, he spun on the heel of one of his sandals, and with the other, delivered a kick to the officer's chest that made a huge burst of dissipating orange light. The man with ink-stained armor's helmet jolted off his head from the impact, and lifted into the air, launched backwards, and hurled across the building in an arc, off and over the edge of the rooftop walls. 
	With wide auburn eyes of bewilderment, Mirnada followed the man in heavy armor fall down to the streets below, and leant over the wall to watch him crash into a merchant's display, crushing a vale of vegetables and fruits and sending some flying into the air themselves. In the impact, the officer utterly destroyed the table as he lay splayed out on in his dented armor, his blue eyes wide open, fixated blankly at the sky, and face stretched wide with shock. He twitched as if he tried to stand, but after he had fallen from about three stories it was no wonder that he seemed he could not move, but a small wonder if he will survive the fall. 
	His helmet rolled against the dusty roof tiles and clanged against one of the nearby walls, drawing Mirnada's attention back to the other two officers, blades drawn, encircling the mysterious man. They stood on either side of him, arms poised ready to strike. "Y' mad fool!" She cried out at him. "What are y' doin'?!" He looks strong, but no one could toss someone in full armor over like that! He's completely unarmed, but what was that strange flash of light!? Bloody hell I want to be around this no more! She looked around for some other route of escape, but she merely clung his cloak tighter to her chest.
	Without warning, one armored officer after another swung their swords followed by an attack roar. The large man in strange clothes ducked beneath their blades in a quick reflex, and their parried metal met with a clang. The man leapt just a foot above the ground, he twisted himself and an orange light engulfed his legs, then spun around in in a full circle. He executed a sweeping kick to both the armored officers legs, and completely knocked off their balance with one officer falling forward and the other toppling backward. The effulgence of orange light faded out the tips of the muscled man's feet as he landed, then reappeared in a bright flash around his arms. Balling his hand into a large fist, he struck at the helmet masking the armored man, striking a deft dent to the metal, and sent the man on his way falling backward. As the man in the metal suit landed with a heavy clang, he slid back against the rooftop tiles, and continued until slamming against the short wall in a large plume of arising dust. 
	Mirnada stood agast as the punched officer stopped nearby her, caught by the wall, just short of falling to the streets as well. As the plumes of dust dissipated, she realized he was unconscious, with a large dent buckling his helmet and sizable cracks forming in the yellow bricks in the wall that caught him. What disbelief she felt continued as she saw the mysterious man kneel down to the officer who had fallen forward, squirming to somehow stand back up. 
	The man pulled the officer's helmet off, and with the absence of any strange flashes of light, grabbed the back of the armored man's head and hammered it once against the rooftop tiles. After a harsh smacking sound, the officer struggled no more, knocked out cold. As if he had just done the easiest thing in the world, the mysterious man stood upright and turned back to the young girl.
	Mirnada stood there completely dumbfounded, clutching his cloak. The mysterious man walked casually towards her with his silvery hair swaying in the wind behind him and a cool calmness to his stoney face, looking as though nothing out of the ordinary had transpired. As if two officers of the Empyreal Townsguard did not lay unconscious before her by his hand. As if another armored man in the streets below was not delivered there by his foot. He did away with three policemen completely unarmed! But how!? That strange light!? What sort of trick was that!? The tall, mysterious man leant over her expectantly, and she stared straight up at him, auburn eyes wide with fear and uncertainty. "Stay awa'! Y'tell me wha' in th' bloody 'ell d'you want fro' me!? Ans'er!" She met with his red eyes, refusing to show any inkling of fear to him.
	"Well," The man reached his hand towards the girl and she defensively flinched away, then he motioned towards the vermillion cloth she wadded together in a tight bunch. "My cloak would be nice, for a start." 
	The girl looked down, she forgot she held the thing, and loosed her grip. "O-oh." Mirnda said wryly, feeling slightly a fool. Well why didn't he say so sooner! She held it up to offer it back, still defiantly staring up at him.
	The man took it from her and examined the orange cloth for dirt, gave it a shake to unfurl it, and draped it back over his broad shoulders, pulling it tightly through the lion's head buckle. "Thank you. Now, as I was saying-"
	"Aye! Y'were sayin' 'ow y'want'd t'save m'life an' I thank ya kindly. Now ah'll jus' b' on m'way." Darting around him, Mirnada began a sprint towards the lump of rags where she could escape down where she remembered the scaffolding was. She made it barely a couple of steps before the man braced his humongous hand on her shoulder, and without any force, kept her from moving a hair more. She stopped trying to run and glared up at him, giving him a look that she meant she was done dealing with him. "So, if you'll jus' le' m'be on m'way." She explained once more in case the man would listen to her that she clearly wanted to be left alone.
	"We had a deal, if I recall correctly." The man said in a low voice, calm and without irritation. "I believe that if I saved your life, you were to come with me." 
	She backed away from him, and he took a step forward. "Bloody 'ell y' bloody fool! Why can't y' com're'end any o' wha' ah'm sayin'?! Leave. Meh. Alone!" Mirnada said as threatening as she thought she could allow to someone who just rendered unconscious three armored men. A noise in the not too far off distance caught her attention, a consecutive ringing of one of the city's bells to sounded only when there was an emergency, and seemed to echo from every direction. The Townsguard would be rallying together after discovering their leader unconscious in the streets. Great! She grit her teeth at him, the alarm sounded her doom and narrowing her chances of escape greatly. But the man who caused all her problems didn't seem to know or even care about that, so she continued her defiant stare as if she could not hear the sounds of organized distress. It was none of his business, and his fault moreover, and she obstinately pretended that it wasn't even happening.
	The large, mysterious man studied her for a moment with that unshifting expression on his stoney exterior, then there rose a touch of heat to his seemingly unmoving face. He looked nearly the same and spoke calmly, but spoke to her in a tone of dire seriousness. "And where would you go? Back to the streets? To continue to live your life day to day, stealing to survive, in constant fear of death, imprisonment and torture? Is that truly how you wish to live? I think not." He sounded as though he was trying to not sound harsh, holding in frustration with her.
	I'd return to the Hungry Gang empty handed to tell them what had happened to Adem, and that I was careless and set off the town alarm to alert every policemen in town to hunt for me. She grunted in frustration. If every townguardsmen is stirred up and about, how will I even make it back to the hideout? Mirnada fought back welling up tears of anger. The man struck her deep with his ignorant words, ill timed talking of all the fears of punishment that have been a part of her every day. "An' wha' d' yew know!?" The girl thought the man incredibly tactless to be speaking about her life so familiarly and plainly at a time like this. "Yew kno' nothin' o' 'ow ah've suffer'd! Nothin' o' wha' its laike t' live this way! Why botha comin' t' me t' tell m' all this? T'make yerself feel betta? Yer o'viously a noble o' some kind, n' wit' wha'ever fancy magery y' used t' 'elp y' thwart th' law, y'can do wha'ever ye laike. Well not meh! S' go away! I c'n 'andle m'self!"
	"You do indeed take care of yourself, and aye! With magick!" The hulking man stated, staring down at her auburn eyes with his own. "You share the same blood as I, the same magicks, our peoples' heritage. In fact, your infamy in town is garnered over the years with the law is because you have these special talents to survive and evade them, all without even knowing it."
	"Jus' stop wiff this nonsense! Leave m' be an shu' up! I got nothin' t' do with yew!" Tears streamed openly down her face, the city alarms ringing unyelding, and her unable to take anymore talk of herself and her supposed magick. What is he talking about?! I merely just gave the police the slip! If I had real power, I could have done much more! I could have even saved Adem... She gasped for air making a shrill squeak, reminded of him and how hopeless she felt, being truly powerless even if she was imfamous.
	The mysterious man knelt down to her, meeting her eye to eye. "Listen to me. I can take you away from here, to live a life free of fear and you shall never have another memory of having to steal."
	She whimpered and sobbed more, unable to withstand anymore of the man's words, callous to all she had lived through.
	The mysterious man grunted and his eyes softened with sympathy. "Lass, we will truly be in trouble soon if we do not escape the city walls. I beg you, Mirnada! You must come with me!"
	Firming her look through tear stained eyes, her voice cracked as she spoke to him. "An' jus' 'ow d'you know m' name!?"
	"I know many, many things." He stood upright and crossed his huge arms. "I happen to know the name of the most talked about thief in Tikour only as a passersby these last few days. What I did not know until I sensed your use of magick is that we share blood." 
	The alarm bells in the distance stopped and the bustle of the town seemed to have come to a halt. A furious roar of commands echoed up the walls of the buildings of the market place, the sound heard nearly everywhere around the rooftops.
	"I also know that neither of us will be safe unless you come with me at once." Deep concern stretched his face as he looked off to the distance again, he looked truly worried he would have to fight off more than even he could handle.
	The girl heaved a big sigh and gulped, calming her crying. Do I really have a choice? I have to go with him and leave without even saying bye to the gang? Is this what they call fate? Her eyes swept across the pile of stolen trinkets, completely undisturbed in the corner when she looked up on them. Who will take care of them with Adem and me gone? She looked up at the mysterious man with red eyes indeed like her own, and reminded herself of what the man said about her possessing the same blood and magick as him. She new nothing of herself or the world beyond her young life as a thief in Tikour, and this man promised her a new life and to learn of herself. Well I ain't a fool. If we have no time to waste and I have no choice, that's enough to call it fate, I guess... "Faine. I guess ah coul' go wit' yew." She crossed her arms. "You jus' keep yer end o' this deal." Affirming that she decided to go with him only deigned worthy by her whim alone.
	A grin swept across the man's stoney face, "Then let us hurry off!" He grabbed her hand and they darted across the rooftop towards the scaffolding built alongside the building.
	Ignoring her old cape, Mirnada looked down into the narrow, shaded road off of the main market streets. There weren't any guards to be seen yet, and she and the strangely clad man took their chance and climbed down the scaffolding platforms. She held her hopes that he would not get them both caught.
	Down into the street, the strange man opened up his cloak, having taken a hue of dark orange in the shade. "Climb on to me, and don't make a sound." He lowered one of his mammoth arms nearly the size of her, easily able to hold on to. 
	Mirnada gave up resisting the man and put herself in his trust. Not a choice and not a moment to second guess. She reminded herself as she grabbed onto his arm, and he completely draped her in his cloak. 
	"Oh, and by the by." The man lifted the cover a moment, "My name is Marshall. Hold on now, and keep quiet." He draped her again and started off. 
	And with that, she held on to his arm and ducked her head against Marshall's chest. She stared at his feet from under the furls of his cloak, walking through the street as he carried her off leaning forward as if he were a giant huddled hunchback. Where is this 'Marshall' taking me? Can we even make it out of the the city? What does it look like outside the walls? What will become of the gang? Were a few of the myriad of thoughts that passed through her mind, one after another. Her thoughts froze when she heard the enclosing stomps of the townsguardmen echo throughout the alley. 
	"The building is surrounded, sir!" Shouted an officer running past them.
	"The little wretch couldn't have gotten far! Nary a man rests until the girl is found!" A metal voice deep with hatred snarled from behind them.
	She could peek out from the front of his cloak, and neared where she could see the light of late afternoon filling the marble streets of the nobles' marketplace, the usual loud din of busy traders was a muted whisper.
	"Hey you! The big guy!" A shout far behind them made Mirnada flinch, and she held her breath without moving another muscle.
	Marshall stood there, and turned his head over his shoulder. "Aye, officer? What is the problem?"
	"There is a dangerous thief causing mayhem about. Tell an official if you see a scullerly girl with blood red eyes akin to a bloody rabbit's!" The voice shaking with anger shouted.
	"Aye, officer. I shall do just that." The man carrying her replied, hiding the color of his own eyes by continuing on.
	He kept a steady pace before turning the next corner into the paved market streets, then proceeded to a walk as fast as inconspicuousness would allow.
	Feeling as though she would faint, Mirnada breathed once again, and held on tightly to Marshall as he darted around people through the streets. 

	After some time they entered the shadow of the outer city walls, arched over a large metal grated gate. There, merchant carts entering and exiting the city limits were inspected and travel papers checked, however it seemed as though all the city traffic had come to a stop from all the bedlam and commotion. 
	Two large wooden arched doors lay open to a horse and a carriage suitable for a fine nobleman within a stables built into the yellowstone wall. As soon as Marshall was within the walls, the huge doors closed behind him by two stablegrooms in plain white and brown common clothes. Another at the carriage tended to the dapple giving the mare a brush, and the stagecoach in his seat above the inner cart alredy had the reins in hand.
	 The bearded coach man in black suit topped with a plumed head cap spoke with a familiar fondness to Marshall as he made his way to the carriage. "Mi'lord, you walk as though you are tiresome! Come come, your papers have been checked, please rest while we head home." Said he.
	"Aye, thank you for the concern." Marshall spoke with relief in his voice.
	Blimey! Just how rich is this guy!? Mirnada wondered with an amazement simply for the many interesting turns her day was taking.
	The stablegroom opened the door for the nobleman in the orange cloak and knelt meekly, lowering his face without saying a word.
	Leaning partially into the inner carriage, Marshall lowered Mirnada inside a luxurious interior, and she let go of the man's muscled arm with her own hands tiring. She sat on an small velvet couch with overstuffed cushions and looked out the open carriage door.
	The groomsman looked up off the ground having noticed Marshall trying to sneak someone in to a carriage bound out of town who hadn't had their papers checked. A look of unexpected worry struck his face when he turned to Mirnada. He seemed to have recognized her for who and what she was, and showed even greater fear to Marshall for housing her.
	Oh great! The girl thought to herself. He brought me this far only to slip up now? Mirnada froze still as if movement itself would incriminate her further and awaited on the edge of her seat for half a sign of danger, ready to run.
	"Say, good man," Marshall spoke in a hushed whisper to the horsegroom before he could speak a word of protest. "Keep word of this from your friends for me, aye? If only to help things to stay simple." 
	The man's face was in shock to be talked to by someone considered to be of a much higher class than he, and of something of sneaking someone through the boundries without a permit. "But, my lord, whatever it is you intend to do, if you are found out you may be able to buy your freedom with coin. However, if a lowly slave such as I was found to be involved, I would surely be put to the sword. For my family, I beg your pardon, but I can not-" He cut himself off, the look of unimaginable worry creasing the man's face as he looked up, beseeching Marshall with outstretched hands, pleading.
	"Hmm... Ah, aye, I nearly forgotten." The nobleman in the orange cloak announced just barely loud enough for all in the stables to hear. "Here you are good sir, for your troubles." He pulled a leathern pouch out of his trouser pocket, and firmly placed it into the man's hands, then knelt down in a whisper. "Buy your freedom. This should be enough to take your and your family far away from here."
	The groomsman stared down at the pouch in disbelief, and as he pulled at the cords, the glints of empyreal gold filled his eyes widening with even greater bewilderment. The man stared up at the rich nobleman, gawking in awe with his mouth gaped open at his genorocity. "My thanks to you, kind, noble lord." He said simply as he took the money, calming his nerves as best he could as Marshall ducked through the carriage's tiny doorway.
	Was that not the same coin pouch I swiped from... Mirnada's thoughts trailed off with curiosity at Marshall's cleverness as she watched the large man enter, his broad body nearly filling all the space within the interior. As he sat, taking up the entirity of an overstuffed couch of equal size across from her, the groomsman closed the carriage door and words of readiness passed between coach and grooms.
	"All set then?" A stable groom's voice asked. "Well then, let us open the gates."
	Pressing her face against a transparent screen of black cloth laid against a thatch of wood lattuces, Mirnada stared eagerly out of the carriage's window. The groomsmen pulled at the large metal bars keeping another set of big wooden doors locked. Her eyes nearly popped out of her head when the arched doors opened, revealing a road winding across grassy countryside in the late afternoon sunlight. 
	The carriage jerked and she fell back into the cushions of the couch, and realized for a moment that she was actually in a noble's carriage and was seeing what was outside of the city walls for the first time in her life. What is happening? Where is he taking me? Am I really leaving the city? Really leaving Adem and the gang behind? She looked up at Marshall with a serious look, demanding answers to the questions she just asked herself, but she refused blurt out frivilous questions like a scared child. She stared back curiously through the carriage's window screen letting in the late sun's golden light. Within walls of the empire and its cities were all she had ever seen of the world, and now she saw the huge yellow brick walls from the outside, in awe of how they trailed on and on into a distance. She wondered how much land of the empire was contained within those walls as she took in the landscape of the open country fields as she moved through it in a horse-drawn carriage as if she were a noble. She noticed a long line of mercantile carts and common folk trailing down another long road, all traffic that went in and out of the large metal gates on a daily basis.
	"Ah, out of the city at last." Marshall stated breathily in relief, with a sort of sympathy for the girl he took with him. "We're taking a side route away from the common traffic. Just the open fields and a few small farming villages to pass on the way, then we'll be at my home tonight."
	Taking her eyes off the fields of green grass blowing in the wind, Mirnada met with Marshall's stare, a near smile breaking on his face she once thought made of stone. "An' where is this 'ome y' speak of? Something fancy?" She asked as she imagined a grand castle or a lord's manor on top one of the green hills rolling by.
	"I live in small home among the fishermen townsfolk of a small port town called Jirata. Have you heard of it?" Marshall responded with fondness in his voice. 
	"Nay, I 'aven't." She sighed of the fresh country air, imagining what a seaside town would look like. I am leaving everyone behind, and I don't know if this Marshall could save them all. Could he? He is obviously using some sort of powerful magick, couldn't he just beat up the entire town guard? Or show me how to use magick like him? Could I learn to teach the townsguard a lesson and protect my gang? How are they going to survive without me? A sharp pang of hunger jolted her, and she grabbed her stomach in a hunch. "Ouf... ah wish ah 'ad stol'n someth'n' else to eat t'day..." She moaned as she stared at her dirty feet, holding her belly as it grumbled. 
	"Oh, you must be starved, child." Said Marshall to the girl in filthy boy's clothes, staring up at him with a sudden excited precociousness. "Please, help yourself to what vittles I keep prepared for the journey." He motioned to a small table of lacquered wood built under the windowsill, displaying a silver bowl of assorted fruit, aside to a glass pot of brewed tea with fine ceramic teacups with goldworked rims. 
	The girl blinked, wondering why she didn't notice it before, but supposed the excitement of the adventure she was on let her forget to even look around where she was. She noticed that even behind the foodstuffs a small alcove stuffed with books and a fancy wooden box with a gilt lid tucked within was available as well, which the girl paid no mind to as she grabbed a ripe red apple. This guy must be loaded! He lives like a noble, but he doesn't look or act like any rich folks I've seen before. She sank bite after bite of the crisp apple ravenously, and threw the core on the table, then grabbed an orange and bit at its skin, then peeled it as she chewed the whole apple in her mouth.
	The large man in the vermillion cloak blinked, having never seen any child eat so voraciously, especially a small girl that looked just her skin and bones. "So, hmm..." He paused thoughtfully, and poured himself some red colored tea. "Do you have any parents? Who takes care of you in your, you said, 'gang'?" He asked as he took a sip of tea.
	After taking a moment to swallow her apple, Mirnada responded, "Ah take care o' meself an' I 'elp out th' 'ungry gang. Some old'r thieves use'ta steal e'ery meal fer us, an' then they taught us 'ow t' steal too. M' an' Adem..." The name pained her to speak, but kept her focus. "W' 'ad th' mos' knack fer it. When the old'r thieves got caught one day, I nev'r saw 'em again. M' an' Adem stole along with those in th' gang who 'ad th' mos' practice. By luck, ah never go' caught b'fore." She dropped the ripped off orange peel on the table, and stuffed the fruit in her mouth.
	Marshall seemed prepared to hear the worst of what a young thief would say, nonetheless abashment streaked his stoney face. Watching her starting to pluck a handful of purple grapes, he seemed to weigh her, trying to understand her. "How old are you, lass?"
	Pausing thoughtfully, Mirnada chewed the last of her orange segments with a few grapes. "Lessee," She paused thoughtfully. Me and Adem started to lose our small teeth at about the same time. She pained at the thought of him, but let it pass. The gang gave him an extra apple for his sixth birthday some moons ago, and I think I am a little older than he. "Hmm, Ah'd 'ave t'say six'r sev'n. Bu' ah dun' e'en wha' moon ah was born u'er." She said starting on another apple.
	"Seven?" Marshall asked back in disbelief, shaking his head and dark grey hair down to his shoulders. He reached for the wooden box tucked in the bookshelf, and opened it, looking kindly up on her with his like colored eyes. "A person should never have to steal to survive, especially a young girl." He opened it and took out a long, thin pipe made of black wood. "Do you know your house name, even?"
	"Naw, iuno an'th'." The girl responded with a mouth full of apple, orange and grapes.
	"Try not to speak so much," He opened a small silver square, and flicked a small flame from a spark. "When your mouth is full, child." He took a puff from his pipe, gray-green smoke wisps pulled out the carriage screen. 
	Mirnada gulped and responded, "Ah sayid, ah 'on't kno'. If ah did know what muh full name was ah migh' know 'ho muh ma 'n' pa were. Ah only know mah name is Mirnada an' ah've been called th't since as lon' as ah can reme'ber." She bit again into her apple and continued on. "Ah lived by stealin' e'ery day, i' di'n't worry 'bout a luxury thinkin' 'bout where ah came from." She continued eating, curiously smelling the aroma of Marshall's acrid yet sweet pipe smoke. This man lives like a king! I wonder what goods he has for me once we get back to his home? 
	"You must have made use of your magickal talents from a young age purely out of necessity to steal to survive. Surely you noticed your skill in whatever kept you alive surpassed others; stealing, or escaping." The large man thoughtfully puffed a cloud of smoke out the window and looked at her with that same look of knowing more than what he let on. "You are a descendent of my people, the Jorgard, who live far away from here. I know not how you came about to be in a destitute place as the Tikour slums, but the important thing is that I have saved you from living out such a fate." Marshall said as he idly thumbed the smoldering green in his pipe.
	Biting into another handful of grapes, Mirnada held her gaze curiously on the man puffing his pipe, with red flecked with brown eyes akin to her own. Does he truly know where I might come from? I do not know of Jorgard, that could be anywhere. Or made up for all I know. But he did do away with the townsguard with magick like they were nothing, and says I can do the same thing in order to steal and flee. I wonder if he would tell me about the lands where he is from? Or even how he has made his fortunes? She gave thought to as she chewed. "So, uh, where i' this magickal far awa' Jorgard exac'ly, an' 'ow did'ya become as well off as y' are, uh, Lord Marshall?" The girl asked, but he waved the last of her words away.
	"Please, you do not need to address me as such. Marshall is fine, for now. However, once you begin the strenuous training needed to hone your magicks, you may find it easier to call me Master." He stated, and gave her a look that seemed like he had lots on his mind for her to do.
	Mirnada nearly gulped a juicy bite mid chew, and almost choked just at the shift in look he gave her. Strenuous training? A look of worry swept over her face.
	Pausing for a moment, kindness softened Marshall's eyes, and he leant back, looking down to her fondly with a chuckle as he puffed his pipe. "Well, of course you wish to know where you and I both come from," He thumbed his pipe down and frowned at seeing it contain only ash, then knocked its bowl out the window to empty it to the wind. "Past the Mountains of Fire, and far beyond empyreal reach lies a vast desert that none should ever attempt to cross. That is all that the Empire is aware of, and what is beyond is unmapped and unexplorable, so the emperor dubbed where he could neither cross nor conquer the Forbidden Lands." Marshall stared idly at his empty pipe as he spoke with a calm passion about the land only he knew of that sounded fantastical but real.
	The Forbidden Lands? What kind of place could that be? Mirnada thought as she chewed some segments from another orange, gazing wistfully out the carriage window at the Mountains of Fire in the far distance. She tried to imagine what sort of lands were beyond the tall earthy mountains that stabbed at the sky, surrounding the walls of the empire.
	Marshall opened a small pouch of purple velvet from the wood box and placed a few pinches of green smokestuff into his pipe. "Although I have made the cross through these trials of the Forbidden Lands by myself, it is truly impossible for one man or even a hundred to pass without Jorgard magicks to guide them. I left my home with all the wisdom of my ancestors and the protection of sacred magick, aethermancy gifted from Holy Evaz'Sa herself, passed down through our Jorgard blood." He exchanged the pouch for his silver lighter on the small table and readied it. "What I wish I could know is," He flicked alight his pipe and took a couple of puffs, "How could you, a Jorgard child of about seven, possibly have traveled to Peval?" He looked at her curiously as he savored the fine smokestuff. "Or more likely, were you born here? But then, who could your parents have been?"
	My parents... She could not remember of such a comfort, and shook her head unknowingly as she kept eating.
	The large man shrugged and looked out into the distance, also. "Ah, well." Marshall said as he exhaled his pipesmoke. "I suppose that isn't what is important right now, but us being on the way home is. You will be well taken care of and learn the ways of our people." He paused thoughtfully and stamped out his pipe and continued. "Ah, you wished to know how I made my fortunes once I had crossed the Forbidden Lands? Well," He put his finely lacquered pipe and fine bag of smokestuff back in its box, and tucked it back on the bookshelf. "Among with my travel supplies needed for the journey, I took with me a few gifts of Jorgard to trade with. The fine silver silks made of harvested moonspider webs, and precious gemstones of the highest lustre that grow from crystal trees." He sounded as if he were trying to describe something wonderous that did not exist outside of his secluded homeland. "However, because of how valuable they were, it took an effort to sell once I entered the Peval marketplaces, for I was worn ragged from the journey and had to learn their language before I starved there, myself. But, that is a story for another time." He gave her a knowing smile, a kindness lit up in his red eyes. "Come now, child, enough about me. Is there anything of the world you wish to know about? I have traveled to the many corners of Caelutera and can tell you tales of strange and wondrous things."
	Plucking another grape as she gazed out the window,  Mirnada wistfully watched the sun set along the rolling countryside hills. She gave thought to what could be seen in the world, far beyond anywhere she had ever dreamed of traveling to. "Iuno wot 'ere even i' t' kno' abou'. Wh' don' y' tell m' abou' where've 




	
	what is Jorgard and how are you here and how are you so rich. then the world.
	
	
	



















	








She looked around the detailed and extravagantly decorated cabin. The seats were soft and comfortable, and there were books and fresh hot tea with fruit on a small table within. She had never been in such luxury before and was just in awe the whole time. “A-are you a noble?!” 
Marshall chuckled “Haha, no, no.” he poured himself some tea. 
Then, how can you afford all of this stuff?” Mirnada asked. Her eyes still exploring the cabin, and she started eyeing the pieces of fruit on the table.
 “I’ve trained some of the generals and other high ranking military members in unarmed combat.” said Marshall. He noticed her attentive staring at the food and he nodded to her as if to say “go ahead.”
Mirnada grabbed a piece and began to eat it ravenously, “What is that?” she asked with her mouth full.
It’s an ancient form of fighting without use for a blade. It’s a secret, special training that empowers your body, mind and soul. I learned it in the Forbidden Lands.”
Mirnada choked a little in surprise, “The (cough) forbidden lands?” she swallowed, paused to regain her composure, and then continued eating in the same manner. She began talking again with a full mouth “Hewd yu gatin thur?!”
Don’t speak with food in your mouth.”
Mirnada swallowed “How did you get in there?! The Forbidden  Lands?!”
Actually, it’s where I’m from.”
Mirnada dropped the food out of her hands “What?!”
What caught my eye about you wasn’t your unusually fast speed,” Marshall pointed at her reddish brown eyes “it was your eyes.”
Mirnada looked at him confused “Wot d’ya mean? Wots wrong with ‘em?”
Marshall snickered then pointed as his own, the same color. “I’ve never seen anyone else with these eyes my whole life outside of Jorgard...”
“Jorgard?”
“That’s the city within the forbidden lands. Since no one goes there it’s not a surprise you’ve never heard of it.”
Mirnada thought to herself for a few moments “... To tell the truth, the name sounds kinda familiar.”
Marshall smiled “Imagine my surprise, I left the forbidden lands after I mastered unarmed combat, and I’ve traveled the rest of the world, and not once did I see a single person with these eyes,” He paused and drank some of his tea “Then I see this red-eyed girl running around, evading everyone that dared chase her, officer and merchant alike. I didn’t know what to think. I had wanted to talk to you and at least know how you got here, but every time I saw you, you were always running. This was my last day I’d be spending here and might’ve been the last chance I’d see you... I just wanted to talk with you... so I followed you. Now I’m just curious... How did you get to Pefali? Where are your parents?”
	Mirnada stared blankly out the screen window at the evergreen scenery. “I-... Iuno...”
	Marshall quirked an eyebrow “ ‘Iuno’? ”
	Mirnada sighed “Yeah, I ‘unno... I’ve never really thought about it... My earliest memories are stealin’ food to survive ‘n’ running and hiding every single day. I never really knew anyone... the handful o’ people I did know were thieves as well and they were either killed or had their hands chopped off...”
You remember nothing at all?”
“... No... I’ve lived on the streets all my life... and that’s all I remember.”
“Nothing at all? Not even how old are you?”
Mirnada gave some thought to it, but she had no memory “Iuno... People say I look about seven or eight.”
Marshall thought for a moment “How did you get the name Mirnada?”
Iuno... I’ve never really thought about it... Just always been called it.”
“... I see... What about your surname?”
Mirnada looked at Marshall, puzzled “My wot?”
You know, your last name,” Marshall said, “Mine is Harts.”
	“Oh...” Mirnada searched her mind, but again could not think of anything. “I ain’t a clue... Like I said, I dunno nuffin... I’m sorry to disappoint ya. I never got any learnin’ like the nobles’ kids or anythin.” She stared back out at the moving green scenery. She could see mountains and the sea in the distance, and the faint image of Pefali behind them. “Wot ‘bout you?”
	 “Hmm?”
	“Why did you leave the Forbidden Lands? Jorgard?”
	“Well... I spent the first twenty years of my life training and wondering what the outside world was like. People in Jorgard are very xenophobic and look down on outsiders.”
	“Xeno... wot-ic?”
	“They are afraid of the outside world. The civilization has been isolated for aeons... But I simply wished to travel. When I left, I’ve visited the Northlands, Ijia, Lux Grande and of course, Pefali. I live in Jirata though... It’s a nice, quiet town, and in return for me being their protector, they treat me well.”
“It must be a damn rich village what to afford all of THIS.”
Marshall shook his head “Oh, no... This I bought with payment I received from Pefali for training their high ranking knights.”
Oh, right. Pefali has always had a lot of money to throw around, but never help their people...” Mirnada grumbled.
	“I am not too much fond of their ethics either, so I stopped training them. They of course didn’t like that one bit, but eventually they gave up trying to capture me for treason.” Marshall nonchalantly cracked his knuckles. “Now they just pretend like I don’t exist.”
“Heh...” smirked Mirnada.
Marshall smiled at Mirnada, “You should take a nap and rest up; we’re getting up early tomorrow.”
“For wot?”
	“You have a lot of potential, Mirnada. You are fast and strong... and you are of Jorgard... our kind possess these traits as well as magick powers. You see, our people are most in tune with the earth and nature and our magick is different than the rest of the world’s. That’s why I held back on my training with the Pefali knights. I never taught them the most advanced techniques because it implores both physical strength and Jorgard magick. And, I know that if I trained you, you could master it.”
	“Wot you mean, I can use magick?! And I’m ‘upposed to be some sort of super strong jus’ ‘cuz me eyes are red?”
	“Mirnada, I think I should tell you about Jorgard’s people. We are... how should I put this... We are blessed by the gods.”
	“Wot do you mean? Why?”
	“The other civilizations... They have all sinned at one time or another and the gods have punished them for that.”
	“They sinned? How?”
	“Pefali’s bloodlust, they were punished for attacking and invading helpless surrounding countries. 
Ijia used to be two tribes that fought each other constantly, resorting to detestable extremities. They were punished and then realized their mistakes, and united into one kingdom under the rule of the late King Oran. 
Desye, the fallen kingdom in the Northlands, they died out because they spent all of their resources building a tower to use as an offering to the gods, and they expected a lot in return from them. This angered the gods, and they were punished for their greed. 
And Lux Grande, the capital of the world and home of the Pontiff Herself... well, no one knows why they were punished, but they did something that had angered the gods tremendously. They had a virulent pox that wiped out nearly half the population. The plague has subsided though, so its safe to travel there now.”
Mirnada nodded “... I see.”
“I’m sorry... I guess that was a lot for you to absorb.”
Mirnada slumped in her seat “It was interestin’... But I’m already a might sleepy...”
“It’s alright, you’ve had quite a day. Please, get some rest. We should arrive in Jirata in a few hours”
Mirnada stared out at the dusky sky as it faded into a dark tourmaline color. She closed her eyes and rested her head, then drifted to sleep.







bam



Mirnada origin story in Peval, Dream transitioned from Mirnada sleep to Diame dream, to her awake.

DAY 2 - Morning
Diame had dream, is getting ready. She has a bad feeling and wants to not take Shul up on his offer to take her the rest of the way to Ijia. He persists because of Igor's orders, and she accepts, heartened she must show more gratitude to the poor man, and afraid for the vision she had seen, but reasons she would be safer with someone else than by herself. Shul leads her to be kidnapped later. Ending scene with Xavier readying his knights to enter the Forest to scout for bandits in the countryside said to hide here. Other rumons of kidnapping are not related to these bandits, but are connected to the guys involved with Diame's kidnapping. She escapes kidnapping using forest mist and mercury bubbles.

DAY 2 - Soonly After
Tavian's scene ending, the to escape to forest scene happens, then new scene here continuing him to his 4th chapter. He ran until dawn when he found a lake to rest by, he panted and drank water, then rested a short while until the air and water was warm enough to bathe blood off of in. He is somewhat cleaner, and has to get to a town for some food and avoid being seen by authorities and people searching for him. He finds Jirata and slays wanted pirates and meets up with Mirnada, they go to Ijia by acquired boat.

DAY 2 - Late morning
Diame ran deep into the forest to escape, but knows not where she is. Suspenese with scene lost by herself, then faery scene to direct her the right way then by herself again, then she is suddenly abushed by bandits, then saved by Xavier and the Sky Saints.

DAY 2 - near evening
Diame sees the bishop who dismisses her without hearing a word. She goes to get permission to see Queen Senna, is denied, and has a chance encounter with her anyway. 
NIGHT 2 - Saves her life that night and gains trust.

Note: Diame has a realization that because malbourne would not hear her plea but Senna would, and now she is on her way, at some point she realizes that now that the Queen can give her access to go to the tower in her vision, that then that is what she must do. God is constantly arranging things into her favor, so this opportunity must be as well, simply because she believes it is.

Small scene with Tavian steering the ship at night, thoughts of returning to Ijia.


She stops at the signs trying to remember which one it is, he comes beside her and stops, trying to get her to come aboard, she politely refuses. He tries to dissuade her from taking the side route, that she wouldn't need to tire herself and it would take just as long. 
While he's trying to convince her "Its just me and ol' betsy" he pats the mule on the rump, and the mule farts. he ignores it, Diame tries to, and only wants to go on her own way. 
People trying to trick you from doing what you want to do will always have something that stinks about the deal, that lingers in your consciousness about them. Even if it seems that the person means well, if they are up to something, it makes all their words have 'the reek of lies drawing flies'.
Trying to make clear. Diame has a path. Its HERS. It doesnt matter what Shul says if her path isn't as good as his by cart, thats because the man just slept in his cart! He is a mule driver and she is not! He will drag her down to her level, and people who travel the same path but accept others help does not make them independant of their own free will. Diame's free will is GOD GIVEN AND POWERFUL, and the fact that she doesnt know that and will freely give it away (go with shul) when she has the power on her own (go the path she has decided.)

She goes with him just to be saved by the divine intervention, which is escape by her magic, then rescue by Xavier being at the right place at the right time.

If she did go her own path, perhaps she may never had met Xavier at all, but Diame, for all her main characterness, is not that independantly minded, even though she just convinced herself what she has seen is important, her path can still be diverted, by Shul, or even by her own doubt later. The importance of Xavier and friends is showing her that truly, one needs a lot of support to believe they can go all the way. Everyone has self doubt. When people choose to believe they are right, they stay on a path. When they are in self doubt, you stay true to yourself and what you have seen, AND KNOW THAT where you are, when you doubt and think of WHY AM I HERE, literally in that place you stand or sit, you are thinking of your path, the most sacredest God given thing, the free will to decide a direction. Diame is so important and doesnt even know it, and her self doubt is her weakness.

Diame may be free of all self doubt at the end when she witnesses her vision in action by Ozwyn. "I know now why i left my home and made this path, because i believed in a furture different than this one! that it could change! if i never left it would end up this way anyway, but now that i made it all the way here, through so much HARDSHIPS, TRYING to do something about it, I CAN NOW TRY!"



	
Reubin's Story:
Battling in an arena, the final warrior, a hard set of green eyes.
A beautiful faced woman emerged from the darkness, the face beguiles Reubin, even though he can clearly see the murder in her eyes. He has difficulty fighting her and the battle is a farce, they are both dishonored and kicked out.
She is furious he dishonors her, but he fell in love with the ferocity in her eyes, he explains to her. She can not stand the sight of him and says "I gave you that look in battle only because no one is supposed to live afterwords." 
Whatever battle charm she used left the fool Reubin still in love with her, even after the battle ended. Maybe a bit of Sylvius / Phoebe?




















		IV.2 Leaving the Roost

ADRIFT IN A CLOUD spun of wayward dreamstuff, Diame felt the free floating weightlessness of an ocean around her. Mirages in her slumber tried to take shape within what looked like a dense fog unlit by the sun, and whatever oddities she could see in the murk she already unquestioned as reality. The sound of clopping horse hooves slowly turned her attentions, and a shape of a large animal finished galloping into a cloud, the stir of the fog and fluff around the area was all that remained. At the sight of nothing out of the ordinary, Diame rolled over in a suspended spin, rolling in her lengths of red hair and floating folds of her shift drifted in suspense through the sea of dense fog.
A sharp harking called Diame's attentions and the dreaming priestess gazed upwards in a loll, and witnessed a bird made of mist dive down from a bright white sky and disappear into the dark plumage of clouds, its cry lasting as an echo into the foggy void. Such a sight she, too, regarded it as any other thing in her dream, and it passed her throughts just the same. She muttered something about time and yawned.
The fog thickened and a sudden oncoming darkness cast over the sea of clouds. Diame thought it must have blocked out the sun, but she did not recall seeing in the first place, so did not question the change of scenery as she couldn't quite remember where she was either way. Back into her half awake state she returned.
A pitch blackness took away the vision of the clouds, and what little light there was faintly illuminated an arms reach around Diame's weightless body. She felt somewhat thankful that when wherever she was became darker it allowed one to better sleep, but didn't know why she was glowing so bothersomely. As she shrugged that off as well in her thoughts, she tried to resume resting, only to stirr once more, vexed at the sound of a distant hissing noise. 
Searching for the source of the sound in the unseeable darkness, there seemed to be two points somehow darker than all the rest, slanking side to side. Diame could feel some sort of chill, as if it were a creature gazing up on her, but she could not see what would have eyes blacker than black, growing larger with each movement. 
Something about Diame's dream disturbed her, and she tried to give thought to what it possibly could have been. Puzzled, she stared silently at the thing approaching her, slowing coming to the conclusion that wherever she was floating, it may not be as safe as she once thought. Shuddering again from a chill, she knew she felt the presence of some sort of creature, even though she could not see what the darker than dark thing was, approaching her from the sea of thick mist.
Diame thoughts spun to try to give reason to what was happening around her, but her mind felt slow and sluggish, as if she were in a daze she couldn't awaken from.
Flashes of lightning fulminated from the two points of darkness, crackles of blue light lit up the sea of mist around her and beyond. Whatever the two points of darkness were, they stayed as dull shadows wrapped in the thick clouds lit by lightning flashes, and Diame chilled when the storm headed towards her.
 The priestess determined she was faced with some sort of fearful vision and she tried to call out to God for protection, but her fear turned to terror when she could not inhale to shout out. She willed her voice and to her horror, not a sound escaped her, she twisted as she floated mid air in the mist. The roar of thunder tore all around her, and she was engulfed in flashes of searing hot blue light.

"Evaz'sa watch over me!" Diame shouted as she sprang upright, widened blue eyes staring up through the bed canopy at the mural of God in the sky painted on the ceiling. Her panting breaths calmed as she gazed up to the image of the Goddess of the Sun, wings spread in golden sunlight surrounded by Angels. She gulped at air, "A dream..." she exhaled breathlessly. "'Twas only a dream." She assured herself as much that it wasn't reality, and in the haste of her waking moments, the High Priestess of Water set aside the thought that it could be yet another vision foreboding of something ill to come. 
Remembering where she was, she took in the room of the inn she was staying at, dimly lit by several candles. Most of the wicks on the chandeleir up above were shortened and still lit, as were the candles on the nightstands beside her. The large wax candle of the woman holding the urn had burnt down such that the flame was where the head would be, and the hands had melted off into two held up stumps for arms. 
"Oh, I suppose I am awake enough." Diame judged as much even with how groggy she felt, but nonetheless she was refreshed. "I need to be back on the road, I-" She pulled the covers off her and realized her hands trembled, and clasped them together. She felt alert but as by something startling her out of her sleep, though she could not recall what, which disturbed her. I must make haste, that is all I can do. There certainly isn't any going back. 
The priestess put her bare feet out into the cool air on to a soft carpet, and saw the sky still dark outside the large windows. Perhaps to anyone else they would not notice the sun was about to rise, the pitch black sky could have easily been mistaken for the deepest part of the night. However, years of waking up before dawn had trained her senses to the subtle rises of moisture in the air, the crisp way plants smell in the coldest part of the predawn, the chattering of early birds. She also knew her senses were experiencing strange sensations, delving deeper than any normal person could. She felt as though she were outside in the deep forest, breathing in cool air from an enormous fog bank, rolled down from the surrounding mountains in the night. She tried to stop herself from thinking anymore of it when she realized she somehow knew the way the cloud had traveled, as if she had the memory of seeing it herself.
Becoming aware she could uncontrollably sense all the water in the air, she began a mantra. "I am complete control of my magicks..." Diame prayed quietly to herself, aware she still had not performed any of her cloister rituals, not releasing any of the water aether she carried with her. I have come thus far on what I had set out to do. If I can not show I am capable of handling these powers, how can I prove any of what I have seen has merit to Bishop Malbourne? But he has to believe me, must he not?! A pang of worry struck over her, and she shook it off and repeated, "I am in complete control of my," 
A knock at the door followed by a concerned whisper interrupted her, "Did you summons, mi'lady? May I enter?" The door cracked and the young serving girl in plain livery and dark hair pulled back into a braid stood into the candle light.
Straightening her shift as she sat upright in bed, Diame cleared her throat, nearly forgetting the inn's staff was waiting on her. "Aye, come in, please." She spoke, trying to sound pleasant as she calmed her nerves, still shaken from the wakening jolt of her nightmare.
The maid entered carrying a ceramic pitcher of washwater and in one arm and bowl in another with a cloth draped over her arm, "Good morrow, mi'lady." She said as cheerful as she could be, probably having worked through the night. "Did you rest well?" she said as she placed the washstuff and pitcher of steaming water on the table next to the wax candle of the melting woman and turned round to meet her.
	Diame met her with a tired nod, "Aye, thank you." She said, nearly stifling a yawn.
	"Well, mi'lady, you said you would be up early to resume your travels, so I brought fresh washstuff and I shall return with a hot breakfast the Roost has prepared for you. If that will be all, so please you?" She curtsied before her and seemed to await Diame's assent to leave.
Alright, I haven't the time to waste. I shall prepare quickly and then I must make haste. "Aye, thank you." 
The moment it was said, the maid deepened her courtsy and then turned round, briskly leaving out the door she came in from. 
Diame gave pause, knowing that being brought here to this sort of service was not just good fortune on the road. Such safety and luxuries were arranged under God's watchful eyes, and whatever dreadful dream I had awoke me to ensure I get to where I need to be swiftly. She nodded, reminded of her resolve. "I have already traveled much farther than I would have thus far, I can arrive in Ijia on my own by the end of the day, I think." She assured herself as she stepped out of bed to the washstuff and sat on a cushioned chair by the table side.
She gave her face a wash with the cloth and hot water, and felt revived out of drowsiness, and remarked on how she never had enjoyed such things prepared for her. No sooner than when she finished drying herself did the maid enter once more with a covered silver plate. She revealed a plate of two overturned eggs, a thick slab of cured bacon, a buttered roll of freshly baked home bread, and a bowl of apples and pears cut into bite sized pieces topped with sweet cinnamon.
Diame had not eaten a breakfast so hearty in a long while, used to eating only produce harvested from Teva's farms, but she did not complain as she savored what she could as she ate in a hurry. The maid brushed off what dirt had collected on Diame's blue robes, and helped her get dressed in them as fastly as possible while telling her of the best routes through the forest to Ijia. She then aided the High Priestess shoulder her satchel and even handed her her driftwood walking staff, never taking her for anything else than a traveling noblewoman.
 Diame thanked the maid profusely for all her attentive services, even whilst she made her way swiftly down the inn's hallway and descended the stairs to the small lobby, the maid was at her heels, asking over and over if there was anything else that she needed.
Once again, Diame kindly assured the maid that she had everything she needed to get to Ijia, and before she could thank her again, she noticed the middle aged lady in the green dress looking up at her from behind the desk counter. Weariness showed through the smile she wore as she held a pen to one of many scattered recipts and ledgers about her, yet she gave a gracious nod to the traveler who paid to stay in the nicest room, and Diame returned it. 
The maid went to open up a large oaken door that lead out to the forest, it seemed to be the main entrance to the Inn's lobby. No sooner than when the big door opened did plumes of cold mist spill onto the lobby floor and dissipated. Diame pushed the volumes of red curls behind her circlet and tucked her hair in the back of her blue robes, then donned her hood to stay warm, even though the cold couldn't bother her. She gave the young girl another nod for her services, and stepped out the inn's door out into the brisk forest air, faintly lit blue by approaching dawn.

Diame descended down a step onto a covered porch area, a pair of lanterns hung from the roof above another step, their dim light cast on her as she passing them by. She stepped onto the soft forest soil, and with walking staff in hand, the High Priestess trod down a worn path and through the heavy fog that brightened as dawn came up on her. 
Nearing a small covered stables, the path seemed to split just past it, accompanied by a signpost pointing in several directions. She remembered what the maid had told her, that the road splits as many travel deeper into the forest or even into the mountains. Most importantly, that the quickest route to Ijia was not even the large main one, for it made many bends to better serve outposts and cart traffic, and that a side route was shorter and better known by lone travelers. It would have fewer turns and lead directly out into the open fields, the lands before the Kingdom of Ijia. Just a little further, I must ensure His Holiness hears of my fears, once I tell him my dreams straight to his ear. She reminded herself that she was less than a days' walk away now, and was happy to know her journey was nearing an end.
The priestess took a deep breath of the forest air, the crisp scent of pine and maple trees cooled by mist filled her lungs, and felt refreshing under her thick blue robes. Content traveling down the dirt path with no one beside her and being awake before dawn, she felt as though it was any other day begun as usual, the lone walk reminding her of going to the Water Temple for morning prayers. She felt at ease, and kept her focus on walking just the little ways more, grateful for what good fortunes she had had thus far on what she set out to do. By how safely and swiftly she had traveled, Diame was heartened to believe that God was directly watching over her journey, guiding her on the path the Priestess began by correctly interpreting her sacred swevens.
Diame took in a crescendo of the birds chirping as the forest came alive by the brightness of dawn, and even the pathway became easier to see in the brisk fog. She took a deep sigh, and caught a scent of horsestalls as she continued past the covered stables, a shabby building made of weathered wood that seemed to barely stay held together. Even so, it housed a line of horses in a row, each covered head to tail with horse blankets, and they were barely astir with their eyes covered. She felt sorry for the creatures, having to sleep out in the cold barely covered, and felt content to own the warmth in her boots. 
As the signpost and many splitting paths ahead revealed themselves in the fog, Diame thought of the way she was told to get through the forest. Let's see, the kind maid said Burrows Pass would be the best route through. I do hope I do not lose my way, but I have come thus far on God's good fortunes, and I believe Her Eyes will watch over my path. She reminded herself happily. And with Ijia just at the end of a day's walk, what could possibly mar my way?
A sudden whinnying came from the last stall made Diame jump and raise her arm in defense as she passed it by, but she was relieved that it was just a lanky mule, covered in a horse blanket that seemed to be all but holes and patches. Before she could feel bad for startling the animal, she heard a rustling just past the stable walls.
Around the corner, a tattered blanket flung up from amidst a cart full of cargo boxes and bags, and there Shul was, sitting up, bewildered, and still in the ragged riding clothes that he wore yesterday. The man seemed to have slept the night in his cart on a small pallet, and he awoke in a daze up on hearing the mewling of his mule. He then noticed Diame was standing over him, and his face split wide with surprise. "Oh, Lady Delandra! Er-, a good morro'!" He nearly leapt out onto the forest floor by how quickly he scrambled out of his cart, and as soon as he was on his feet, he dropped to a bow before her, his straw hat to his heart. 
Diame tried to greet the man who had helped her travel here the day before, but for a moment it seemed impossible to work the words. She realized her hand was shaking, and leant on her staff with all her weight to ground herself. Perhaps the mule frightened me more than I expected. Please get ahold of yourself woman, it was merely a harmless animal. She shook off her shaken nerves with the thought, and at last gave the man a polite nod. "A good morrow to you as well, kind Master Shul. Eyes watch over you this fine morn." She said, returning a smile and trying not to feel so put off guard.
"Ah was hopin' so much, uh, that ah might cross yer path, to aid yeh on yer way to the kingdom, ah was!" His gap toothed smile and demeaner were jovial and lively even though he seemed to had just awoken. "Aye, such a consid'rate soul is this man ah waited fer yer ladyship to see ye arrive safely, ah did!" He said as he began ropes from the cart and walked towards her. "M' pardons, mi'lady," He said as he passed her by with a bow of his head, and with a squeak of rusty hinges, led his mule out from the ramshackle horsestalls. "Ah jus' need to get ol' Betsy awake an' leadin' th' cart, hold just a minute, and we'll be off." He assured her as he took off the horseblanket, and hurriedly added "Aye, if ye would be so kind, Your Ladyship? Thank ye." And began girdling Betsy in a haste.
"Oh, sir, you are too kind. I do not know if that would be right." I couldn't possibly ask him to help again, yet he went out of his way to wait for me? Diame shook her head of red curls under her blue hood, "Nay sir, to ask another favor of you after all you have done already would surely be considered a sin. I do not mean to be rude, but I believe my legs will bring me to Ijia on my own, thank you." She nodded to him, "I bid you a good day, Master Shul. May Eyes watch over you." And with a smile of good cheer, went on towards the signposts. I do hope he wasn't waiting here for me long, it is quite cold in the wee hours of the morning for one not atuned to Water. A thought trailed off as she went on her way. "Now, lets see, Burrow's Pass..."
	The man made a sudden yelping sound as if he were choking on something. "Er, wait, um, please, Lady Delandra, I, uh..." Shul seemed to want to say something, but Diame had already passed him by.
	Looking back over her shoulder, Diame saw a look of worry on Shul's face, and then his mouth split with his wide gap-toothed smile and started after her. Oh, God help me. What could the man be thinking? "C-can I aid you, Master Shul?"
	The man was walking towards her reluctantly, but surely, "Well," Shul took off his straw hat, and pensively scrubbed his fingers through graying hair. "Ah was jus' figurin', uh..." He nodded to himself as he stopped just before Diame, and said calmly, "That is, if w' were both 'eaded to th' kingdom proper, uh... I would be savin' you th' trouble of walkin'. Its still ways away, mi'lady, I thought surely you'd ride with me once more." He redonned his hat and gave a sigh of mild frustration, and stammering to find convincing words.
	To have such an offer refused must have seemed illogical to the man, Diame noted Shul seemed somewhat apprehensive to the idea of her not riding along. Well, I don't mean to insult his kindness, but I'm sure I will be an inconvenience to the poor man, besides. "Beg your pardons, sir." Her fair hand pointed behind him, "It seems as though I may as well be on my way, as it seems your ass needs minding."
	Shul's eyes sprang wide with confusion, "Me arse?" He then looked around, and continued the motion with a spin when he saw that Betsy had wandered from her stables, and slowly venturing on a way off into the forest. "Saints! Me ass!" and ran back towards his mule gone astray.
	"Poor fellow, I do wish him well, and hope to abstain from bothering him anymore than I already have." And with that, Diame came up on the old signpost, intaking a carved crow adorning it that nearly looked real. She could try to make out the carvings made in the arrows pointing in the ways the path split past many steep gradings and thick vegatation. Some of the roads were wide, but the shortcut she would take was supposed to be a direct route off the beaten path. "Let's see," The carvings in the wood were faint, yet seemed to have been tended to time to time. 
	Though she hadn't the time to idle, the disguised priestess couldn't help but look over her shoulder, and Shul was indeed bridling the mule to the cart in a visible haste. He leapt into the cart, scrambled into his drivers seat, then even waved to her assuredly with a grin! He tapped at the mule's reins to motion a trot, but the creature did not budge, then after a couple more tries, the man leapt out of the cart once again, produced a pole that once affixed, protruded from the front of the cart. He hurriedly began tying a red apple to hang before the mule, and the animal started walking even without him in the cart, nearly trampling him with it if he hadn't already jumped back in his seat in time.
	"Burrow's Pass," Reminding herself, Diame returned her attentions to the signpost, and scanned the names that pointed in many directions out of the Crow's Forest. "Forestglenn Road seems to be the name for the main road, and many small paths seem to branch off in many ways... Ah! Burrows pass is just a small walk down the main road from here. God's good fortunes smile up on me indeed." The sounds of hooves trotting and wheels winding turned the priestess's attentions, and Shul was nearly up on her as he sat in his cart gesturing towards her assuredly, in tow by Betsy, in tow by the apple. "Yet, why does this man pursue me so, even after I have said I wish to go my own way?" She couldn't help but return the wave back at him, then brought her hand to her face and wondered. But, what if God had sent this kind soul to guide me, and certainly I may lose my way. Maybe that is why he feels the need to help me so? Yet, if this man is not of God... She paused as he approached her, taking in the good cheer of his gap toothed grin. Mayhaps I should go on my own after all?
	"Ah, the virtue o' patience shines in ye, Lady Delandra," He gently pulled at the reins of the cart, and the doleful eyed donkey slowed to a halt. "Thank ye for waitin' for me t'get me ass bridled." Shul's grin widened and kindness squinted his eyes. "Aye, then, let us b' off. I promise we'll be in Ijia b'fore sundown." He assured her, and began pulling at the rope that opened the hatch in the back for her. 
	"But," Diame muttered mostly to herself. I was looking forward to taking the helpful advice the maid gave me, she is a local after all. There the familiar crated seat was, the same against the somewhat comfortable sack of lumps she had dozed on for so long yesterday. However, he said he would take me straight there, obviously that would be safest and least tiresome, so why do I hesitate to go with him? Am I acting like a foolish girl? 
	"Erm, wha' 'tis the matter, Lady Delandra?" Perhaps he noticed a pique of worry coming from her, for he tried to assure her by motioning to the mule. "'Tis jus' me and ol' Betsy as b'fore." He turned to pat her on the rump, to which the animal replied with a sound release of air to the man's face. 
	The priestess blinked.
	"Erm," He chuckled, surprised. "Ol' girl." He pat the animal again once more, and continued on. "Anyroad, let us be off now and we shall be at the kingdom fairly quickly, erm, by your as'ent, Mi'Lady."
	Diame thought on it once more, she was fully rested and had looked forward to the walk alone with her own thoughts. She was a High Priestess carrying around a message of importance to the Church to protect them as well as her village, even that meant the duplicity of not even telling anyone where she had ran off to, and even swore little Sindha to secracy. 
	However, one advantage she could think of is that when she was in solitude, she no longer had to keep up this 'noblewoman Delandra on a pilgrimage' charade for anyone. But for the life of her, could not make up her mind which way she would go, and yet she knew she stood there losing time, which was worse than going any route. Diame grew severely impatient with herself, and looked skyward through the thatches of leaves. Mist hung brightly on the boughs of the trees as the sun began to rise higher above the surrounding mountains. It was a new day and she felt she was where she was supposed to be. I suppose if God wills me to be where needed, a bevy of opportunities would present themselves. I suppose good company is better than without, so I could pretend to be Delandra a little longer, I suppose. I do believe I should trust Master Shul as he is wise traveler, and certainly knows his way through the woods better than I. Though I yet feel like I'm taking advantage of his kindness, I know it is a long journey ahead. Indeed, I had just climbed down a mountain yesterday and got a full nights rest, but what if I must need my strength to climb a mountain? "But, of course, good sir. I do not know these woods at all, I certainly wouldn't want to lose my way. You certainly would save me another long walk." Although she could recall the simple instructions to take Burrows Pass, and could clearly see it written on the sign before her, and was not even sure how arduous the road alone would have been, she tossed in her satchel and driftwood staff and jumped in over the hatchback herself.
	The gap toothed man nearly stumbled over his words with breathless exasperation, he seemed to have politely had a whole nother list of reasons why Diame should ride with him, but the worry melted off his face as he drew a deep breath. "Phew! I er, mean, well then!" Shul let out a nervous chuckle in good spirit and hopped himself back in the mule driver's seat. "Let us be off, w' should arrive in the kingdom proper before nightfall." He pulled the hatch closed by the rope up front and gave the lone traveler a nod from under his had. "Jus' enjoy the ride mi'lady. We'll be there b'fore you know it." His grimy lips smiled around his rotten teeth, and he turned his attentions back to Betsy.
	As the man prepared another red apple on a string to coax the animal, Diame continued to assure herself that she was on the right path. "How long until we make it to Ijia did you say again?" She idly inquired to strike up a conversation with the man she was about to chat with once more. I do hope I make it there faster by taking this cart. A shortcut couldn't have been that much shorter, right? She tried to peer through the misty road ahead as if she could see beyond the bends and surrounding trees.
	"Oh, well bee'fore sundown, aye." The mule driver stated in good morning cheer as he gave Betsy a tap with the reins, and with a light jerk, the cart was wheeling forward in motion. "You jus' not worry 'bout a thing, mi'lady. You know, did I ev'r tell you more about me wife?" Shul glanced over his shoulder with a crooked smile. "You do so remind me o' her. Err, um, but not nowadays," He turned his attentions back to steering the mule around the winding road, "years ago when w' firs' met, she was fair an' comely as y' are now, miss. I do love 'er but alas 'ow she has wizen'd and broaden'd an'-" he cut himself off and lowered his head between his shoulders, "Oh I mistake meself, please beg pardons, mi'lady. I jus' 'ave a commoners tongue, y'see."
	He spoke and Diame heard him, but her mind thought not of a response. But, what if the pass was shorter? She weighed heavily. No, fool girl. You are already on a cart going where you need to be going. Surely if I was walking around a haphazard shortcut I could get terribly lost, or what if I stumbled on the uneven road and sprain my ankle? By and by the misty cospses of pineneedle trees went by her as she was well on her way to Ijia as the cart swifty carried her down the bumpy forest path. Nay, I daresay that this is the safer route. Surely, these nagging thoughts are just part of the restlessness on my mind of knowing what I must do. She sat back stiffly against a sack of apples as Shul chatted his mind as he steadily drove the mule on. The priestess of water heaved a sigh of relief that she neared Ijia, her intents she clear in her mind. What I have seen was shown to me very clearly from the Holy Messiah herself. So big is this message, yet, I know that only I was entrusted to me to relay its importance. She reminded herself, mustering up the nerve ahead of time to speak with a bishop face to face, to explain not only her dreams but a myriad of other things. Her breaking the sacred oath to even be outside of her home being one of them. "Eljuk..." she muttered, thinking of the townguardsman and her friend. Diame nearly felt ill recalling how she snuck around him, and left her confidant in the dark of her actions. I am doing what I must. Eljuk would understand... wouldn't he...? Surely, he would and I have always given him my full trust. Her thoughts wandered once more.
	"Anyhow, me wife an' I," Shul carried on, "We nev'r 'ad any children, y'see. Jus' as well, me work keeps me mighty busy, I wouldn't see them if I was always on the road, aye? But who needs kids when I 'ave Betsy, 'ere." He chuckled and the mule seemed to whicker in response. Around another bend in the road the animal took them, through the morning fog as thick as ever. 
	Although lost in thought, Diame looked around the dense forest as it passed her by. Would Bishop Malbourne be as understanding? She wondered. He is a a man of the Faith, surely his faith will convince him to take action, just as mine has compelled me to do so. Won't it? She sighed and took in the early morning atmosphere, the sun was a bright glow above the moving trees and mist. 
	An opening in one of the cospses revealed what seemed to be an off-road, it seemed to be a straight line even though it had rough unevenness to it. Squinting her glassy blue eyes, she peered down the misty side road, a tiny sign stuck in the road reading Boroughs' Pass, plain as day. Her thoughts indeed took pause, and all she could focus on was the side path. The advice the maid servent gave to her that it was indeed the shortest path resounded in her head, but she shut the thought out, that was before she knew she would get another ride from Shul. Surely this path was the shorter one, and face less peril. Yet all the while, she still felt the need to call out to the mule driver and ask him to halt the cart. All the while she thought, she had passed the supposed shortcut by, and already the cart had made its way past another cospe of trees, and it had all but disappeared from sight while she made up her mind.
	Diame had leant all the way forward and bent her neck as she caught the last gimpse of the sign disappear into the trees and fog. "Too late now, I suppose..." she said under her breath. The thought crossed her mind that she could still refuse the man's kind offer, leap up out of the cart, and swiftly though this shortcut like she had in her mind. "Aye, far too late, now." She leant back with a sigh, as though relieved the descision was made for her. I must trust that there are many paths that lead to where God asks of me. I do hope I arrive in Ijia soon, after I have words with His Holiness, I must return to Teva with an even greater haste. She let out a sigh realizing she had been holding her breath for nearly a full minute.
	Listening to Shul talk on of his wife and occupation as Lord Igor's delivery driver, the Priestess rode along in the cart without any qualms on her descision. Her feet did ache so from her travels yesterday, and now she rode along with only her mission on her mind. Diame reminded herself the urgency of what she had seen, and would arrive fully prepared to explain to The Church why she was there. Yet she also had questions of her own. Such as, why hadn't she recieved any word at all from them? Not a single reply to her letters, even when she persisted them so? Had something happened to them? 
	Shaking off her worry, Diame took a deep breath of the forest air thick with the smell of maples and pines. Without effort, she could see all the wisps of water in the air, and sensed the vastness of the forest by feeling where every dew drop on every leaf rested. It put her at ease, and she calmly mulled over her thoughts as the shakey cart took her down the winding road to the Kingdom of Ijia.





















		IV.3 Quicken the Road

THE MORNING HOURS had marched by Diame without her noticing too closely, and she watched the forest scenery change in the early light. She felt as though she was still very much deep within the forest, and went over what she might say to the Bishop when she arrived in Ijia. She had also enjoyed the company of Shul, who had talked with barely a pause, skipping though topics on everything he could think of to make conversation about. He was now on the subject of fishing, and talked about the many different ways gutted innards could be reused. She could barely hear him with all that was going on in her mind, and the High Priestess patiently held on to her anticipation to hear from Shul when they were nearby Ijia. The thought that perhaps they were closeby and he simply forgot to tell her crossed her mind, and she continued sitting at ease in the bumpy cart.
The rising sun steadily shed light down through the canopy of the forest, and all around her, nature was alive and awake with birdsong among trees and wild game rusting among bushes in the distance. She took a sip from her water flask and uttered a silent prayer to the life which God had created.  
Diame placed the flask back in her bag and caught sight of her map. She had no idea to know where she was, and reminded of such, decided to inquire on to whereabouts she was in closeness to Ijia. 
"... Aye, 'tis true, you can fry up jus' about everythin' you gut from an animal mi'lady, but 'tis nigh impossible to compare to a real treat, me own wife's fishgut stew." 
"Master Shul?" Diame interjected.
"Perhaps, you'll come 'ave dinner with us one night an' try- uhn?" The mule driver paused his thoughts for the first time in hours. "Aye, what is it, mi'lady?" He responded without missing a beat, his cheer as strong as ever.
"Well, I was just wondering," She scanned the thick forest around her again and couldnt begin to sense where it ended. "but when would we arrive in Ijia? Surely we are almost there?" Being in the middle of nowhere, Diame indeed needed some assurance, there was just the one path, and hardly any other passers by on the road. But of course she trusted Shul knew what he was doing.
Shul grunted seemingly to give it some thought, and turned over his shoulder and smiled a gap toothed grin at her. "Lessee, I'd say another hour we may be out of Crow's Forest, perhaps even sooner." He turned his attentions back to steering his mule and leant forward to look into the distance. "Ijia is farther north still, but 'tis faster traveling in the wide open roads. Ye should reach it before sundown I reckon." He gave an assuring tilt of his hat to her. "Hmm, aye I do believe that is so. Worry not, Mistress Delandra. I 'ave traveled these roads hundreds, if not thousands of times, I 'ave!" He grinned once more and tapped the reins of his mule to help keep up her step. 
 Looking at the moving scenery around her, the surrounding trees stretched on in every direction, and as far as she could see, disappearing into the thick mist. Trying to sense where the forest might end with her attunement with water, Diame couldnt see where the fog might end. She could feel the chill of the forest stretch on and on, and pulled her hooded robe tigher around her even though the cold phased her not. "Well then, I have naught to worry about." she assured herself. I do wish we would arrive there faster. I'm sure he knows what he is doing, but that maid lass said even by foot I'd be out of the forest by late morn. Yet it seems it may be near high noon already? There was no way to know where she was, and an effort to try on foot now would surely be in vain. She knew she had to stay fast, and trust that this was another test of her faith. Shul had come along to help her, and she was going to allow him to do that. "Everything will be all right, I suppose." She smiled to herself and looked down the road, seeing a hooded figure jump out from a shrub. Her smile turned sour as she gasped, half the life startled out of her.
"Whoa!" Shul yelled to calm Betsy as the surprised beast whinnied and flailed in fear. "Calm down, easy girl!" He pulled on the reins and in short time the beast did calm itself and became docile. 
The brutal looking man stood tall with his arms crossed just ahead of them in filthy clothes with his face completely darked by a hood. 
Diame leant forward and hid over master Shul's shoulder and whispered to him, "What does he want? Is he a robber?!" She leant over him and before she knew it, she was shouting at the man, "We have nothing of value! Please, be blessed leave us in peace!" and hid back behind the mule driver.
"Aye! Actually, y'do!" the man shouted back. He pointed right at her, "You! Be still!"
All around her, the silence of the forest was broken by the stomps of heavy feet and snaps of branches. At least a dozen men emerged from hiding, each with a hood on their head or a piece of cloth over their faces. They grunted and snarled at her, and in moments had the cart completely surrounded. 
Diame sprang up and stood in middle the cart to make some distance away from them. "Please, nay! I must make it to Ijia, I have nothing to take! Shul, help! Do something!" Her heart pounded against her chest she felt as if she would faint. God, nay! Why is this happening?! The robbers had their hands over knives ready to brandish them, and what she could see of their eyes was cold hatred directed at her. As they stood still, she could hear footsteps coming from down the road. Diame's eyes widened in disbelief as a familiar gaunt-faced young lord, with a gilt monkey head's cane emerged from the fog. 
Walking casually by the thugs with their faces covered, he approached Shul as if they didnt exist. "Ah, you have done well bringing her all the way out here. Shul, it looks as though your usefulness will allow you to keep your livelihood after all." He said crassly with distaste for his mule driver. "Ah, here she is, this aethermancer is going to make me even wealthier beyond my dreams." He grinned at her a disgusting smile on his perfect teeth.
"L-" Diame couldn't believe anything she was seeing, "Lord Igor?!" She realized she was still hiding behind Shul's shoulders, and quickly pushed herself away from him, "You brought me here!?" She said with utter disgust for the man whom she just shared a cart with for nearly two whole days. I demand to know what in God's name is going on here!" Her shouted trembled as she stood upright.
The young lord chuckled a spiteful laugh at her, "Aye, I supposed I forgot to tell you," Lord Igor lifted up his gold cane and took his time staring into the eyes of the monkey head, "I... was planning on kidnapping you, and selling you into slavery. I was going to pay you no mind, as why would I waste my time with some lass in my mule drivers cart? I coud sense that you had a talent for using aether, I tested you to make sure. And now you will add to my wealth. Many would pay a fortune to have a witch at their beck and call." He licked his lips as he smiled at her, "And an especially comely lass such as yourself would double as some sick bastard's plaything as well. As you are the bounty, I ask that you do not struggle." He leered at his henchmen, "Well, what are you waiting for?! Secure the witch in aethereal binds!" He shouted.
"Nay! Someone, help!" Diame screamed, but that did not stop a robber from starting to pull himself up over the cart's catch.
"Shaddap!" The man snarled as he started to climb in, "Come along quietly lass or I'll wring that neck of yours faster than-"
In a swift motion, Diame swung her staff and cracked the man over the head with all her might, and gasped in shock as he fell backwards into the dirt. "I-I'm sorry!" Diame apologized as she covered her mouth in disbelief as the man lay with a bloodied brow by her hand. She wanted to ask if he was alright, but there was no time for that as the gang of other rogues all at once reached into the cart, grabbing for her and climbing over one another. 
"Hurry it up!" Lord Igor shouted, his voice strained with contempt.
A robber leapt over another and began to grab at her, "Nay!" She screamed as she swung her staff again, and he gripped it fast and threatened to pull it away with one hand as she used by all her strength with two to hold on. "Leave me be! Please!" Diame pleaded. On either side, men grabbed at Diame's robes, and pulled her in two directions, nearly pulling her over. "Nay!" She screamed again as she stuggled with the three brutes to not be over taken, yet more started to climb into the cart one after the other. "Help me! Holy Evaz'sa! Save me!"  Her staff was nearly wrested from her, and her strength dwindled. "Heeelp! Anyone!!!" She shouted with the last of her mustered might, hearing her voice echo off into the distance of the forest. In a wash, all she could hear was her voice, all she could see was the mist swirling around her glimmering bright blue, and it became hard to see and hear what was happening around her anymore. Diame felt a strong chill, and suddenly became even more aware of every droplet of water in the forest down to the tiniest puddle. What?! Nay, why now does the aether overpower me so?! I can scarce see a thing! Her thoughts resounded as she tried to see what was happening around her. God, any time but now! She thought she was hallucinating, but she felt as though she could move but was in no hold. 
All was still bright white to her, then she realized she was engulfed in mist so thick that it marred her vision so. Then in an instant, all the mist seemed to fade to a faint blue veil around her. She went pale, the entire group of robbers were standing around her within arms reach, their eyes wide open, reaching out as if they could still not see a thing.
"F-... Find her!" Lord Ignor shouted with a cracked voice, not even sure exactly where his cohorts were. "Do not let her escape using such base witchery, you fools!" His yell was near breathless with exascerbation as all his men instead gazed around them completely dumbfounded and disoriented.
In haste, Diame shouldered her bag, and kicked the back hatch open to the cart. It dropped down and bludgeoned the same rogue in the head once more, who only just regained himself to sit up. But Diame failed to notice any of that as she hopped out onto the ground and ducked around them through all the confusion. She ran off of the main road and passed behind some trees, and tried not to stumble as she maneuvered through a bumpy path of raised roots. She had no idea where in the forest she was or where she was running to with all her might. She knew she needed to be far away from here, yet she still had find a way out of the forest. There was a grueling commotion of shouts of frustration from behind her, yet all she could do was run with all the speed her legs could take her.


MINUTES PASSED and Diame was out of breath and it took all her will to not sick up from running. She kept moving. Looking behind her she took in full gulps of the misty air, she saw no one but would not allow herself to stop. What if they are right behind me? All her muscles locked up, and she slowed involuntarily. "Nay... Don't stop," she panted, "Keep running!" She breathlessly reminded herself, then slowed to a stumbling walk.
 She had to rest, and if she was going to faint she wouldn't let it be out in the open. She ducked behind a group of small bushes and was mostly hidden, she dropped her staff and bag and fell down on to her hands and knees, gulping for air. All she could hear was her breath, and in fear she clasped her hands around her mouth for a moment to hear if any footsteps were up on her. She heard nothing but the sound of her heart beating as if it were going to leap from her throat. There was naught else but the sounds of the rustles of wind and the deep birds. She breathed again a sigh of relief, nearly thinking she would feel ill if held it any longer. She sat still for a moment, trying to regain herself.
Diame brought her dirty hands up to her face, and saw they were shaking. "What have I done to myself?" she whispered sharply to her self. I cant stay here any longer, they will surely be up on me any moment. She grabbed her things and stood upright, cautiously peering out from above the bushes. There was no one and she arose and looked around her. She truly was alone in the forest full of fog, thankful to be so. However, she was also completely lost, and had no way of knowing where she was on the map. "I must get out of here as fast as I can, but in which direction?" She looked around her, trying to find the sun, but as it reached its zenith, it was hard to tell which way was East or West. "The trees?" She said to herself and inspected some of the nearby trees, "Moss always grows on the North side, right?" Indeed, it did seem to grow in a direction that was not where she had just came running from. She started in that direction as fast as she could, as Ijia would be to the North, eventually. She hoped. 
Diame kept a fervent run as she dodged branches and tried to find a path between all the overgrown greenery around her. She was full of adrenaline and had no thought of looking back, however, she felt like her stamina wouldn't last forever and have to stop again eventually. What am I going to do? She wondered as she ran, then she slowed to a sudden halt. "I need to stay focused, and not stay from a single path... Water...?" The priestess stopped and gave thought to her senses. A water source, a large one she had felt the presence of for some time now suddenly felt as though it was up on her. "What could that be?" It veered slightly in the direction she was headed anyway, and she started off once again in that direction.
She ke
